

THE PEASANT WAR IN GERMANY


Frederick Engels

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: Summer 1850, London;
Published: _Neue Rheinische Zeitung. Revue_;
Translated: by Moissaye J. Olgin in 1926 for International Publishers;
Transcribed: by director@marx.org, July 1995, online Jan 4 1996;
Proofed and Corrected: Mark Harris (2010), Dave Allinson (2016).

Marxists Internet Archive
Available online at:
https://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1850/peasant-war-germany/index.htm

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The 1848 uprisings in Germany put Engels in mind of the last great
peasant rebellions of the 1500s. As he would later write:

“The parallel between the German Revolution of 1525 and that of 1848–49
was too obvious to be altogether ignored at that time.”

Engels demonstrates the failure of both these revolutions was largely
attributable to the bourgeois/burgerdom (and thus underscoring the
modern need for an alliance between the working proletariat and the
working peasantry).

_The Peasant War in Germany_ was the first history book to assert that
the real motivating force behind the Reformation and 16th-century
peasant war was socio-economic (class conflict) rather than “merely”
religious.

Contents

Author’s Preface to the Second Edition (1870)
Author’s Addendum to the Preface (1874)

Chapter 1: The Economic Situation and Classes in Germany

Chapter 2: The Main Opposition Groups and their Programmes; Luther and
Muenzer

Chapter 3: Precursors: Peasant Uprisings, 1476–1517

Chapter 4: Uprising of the Nobility

Chapter 5: The Peasant War in Suabia and Franconia

Chapter 6: The Peasant War in Thuringia, Alsace and Austria

Chapter 7: Significance of the Peasant War

The Twelve Articles of the Peasants
Comments by D. Riazanov
Facsimile of opening pages from the 1870 edition
Notes



PREFACE TO THE SECOND EDITION (1870)


This work was written in London in the summer of 1850, under the vivid
impression of the counter-revolution that had just been completed. It
appeared in 1850 in the fifth and sixth issues of the _Neue Rheinische
Zeitung_, a political economic review edited by Karl Marx in Hamburg. My
political friends in Germany desire to see it in book form, and I hereby
fulfil that desire, since, unfortunately, it still has the interest of
timeliness.

The work does not pretend to present independently collected material.
Quite the contrary, all the material relating to the peasant revolts and
to Thomas Muenzer has been taken from Zimmermann^([1]) whose book,
although showing gaps here and there, is still the best presentation of
the facts. Moreover, old Zimmermann enjoyed his subject. The same
revolutionary instinct which makes him here the advocate of the
oppressed classes, made him later one of the best in the extreme left
wing of Frankfurt.

If, nevertheless, the Zimmermann representation lacks internal
coherence; if it does not succeed in showing the religious and political
controversies of that epoch as a reflection of the class struggles that
were taking place simultaneously; if it sees in the class struggles only
oppressors and oppressed, good and evil, and the final victory of evil;
if its insight into social conditions which determined both the outbreak
and the outcome of the struggle is extremely poor, it was the fault of
the time in which that book came into existence. Nevertheless, for its
time, and among the German idealistic works on history, it stands out as
written in a very realistic vein.

This book, while giving the historic course of the struggle only in its
outlines, undertakes to explain the origin of the peasant wars, the
attitude of the various parties which appear in the war, the political
and religious theories through which those parties strove to make clear
to themselves their position; and finally, the result of the struggle as
determined by the historical-social conditions of life, to show the
political constitution of Germany of that time, the revolt against it;
and to prove that the political and religious theories were not the
causes, but the result of that stage in the development of agriculture,
industry, land and waterways, commerce and finance, which then existed
in Germany. This, the only materialistic conception of history,
originates, not from myself but from Marx, and can be found in his works
on the French Revolution of 1848–9, published in the same review, and in
his _Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte_.

The parallel between the German Revolutions of 1525 and of 1848–9 was
too obvious to be left entirely without attention. However, together
with an identity of events in both cases, as for instance, the
suppression of one local revolt after the other by the army of the
princes, together with a sometimes comic similitude in the behaviour of
the city middle-class, the difference is quite clear.

“Who profited by the Revolution of 1525? The princes. Who profited by
the Revolution of 1848? The big princes, Austria and Prussia. Behind the
princes of 1525 there stood the lower middle-class of the cities, held
chained by means of taxation. Behind the big princes of 1850, there
stood the modern big bourgeoisie, quickly subjugating them by means of
the State debt. Behind the big bourgeoisie stand the proletarians.”

I am sorry to state that in this paragraph too much honour was given to
the German bourgeoisie. True, it had the opportunity of “quickly
subjugating” the monarchy by means of the State debt. Never did it avail
itself of this opportunity.

Austria fell as a boon into the lap of the bourgeoisie after the war of
1866, but the bourgeoisie does not understand how to govern. It is
powerless and inefficient in everything. Only one thing is it capable of
doing: to storm against the workers as soon as they begin to stir. It
remains at the helm only because the Hungarians need it.

And in Prussia? True, the State debt has increased by leaps and bounds.
The deficit has become a permanent feature. The State expenditures keep
growing, year in and year out. The bourgeoisie have a majority in the
Chamber. No taxes can be increased and no debts incurred without their
consent. But where is their power in the State? It was only a couple of
months ago, when a deficit was looming, that again they found themselves
in the most favourable position. They could have gained considerable
concessions by persevering. What was their reaction? They considered it
a sufficient concession when the Government allowed them to lay at its
feet nine millions, not for one year alone, but to be collected
indefinitely every year.

I do not want to blame the “national liberals” of the Chamber more than
is their due. I know they have been forsaken by those who stand behind
them, by the mass of the bourgeoisie. This mass does not wish to govern.
1848 is still in its bones.

Why the German bourgeoisie has developed this remarkable trait, will be
discussed later.

In general, however, the above quotation has proved perfectly true.
Beginning from 1850, the small States were in constant retreat, serving
only as levers for Prussian and Austrian intrigues. Austria and Prussia
were engaged in ever-stronger struggles for supremacy. Finally, the
fearful clash of 1866 took place. Austria, retaining all its provinces,
subjugated, directly and indirectly, the entire north of Prussia, while
leaving the fate of the three southern States in the air.

In all these grand activities of the States, only the following are of
particular importance for the German working class:

First, that universal suffrage has given the workers the power to be
directly represented in the legislative assemblies.

Second, that Prussia has set a good example by swallowing three crowns
by the grace of God. That after this operation her own crown is
maintained by the grace of God as pure as she claims it to be, not even
the national liberals believe any more.

Third, that there is only one serious enemy of the Revolution in Germany
at the present time – the Prussian government.

Fourth, that the Austro-Germans will now be compelled to ask themselves
what they wish to be, Germans or Austrians; whom they wish to adhere to,
to Germany or her extraordinary transleithanian appendages. It has been
obvious for a long time that they will have to give up one or the other.
Still, this has been continually glossed over by the petty-bourgeois
democracy.

As to other important controversies concerning 1866 which were threshed
out between the “national-liberals” and the people’s party _ad nauseam,_
coming years will show that the two standpoints fought so bitterly
simply because they were the opposite poles of the same stupidity.

In the social conditions of Germany, the year 1866 has changed almost
nothing. A few bourgeois reforms: uniform measures and weights, freedom
of movement, freedom of trade, etc. – all within limits befitting
bureaucracy, do not even come up to that of which other western European
countries have been in possession for a long while, and leave the main
evil, the system of bureaucratic concessions, unshaken. As to the
proletariat, the freedom of movement, and of citizenship, the abolition
of passports and other such legislation is made illusory by the current
police practice.

What is much more important than the grand manoeuvres of the State in
1866 is the growth of German industry and commerce, of the railways, the
telegraph, and ocean steamship navigation since 1848. This progress may
be lagging behind that of England or even France, but it is unheard of
for Germany, and has done more in twenty years than would have been
previously possible in a century. Germany has been drawn, earnestly and
irrevocably, into world commerce. Capital invested in industry has
multiplied rapidly. The position of the bourgeoisie has improved
accordingly. The surest sign of industrial prosperity – speculation –
has blossomed richly, princes and dukes being chained to its triumphal
chariot. German capital is now constructing Russian and Rumanian
railways, whereas, only fifteen years ago, the German railways went
a-begging to English entrepreneurs. How, then, is it possible that the
bourgeoisie has not conquered political power, that it behaves in so
cowardly a manner toward the government?

It is the misfortune of the German bourgeoisie to have come too late –
quite in accordance with the beloved German tradition. The period of its
ascendancy coincides with the time when the bourgeoisie of the other
western European countries is politically on the downward path. In
England, the bourgeoisie could place its real representative, Bright,
into the government only by extending the franchise which in the long
run is bound to put an end to its very domination. In France, the
bourgeoisie, which for two years only, 1849–50, had held power as a
class under the republican régime, was able to continue its social
existence only by transferring its power to Louis Bonaparte and the
army. Under present conditions of enormously increased interdependence
of the three most progressive European countries, it is no more possible
for the German bourgeoisie extensively to utilize its political power
while the same class has outlived itself in England and France. It is a
peculiarity of the bourgeoisie, distinguishing it from all other
classes, that a point is being reached in its development after which
every increase in its power, that is, every enlargement of its capital,
only tends to make it more and more incapable of retaining political
dominance. _“Behind the big bourgeoisie stand the proletarians.”_ In the
degree as the bourgeoisie develops its industry, its commerce, and its
means of communication, it also produces the proletariat. At a certain
point, which must not necessarily appear simultaneously and on the same
stage of development everywhere, it begins to note that this, its second
self, has outgrown it. From then on, it loses the power for exclusive
political dominance. It looks for allies with whom to share its
authority, or to whom to cede all power, as circumstances may demand.

In Germany, this turning point came for the bourgeoisie as early as
1848. The bourgeoisie became frightened, not so much by the German, as
by the French proletariat. The battle of June, 1848, in Paris, showed
the bourgeoisie what could be expected. The German proletariat was
restless enough to prove to the bourgeoisie that the seed of revolution
had been sown also in German soil. From that day, the edge of bourgeois
political action was broken. The bourgeoisie looked around for allies.
It sold itself to them regardless of price, and there it remains.

These allies are all of a reactionary turn. It is the king’s power, with
his army and his bureaucracy; it is the big feudal nobility; it is the
smaller junker; it is even the clergy. The bourgeoisie has made so many
compacts and unions with all of them to save its dear skin, that now it
has nothing more to barter. And the more the proletariat developed, the
more it began to feel as a class and to act as one, the feebler became
the bourgeoisie. When the astonishingly bad strategy of the Prussians
triumphed over the astonishingly worse strategy of the Austrians at
Sadowa, it was difficult to say who gave a deeper sigh of relief, the
Prussian bourgeois, who was a partner to the defeat at Sadowa, or his
Austrian colleague.

Our upper middle-class of 1870 acted in the same fashion as did the
moderate middle-class of 1525. As to the small bourgeoisie, the master
artisans and merchants, they remain unchanged. They hope to climb up to
the big bourgeoisie, and they are fearful lest they be pushed down into
the ranks of the proletariat. Between fear and hope, they will in times
of struggle seek to save their precious skin and to join the victors
when the struggle is over. Such is their nature.

The social and political activities of the proletariat have kept pace
with the rapid growth of industry since 1848. The role of the German
workers, as expressed in their trade unions, their associations,
political organisations and public meetings, at elections, and in the
so-called Reichstag, is alone a sufficient indication of the
transformation which came over Germany in the last twenty years. It is
to the credit of the German workers that _they alone_ have managed to
send workers and workers’ representatives into the Parliament – a feat
which neither the French nor the English had hitherto accomplished.

Still, even the proletariat shows some resemblance to 1525. The class of
the population which entirely and permanently depends on wages is now,
as then, a minority of the German people. This class is also compelled
to seek allies. The latter can be found only among the petty
bourgeoisie, the low grade proletariat of the cities, the small
peasants, and the wage-workers of the land.

The petty bourgeoisie has been mentioned above. This class is entirely
unreliable except when a victory has been won. Then its noise in the
beer saloons is without limit. Nevertheless, there are good elements
among it, who, of their own accord, follow the workers.

The _lumpenproletariat,_ this scum of the decaying elements of all
classes, which establishes headquarters in all the big cities, is the
worst of all possible allies. It is an absolutely venal, an absolutely
brazen crew. If the French workers, in the course of the Revolution,
inscribed on the houses: _Mort aux voleurs!_ (Death to the thieves!) and
even shot down many, they did it, not out of enthusiasm for property,
but because they rightly considered it necessary to hold that band at
arm’s length. Every leader of the workers who utilises these
gutter-proletarians as guards or supports, proves himself by this action
alone a traitor to the movement.

The small peasants (bigger peasants belong to the bourgeoisie) are not
homogeneous. They are either in serfdom bound to their lords and
masters, and inasmuch as the bourgeoisie has failed to do its duty in
freeing those people from serfdom, it will not be difficult to convince
them that salvation, for them, can be expected only from the working
class; or they are tenants, whose situation is almost equal to that of
the Irish. Rents are so high that even in times of normal crops the
peasant and his family can hardly eke out a bare existence; when the
crops are bad, he virtually starves. When he is unable to pay his rent,
he is entirely at the mercy of the landlord. The bourgeoisie thinks of
relief only under compulsion. Where, then, should the tenants look for
relief outside of the workers?

There is another group of peasants, those who own a small piece of land.
In most cases they are so burdened with mortgages that their dependence
upon the usurer is equal to the dependence of the tenant upon the
landlord. What they earn is practically a meager wage, which, since good
and bad crops alternate, is highly uncertain. These people cannot have
the least hope of getting anything out of the bourgeoisie, because it is
the bourgeoisie, the capitalist usurers, that squeeze the life-blood out
of them. Still, the peasants cling to their property, though in reality
it does not belong to them, but to the usurers. It will be necessary to
make it clear to these people that only when a government of the people
will have transformed all mortgages into a debt to the State, and
thereby lowered the rent, will they be able to free themselves from the
usurer. This, however, can be accomplished only by the working class.

Wherever middle and large land ownership prevails, the wage-workers of
the land form the most numerous class. This is the case throughout the
entire north and east of Germany, and it is here that the industrial
workers of the city find their most numerous and natural allies. In the
same way as the capitalist is opposed to the industrial worker, the
large landowner or large tenant is opposed to the wage-workers of the
land. The measures that help the one must also help the other. The
industrial workers can free themselves only by turning the capital of
the bourgeoisie, that is, the raw materials, machines and tools, the
foodstuffs necessary for production, into social property, their own
property, to be used by them in common. Similarly, the wage-workers of
the land can be freed from their hideous misery only when the main
object of their work, the land itself, will be withdrawn from the
private property of the large peasants and still larger feudal masters,
and transformed into social property to be cultivated by an association
of land workers on common basis. And here we come to the famous decision
of the International Socialist Congress in Basle: That it is in the
interest of society to transform property on land into common national
property. This decision was made primarily for those countries where
there is large land ownership, with large agricultural enterprises, with
one master and many wage-workers in every estate. It is these conditions
that still prevail in Germany, and next to England, the decision was
_most timely_ for Germany. The agricultural proletariat, the
wage-workers of the land, is the class from which the bulk of the armies
of the princes is being recruited. It is the class which, thanks to
universal suffrage, sends into Parliament the great mass of feudal
masters and Junkers. However, it is also the class nearest to the
industrial workers of the city. It shares their conditions of living,
and it is still deeper steeped in misery than the city workers. This
class, powerless because split and scattered, but possessing hidden
power which is so well known to the government and nobility that they
purposely allow the schools to deteriorate in order that the rural
population should remain unenlightened, must be called to life and drawn
into the movement. This is the most urgent task of the German labour
movement. From the day when the mass of the workers of the land have
learned to understand their own interests, a reactionary, feudal,
bureaucratic or bourgeois government in Germany becomes an
impossibility.



ADDENDUM TO THE PREFACE


THE preceding lines were written over four years ago, but they are valid
also at present. What was true after Sadowa and the partition of Germany
is being confirmed also after Sedan and the erection of the Holy German
Empire of Prussian nationality. Little indeed are the “world-shaking”
activities of the States in the realm of so-called big politics in a
position to change the trend of historic development.

What these grand activities of the States are in a position to
accomplish is to hasten the tempo of historic movement. In this respect,
the originators of the above-mentioned “world-shaking” events have made
involuntary successes which to themselves appear highly undesirable, but
which, however, they must take into the bargain, for better or worse.

Already the war of 1866 had shaken the old Prussia to its foundations.
After 1848 it was difficult to bring the rebellious industrial element
of the western provinces, bourgeois as well as proletarian, under the
old discipline. Still, somehow, this was accomplished, and the interests
of the Junkers of the eastern provinces, together with those of the
army, again became dominant in the State. In 1866 almost all the
northwest of Germany became Prussian. Besides the incurable moral injury
to the Prussian crown, by the fact that it had swallowed up three other
crowns by the grace of God, the centre of gravity of the monarchy had
moved considerably westward. The four million Rhinelanders and
Westphalians were reinforced, first, by four million Germans annexed
through the North German Alliance directly, and then by six million
annexed indirectly. In 1870, however, eight million southwest Germans
were added, so that, in the “new monarchy,” the fourteen and a half
million old Prussians (all the six East Elbian provinces, among them,
two million Poles) were opposed by twenty-five million who had long
outgrown the old Prussian junker feudalism. So it happened that the very
victories of the Prussian army displaced the entire foundation of the
Prussian State edifice; the junker dominance became ever more
intolerable, even for the government itself. At the same time, however,
the struggle between the bourgeoisie and the workers made inevitable by
the impetuous growth of industry, relegated to the background the
struggle between Junkers and bourgeoisie, so that the inner social
foundations of the old State suffered a complete transformation. Ever
since 1840, the condition making possible the existence of the slowly
rotting monarchy was the struggle between nobility and bourgeoisie,
wherein the monarchy retained equilibrium. From the moment, however,
when it was no more a question of protecting the nobility against the
onslaught of the bourgeoisie, but of protecting all propertied classes
against the onslaught of the working-class, the absolute monarchy had to
turn to that form of state which was expressly devised for this specific
purpose – the Bonapartist monarchy. This change of Prussia towards
Bonapartism I have discussed in another place (_Woknungsfrage_). What I
did not stress there, and what is very important in this connection, is
that this change was the greatest progress made by Prussia after 1848,
which only shows how backward Prussia was in point of modern
development. It is a fact that the Prussian State still was a
semi-feudal State, whereas Bonapartism is, at all events, a modern form
of state which presupposes the abolition of feudalism. Thus Prussia must
decide to do away with its numerous remnants of feudalism, to sacrifice
its junkerdom as such. This, naturally, is being done in the mildest
possible form, and under the tune of the favourite melody, “Always
slowly forward.” An example of such “reform” work is the notorious
organisation of districts, which, removing the feudal privileges of the
individual junker in relation to his estate, restores them as special
privileges of the big landowners in relation to the entire district. The
substance remains, it being only translated from the feudal into the
bourgeois dialect. The old Prussian junker is forcibly being transformed
into something akin to the English squire. He need not have offered so
much resistance, because the one is just as foolish as the other.

Thus it was the peculiar feat of Prussia not only to culminate, by the
end of this century, her bourgeois revolution begun in 1808–13 and
continued in 1848, but to culminate it in the present form of
Bonapartism. If everything goes well, and the world remains nice and
quiet, and we all become old enough, we can still perhaps live to see –
about 1900 – the government of Prussia actually relinquishing all feudal
institutions, and Prussia finally reaching a point where France stood in
1792.

Speaking positively, the abolition of feudalism means the introduction
of bourgeois conditions. In the measure as the privileges of the
nobility fall, legislation becomes more and more bourgeois. Here, again,
we meet with the chief point at issue, the attitude of the German
bourgeoisie towards the government. We have seen that the government is
compelled to introduce these slow and petty reforms, but in its relation
to the bourgeoisie, the government portrays these small concessions as
sacrifices in favour of the bourgeoisie, as concessions yielded by the
crown with difficulty and pain, and for which the bourgeoisie must, in
return, yield something to he government. The bourgeoisie, on the other
hand, though quite aware of this state of affairs, allows itself to be
fooled. This is the source of the tacit agreement which is the basis of
all Reichstag and Chamber debates. On the one hand, the government
reforms the laws at a snail pace tempo in the interests of the
bourgeoisie; it removes the impediments to industry emanating from the
multiplicity of small states; it creates unity of coinage, of measures
and weights; it gives freedom of trade, etc.; it grants the freedom of
movement; it puts the working power of Germany at the unlimited disposal
of capital; it creates favourable conditions for trade and speculation.
On the other hand, the bourgeoisie leaves in the hands of the government
all actual political power; it votes taxes, loans and recruits; it helps
to frame all new reform laws in a way that the old police power over
undesirable individuals shall remain in full force. The bourgeoisie buys
its gradual social emancipation for the price of immediate renunciation
of its own political power. Naturally, the motive which makes such
agreement acceptable to the bourgeoisie is not the fear of the
government but the fear of the proletariat.

Miserable as the bourgeoisie appears in the political realm, it cannot
be denied that as far as industry and commerce are concerned, the
bourgeoisie fulfils its historic duty. The growth of industry and
commerce mentioned already in the introduction to the second edition has
been going on with even greater vigour. What has taken place in the
Rhenish-Westphalian industrial region since 1869, is unprecedented for
Germany, and it reminds one of the rapid growth in the English
manufacturing districts at the beginning of this century. The same thing
will happen in Saxony and Upper Silesia, in Berlin, Hanover, and the
southern States. At last we have world trade, a really big industry, and
a really modern bourgeoisie. But we have also had a real crisis, and we
have a truly mighty proletariat. For the future historian of Germany,
the battle roar of 1859–64 on the field of Spicheren, Mars la Tour,
Sedan, and the rest, will be of much less importance than the
unpretentious, quiet, and constantly forward-moving development of the
German proletariat. Immediately after 1870, the German workers stood
before a grave trial – the Bonapartist war provocation and its natural
sequence, the general national enthusiasm in Germany. The German workers
did not allow themselves to be illusioned for a moment. Not a trace of
national chauvinism made itself manifest among them. In the midst of a
mania for victory, they remained cool, demanding “equitable peace with
the French Republic and no annexations,” and not even the state of siege
was in a position to silence them. No glory of battle, no phraseology of
German “imperial magnificence” attracted them. Their sole aim remained
the liberation of the entire European proletariat. We may say with full
assurance that in no country have the workers stood such a difficult
test with such splendid results.

The state of siege of wartime was followed by trials for treason, _lèse
majesté_, and contempt of officers and by ever increasing police
atrocities practised in peace time. _The Volksstaat_ had three or four
editors in prison simultaneously; the other papers, in the same ratio.
Every known party speaker had to face court at least once a year, and
was usually convicted. Deportations, confiscations, suppressions of
meetings rapidly followed one another, but all to no avail. The place of
every prisoner or deportee was immediately filled by another. For one
suppressed gathering, two others were substituted, wearing out arbitrary
police power in one locality after the other by endurance and strict
conformity to the law. Persecution defeated its own purpose. Far from
breaking the workers’ party or even bending it, it attracted ever new
recruits, and strengthened the organisation. In their struggle against
the authorities and the individual bourgeois, the workers manifested an
intellectual and moral superiority. Particularly in their conflicts with
the employers of labour did they show that they, the workers, were now
the educated class, while the capitalists were dupes. In their fights, a
sense of humour prevailed, showing how sure they were of their cause,
and how superior they felt. A struggle thus conducted on historically
prepared soil must yield great results. The success of the January
(1874) elections stood out, unique in the history of the modern labour
movement, and the astonishment aroused by them throughout Europe was
perfectly deserved.

The German workers have two important advantages compared with the rest
of Europe. First, they belong to the most theoretical people of Europe;
second, they have retained that sense of theory which the so-called
“educated” people of Germany have totally lost. Without German
philosophy, particularly that of Hegel, German scientific Socialism (the
only scientific Socialism extant) would never have come into existence.
Without a sense for theory, scientific Socialism would have never become
blood and tissue of the workers. What an enormous advantage this is, may
be seen on the one hand from the indifference of the English labour
movement towards all theory, which is one of the reasons why it moves so
slowly in spite of the splendid organisation of the individual unions;
on the other hand, from the mischief and confusion created by
Proudhonism in its original form among the Frenchmen and Belgians, and
in its caricature form, as presented by Bakunin, among the Spaniards and
Italians.

The second advantage is that, chronologically speaking, the Germans were
the last to appear in the labour movement. In the same manner as German
theoretical Socialism will never forget that it rests on the shoulders
of Saint Simon, Fourier and Owen, the three who, in spite of their
fantastic notions and Utopianism, belonged to the most significant heads
of all time and whose genius anticipated numerous things the correctness
of which can now be proved in a scientific way, so the practical German
labour movement must never forget that it has developed on the shoulders
of the English and French movements, that it had utilised their
experience, acquired at a heavy price, and that for this reason it was
in a position to avoid their mistakes which in their time were
unavoidable. Without the English trade unions and the French political
workers’ struggles preceding the German labour movement, without the
mighty impulse given by the Paris Commune, where would we now be?

It must be said to the credit of the German workers that they have
utilised the advantages of their situation with rare understanding. For
the first time in the history of the labour movement the struggle is
being so conducted that its three sides, the theoretical, the political
and the practical economical (opposition to the capitalists), form one
harmonious and well-planned entity. In this concentric attack, as it
were, lies the strength and invincibility of the German movement.

It is due to this advantageous situation on the one hand, to the insular
peculiarities of the British, and to the cruel suppression of the French
movements on the other, that for the present moment the German workers
form the vanguard of the proletarian struggle. How long events will
allow them to occupy this post of honour cannot be foreseen. But as long
as they are placed in it, let us hope that they will discharge their
duties in the proper manner. It is the specific duty of the leaders to
gain an ever clearer understanding of the theoretical problems, to free
themselves more and more from the influence of traditional phrases
inherited from the old conception of the world, and constantly to keep
in mind that Socialism, having become a science, demands the same
treatment as every other science – it must be studied. The task of the
leaders will be to bring understanding, thus acquired and clarified, to
the working masses, to spread it with increased enthusiasm, to close the
ranks of the party organisations and of the labour unions with ever
greater energy. The votes cast in favour of the Socialists last January
may represent considerable strength, but they still are far from being
the majority of the German working class; and encouraging as may be the
successes of the propaganda among the rural population, more remains to
be done in this field. The slogan is not to flinch in the struggle. The
task is to wrest from the enemy’s hands one seat after the other, one
electoral district after the other. In the first place, however, it is
necessary to retain a real international spirit which permits of no
chauvinism, which joyfully greets each new step of the proletarian
movement, no matter in which nation it is made. If the German workers
proceed in this way, they may not march exactly at the head of the
movement – it is not in the interest of the movement that the workers of
one country should march at the head of all – but they will occupy an
honourable place on the battle line, and they will stand armed for
battle when other unexpected grave trials or momentous events will
demand heightened courage, heightened determination, and the will to
act.

FREDERICK ENGELS
_London, July 1, 1874._



CHAPTER 1 THE ECONOMIC SITUATION AND SOCIAL CLASSES IN GERMANY


The German people are by no means lacking in revolutionary tradition.
There were times when Germany produced characters that could match the
best men in the revolutions of other countries; when the German people
manifested an endurance and energy which, in a centralised nation, would
have brought the most magnificent results; when the German peasants and
plebeians were pregnant with ideas and plans which often made their
descendants shudder.

In contrast to present-day enfeeblement which appears everywhere after
two years of struggle (since 1848) it is timely to present once more to
the German people those awkward but powerful and tenacious figures of
the great peasant war. Three centuries have flown by since then, and
many a thing has changed; still the peasant war is not as far removed
from our present-day struggles as it would seem, and the opponents we
have to encounter remain essentially the same. Those classes and
fractions of classes which everywhere betrayed 1848 and 1849, can be
found in the role of traitors as early as 1525, though on a lower level
of development. And if the robust vandalism of the peasant wars appeared
in the movement of the last years only sporadically, in the Odenwald, in
the Black Forest, in Silesia, it by no means shows a superiority of the
modern insurrection.

*

Let us first review briefly the situation in Germany at the beginning of
the Sixteenth Century.

German industry had gone through a considerable process of growth in the
Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries. The local industry of the feudal
countryside was superseded by the guild organisation of production in
the cities, which produced for wider circles and even for remote
markets. Weaving of crude woollen stuffs and linens had become a
well-established, ramified branch of industry, and even finer woollen
and linen fabrics, as well as silks, were already being produced in
Augsburg. Outside of the art of weaving, there had arisen those branches
of industry, which, approaching the finer arts, were nurtured by the
demands for luxuries on the part of the ecclesiastic and lay lords of
the late mediaeval epoch: gold- and silver-smithing, sculpture and
wood-carving, etching and wood-engraving, armour-making,
medal-engraving, wood-turning, etc., etc. A series of more or less
important discoveries culminating in the invention of gunpowder and
printing had considerably aided the development of the crafts. Commerce
kept pace with industry. The Hanseatic League, through its century-long
monopoly of sea navigation, had brought about the emergence of the
entire north of Germany out of medieval barbarism; and even when, after
the end of the Sixteenth Century, the Hanseatic League had begun to
succumb to the competition of the English and the Dutch, the great
highway of commerce from India to the north still lay through Germany,
Vasco da Gama’s discoveries notwithstanding. Augsburg still remained the
great point of concentration for Italian silks, Indian spices, and all
Levantine products. The cities of upper Germany, namely, Augsburg and
Nuernberg, were the centres of opulence and luxury remarkable for that
time. The production of raw materials had equally progressed. The German
miners of the Fifteenth Century had been the most skilful in the world,
and agriculture was also shaken out of its mediaeval crudity through the
blossoming forth of the cities. Not only had large stretches of land
been put under cultivation, but dye plants and other imported cultures
had been introduced, which in turn had a favourable influence on
agriculture as a whole.

Still, the progress of national production in Germany had not kept pace
with the progress of other countries. Agriculture lagged far behind that
of England and Holland. Industry lagged far behind the Italian, Flemish
and English, and as to sea navigation, the English, and especially the
Dutch, were already driving the Germans out of the field. The population
was still very sparse. Civilisation in Germany existed only in spots,
around the centres of industry and commerce; but even the interests of
these individual centres diverged widely, with hardly any point of
contact. The trade relations and markets of the South differed from
those of the North; the East and the West had almost no intercourse. No
city had grown to become the industrial and commercial point of gravity
for the whole country, such as London was for England. Internal
communication was almost exclusively confined to coastwise and river
navigation and to a few large commercial highways, like those from
Augsburg and Nuernberg through Cologne to the Netherlands, and through
Erfurt to the North. Away from the rivers and highways of commerce there
was a number of smaller cities which, excluded from the great trade
centres, continued a sluggish existence under conditions of late
medieval times, consuming few non-local articles, and yielding few
products for export. Of the rural population, only the nobility came
into contact with wide circles and new wants; the mass of the peasants
never overstepped the boundaries of local relations and local outlook.

While in England, as well as in France, the rise of commerce and
industry had brought about a linking of interests over the entire
country, the political centralisation of Germany had succeeded only in
the grouping of interests according to provinces and around purely local
centres. This meant political decentralisation which later gained
momentum through the exclusion of Germany from world commerce. In the
degree as the purely feudal empire was falling apart, bonds of unity
were becoming weakened, great feudal vassals were turning into almost
independent princes, and cities of the empire on the one hand, the
knights of the empire on the other, were forming alliances either
against each other, or against the princes or the emperor. The imperial
power, now uncertain as to its own position, vacillated between the
various elements opposing the empire, and was constantly losing
authority; the attempt at centralisation, in the manner of Louis
XI^([2]) brought about nothing but the holding together of the Austrian
hereditary lands, this in spite of all intrigues and violent actions.
The final winners, who could not help winning in this confusion, in this
helter-skelter of numerous conflicts, were the representatives of
centralisation amidst disunion, the representatives of local and
provincial centralisation, the princes, beside whom the emperor
gradually became no more than a prince among princes.

Under these conditions the situation of the classes emerging from
mediaeval times had considerably changed. New classes had been formed
besides the old ones.

Out of the old nobility came the princes. Already they were almost
independent of the emperor, and possessed the major part of sovereign
rights. They declared war and made peace of their own accord, they
maintained standing armies, called local councils, and levied taxes.
They had already drawn a large part of the lower nobility and cities
under their lordly power; they did everything in their power to
incorporate in their lands all the rest of the cities and baronies which
still remained under the empire. Towards such cities and baronies they
appeared in the role of centralisers, while as far as the imperial power
was concerned, they were the decentralising factor. Internally, their
reign was already autocratic, they called the estates only when they
could not do without them. They imposed taxes, and collected money
whenever they saw fit. The right of the estates to ratify taxes was
seldom recognised, and still more seldom practised. And even when they
were called, the princes ordinarily had a majority, thanks to the
knights and the prelates which were the two estates freed from taxes,
participating, nevertheless, in their consumption. The need of the
princes for money grew with the taste for luxuries, with the increase of
the courts and the standing armies, with the mounting costs of
administration. The taxes were becoming more and more oppressive. The
cities being in most cases protected against them by privileges, the
entire weight of the tax burden fell upon the peasants, those under the
princes themselves, as well as the serfs and bondsmen of the knights
bound by vassalage to the princes; wherever direct taxation was
insufficient, indirect taxes were introduced; the most skilful
machinations of the art of finance were utilised to fill the gaping
holes of the fiscal system. When nothing else availed, when there was
nothing to pawn and no free imperial city was willing to grant credit
any longer, one resorted to coin manipulations of the basest kind, one
coined depreciated money, one set a higher or lower rate of legal tender
most convenient for the prince. Trading in city and other privileges,
subsequently to be taken away by force, in order that they might again
be sold, seizing every attempt at opposition as an excuse for
incendiarism and robbery of every kind, etc., etc., were lucrative and
quite ordinary sources of income for the princes of those times. The
administration of justice was also a constant and not unimportant
article of trade for the princes. In brief, the subjects who, besides
the princes, had to satisfy the private appetites of their magistrates
and bailiffs as well, were enjoying the full taste of the “fatherly”
system. Of the medieval feudal hierarchy, the knighthood of moderate
possessions had almost entirely disappeared; it had either climbed up to
the position of independence of small princes, or it had sunk into the
ranks of the lower nobility. The lower nobility, the knighthood, was
fast moving towards extinction. A large portion of it had already become
pauperised, and lived on its services to the princes, either in military
or in civil capacity; another portion was bound by vassalage to the
sovereignty of the prince; a very small portion was directly under the
empire. The development of military science, the rising importance of
infantry, the spread of firearms, had dwarfed their military importance
as heavy cavalry, at the same time destroying the invincibility of their
castles. The knights had become superfluous through the progress of
industry, just as the artisans had become obviated by the same progress.
The dire need of the knighthood for money added considerably to their
ruin. The luxurious life in the castles, the competition in magnificence
at tournaments and feasts, the price of armaments and of horses all
increased with the progress of civilisation, whereas the sources of
income of the knights and barons, increased but little, if at all. Feuds
with accompanying plunders and incendiarism, lying in ambush, and
similar noble occupations, became in the course of time too dangerous.
The cash payments of the knights’ subjects brought in hardly more than
before. In order to satisfy mounting requirements, the noble masters
resorted to the same means as were practised by the princes; the
peasantry was being robbed by the masters with greater dexterity every
year. The serfs were being wrung dry. The bondsmen were burdened with
ever new payments of various descriptions upon every possible occasion.
Serf labour, dues, ground rents, land sale taxes, death taxes,
protection moneys and so on, were increased at will in spite of old
agreements. Justice was denied or sold for money, and wherever the
knight could not obtain the peasant’s money otherwise, he threw him into
the tower without much ado, and compelled him to pay ransom.

With the other classes, the lower nobility courted no friendly relations
either. Vassal knights strove to become vassals of the empire; vassals
of the empire strove to become independent. This led to incessant
conflicts with the princes. The knighthood looked upon the clergy with
their resplendent grandeur as upon a powerful but superfluous class. It
envied them their large estates and their riches held secure by celibacy
and the church constitution. With the cities, the knighthood was
continually on the war path; it owed them money, it fed on plundering
their territory, on robbing their merchants, on the ransom paid for
prisoners captured in conflicts. The struggle of the knighthood against
all these estates became more vehement as the estates themselves began
to realise that the money question was a life problem for them.

The clergy, representatives of the ideology of mediaeval feudalism, felt
the influence of the historic transformation no less acutely. The
invention of the art of printing, and the requirements of extended
commerce, robbed the clergy not only of its monopoly of reading and
writing, but also of that of higher education. Division of labour was
being introduced also into the realm of intellectual work. The newly
arising class of jurists drove the clergy out of a series of very
influential positions. The clergy was also beginning to become largely
superfluous, and it acknowledged this fact by growing lazier and more
ignorant. The more superfluous it became, the more it grew in numbers,
thanks to the enormous riches which it still kept on augmenting by fair
means or foul.

The clergy was divided into two distinct groups. The feudal hierarchy of
the clergy formed the aristocratic group – bishops and archbishops,
abbots, priors and other prelates. These high church dignitaries were
either imperial princes themselves, or they reigned as vassals of other
princes over large areas with numerous serfs and bondsmen. They not only
exploited their subjects as recklessly as the knighthood and the
princes, but they practised this in an even more shameful manner. They
used not only brutal force, but all the intrigues of religion as well;
not only the horrors of the rack, but also the horror of
excommunication, or refusal of absolution; they used all the intricacies
of the confessional in order to extract from their subjects the last
penny, or to increase the estates of the church. Forging of documents
was a widespread and beloved means of extortion in the hands of those
worthy men, who, receiving from their subjects feudal payments, taxes
and tithes, were still in constant need of money. The manufacture of
miracle-producing saints’ effigies and relics, the organisation of
praying-centres endowed with the power of salvation, the trade in
indulgences was resorted to in order to squeeze more payments out of the
people. All this was practised long and with not little success.

The prelates and their numerous gendarmerie of monks which grew with the
spread of political and religious baiting, were the objects of hatred
not only of the people but also of the nobility. Being directly under
the empire, the prelates were in the way of the princes. The fast living
of the corpulent bishops and abbots with their army of monks, roused the
envy of the nobility and the indignation of the people who bore the
burden. Hatred was intensified by the fact that the behaviour of the
clergy was a slap in the face of their own preaching.

The plebeian faction of the clergy consisted of preachers, rural and
urban. The preachers were outside the feudal hierarchy of the church and
participated in none of its riches. Their activities were less
rigorously controlled and, important as they were for the church, they
were for the moment far less indispensable than the police services of
the barracked monks. Consequently, they were paid much less than the
monks, and their prebends were far from lucrative. Being of a
middle-class or plebeian origin, they were nearer to the life of the
masses, thus being able to retain middle-class and plebeian sympathies,
in spite of their status as clergy. While the participation of the monks
in the movements of their time was the exception, that of the plebeian
clergy was the rule. They gave the movement its theorists and
ideologists, and many of them, representatives of the plebeians and
peasants, died on the scaffold. The hatred of the masses for the clergy
seldom touched this group.

What the emperor was to the princes and nobility, the pope was to the
higher and lower clergy. As the emperor received the “common penny,” the
imperial taxes, so the pope was paid the general church taxes, out of
which he defrayed the expenses of the luxurious Roman court. In no
country were his taxes collected with such conscientiousness and rigour
as in Germany, due to the power and the number of the clergy. The
annates were collected with particular severity when a bishopric was to
become vacant. With the growth of the court’s demands, new means for
raising revenues were invented, such as the traffic in relics and
indulgences, jubilee collections, etc. Large sums of money were thus
yearly transported from Germany to Rome, and the increased pressure
fanned not only the hatred towards the clergy, but it also aroused
national feelings, particularly among the nobility, the then most
national class.

In the cities, the growth of commerce and handicraft produced three
distinct groups out of the original citizenry of medieval times.

The city population was headed by the _patrician families,_ the
so-called “honourables.” Those were the richest families. They alone sat
in the council, and held all the city offices. They not only
administered all the revenues of the city, but they also consumed them.
Strong in their riches and their ancient aristocratic status, recognised
by emperor and empire, they exploited in every possible way the city
community as well as the peasants belonging to the city. They practised
usury in grain and money; they secured for themselves monopolies of
various kinds; they gradually deprived the community of every right to
use the city forests and meadows, and used them directly for their own
private benefit. They imposed road, bridge and gate payments and other
duties; they sold trade and guild privileges, master and citizen rights;
and they traded with justice. The peasants of the city area were treated
by them with no more consideration than by the nobility and the clergy.
On the contrary, the city magistrates and bailiffs, mostly patricians,
brought into the villages, together with aristocratic rigidity and
avarice, a certain bureaucratic punctuality in collecting duties. The
city revenues thus collected were administered in a most optional
fashion; city bookkeeping was as neglectful and confused as possible;
defraudation and treasury deficits were the order of the day. How easy
it was for a comparatively small caste, surrounded by privileges, and
held together by family ties and community of interests, to enrich
itself enormously out of the city revenues, will be understood when one
considers the numerous frauds and swindles which 1848 witnessed in many
city administrations.

The patricians took care to make dormant the rights of the city
community everywhere, particularly as regards finance. Later, when the
extortions of these gentlemen became too severe, the communities started
a movement to bring at least the city administration under their
control. In most cities they actually regained their rights, but due, on
the one hand, to the eternal squabbles between the guilds and, on the
other, to the tenacity of the patricians and their protection by the
empire and the governments of the allied cities, the patrician council
members soon restored by shrewdness or force their dominance in the
councils. At the beginning of the Sixteenth Century, the communities of
all the cities were again in the opposition.

The city opposition against the patricians was divided into two factions
which stood out very clearly in the course of the peasant war.

_The middle-class opposition,_ the predecessor of our modern liberals,
embraced the richer middle-class, the middle-class of moderate means,
and a more or less appreciable section of the poorer elements, according
to local conditions. This opposition demanded control over the city
administration and participation in the legislative power either through
a general assemblage of the community or through representatives (big
council, city committee). Further, it demanded modification of the
patrician policy of favouring a few families which were gaining an
exceptional position inside the patrician group. Aside from this, the
middle-class opposition demanded the filling of some council offices by
citizens of their own group. This party, joined here and there by
dissatisfied elements of impoverished patricians, had a large majority
in all the ordinary general assemblies of the community and in the
guilds. The adherents of the council and the more radical opposition
formed together only a minority among the real citizens.

We shall see how, in the course of the Sixteenth Century, this moderate,
“law-abiding,” well-off and intelligent opposition played exactly the
same role and exactly with the same success as its heir, the
constitutional party in the movements of 1848 and 1849. The middle-class
opposition had still another object of heated protest: the clergy, whose
loose way of living and luxurious habits aroused its bitter scorn. The
middle-class opposition demanded measures against the scandalous
behaviour of those illustrious people. It demanded that the inner
jurisdiction of the clergy and its right to levy taxes should be
abolished, and that the number of the monks should be limited.

_The plebeian opposition_ consisted of ruined members of the
middle-class and that mass of the city population which possessed no
citizenship rights: the journeymen, the day labourers, and the numerous
beginnings of the _lumpenproletariat_ which can be found even in the
lowest stages of development of city life. This low-grade proletariat
is, generally speaking, a phenomenon which, in a more or less developed
form, can be found in all the phases of society hitherto observed. The
number of people without a definite occupation and a stable domicile was
at that time gradually being augmented by the decay of feudalism in a
society in which every occupation, every realm of life, was entrenched
behind a number of privileges. In no modern country was the number of
vagabonds so great as in Germany, in the first half of the Sixteenth
Century. One portion of these tramps joined the army in war-time,
another begged its way through the country, a third sought to eke out a
meagre living as day-labourers in those branches of work which were not
under guild jurisdiction. All three groups played a role in the peasant
war; the first in the army of the princes to whom the peasant succumbed,
the second in the conspiracies and in the troops of the peasants where
its demoralising influence was manifested every moment; the third, in
the struggles of the parties in the cities. It must be borne in mind,
however, that a large portion of this class, namely, the one living in
the cities, still retained a considerable foundation of peasant nature,
and had not developed that degree of venality and degradation which
characterise the modern civilised low-grade proletariat.

It is evident that the plebeian opposition of the cities was of a mixed
nature. It combined the ruined elements of the old feudal and guild
societies with the budding proletarian elements of a coming modern
bourgeois society; on the one hand, impoverished guild citizens, who,
due to their privileges, still clung to the existing middle-class order,
on the other hand, driven out peasants and ex-officers who were yet
unable to become proletarians. Between these two groups were the
journeymen, for the time being outside official society and so close to
the standard of living of the proletariat as was possible under the
industry of the times and the guild privileges, but, due to the same
privileges, almost all prospective middle-class master artisans. The
party affiliations of this mixture were, naturally, highly uncertain,
and varying from locality to locality. Before the peasant war, the
plebeian opposition appeared in the political struggles, not as a party,
but as a shouting, rapacious tail-end to the middle-class opposition, a
mob that could be bought and sold for a few barrels of wine. It was the
revolt of the peasants that transformed them into a party, and even then
they were almost everywhere dependent upon the peasants, both in demands
and in action – a striking proof of the fact that the cities of that
time were greatly dependent upon the country. In so far as the plebeian
opposition acted independently, it demanded extension of city trade
privileges over the rural districts, and it did not like to see the city
revenues curtailed by abolition of feudal burdens in the rural area
belonging to the city, etc. In brief, in so far as it appeared
independently, it was reactionary. It submitted to its own middle-class
elements, and thus formed a characteristic prologue to the tragic comedy
staged by the modern petty-bourgeoisie in the last three years under the
head of democracy.

Only in Thuringia and in a few other localities was the plebeian faction
of the city carried away by the general storm to such an extent that its
embryo proletarian elements for a brief time gained the upper hand over
all the other factors of the movement. This took place under the direct
influence of Muenzer in Thuringia, and of his disciples in other places.
This episode, forming the climax of the entire peasant war, and grouped
around the magnificent figure of Thomas Muenzer, was of very brief
duration. It is easily understood why these elements collapse more
quickly than any other, why their movement bears an outspoken, fantastic
stamp, and why the expression of their demands must necessarily be
extremely indefinite. It was this group that found least firm ground in
the then existing conditions.

At the bottom of all the classes, save the last one, was the huge
exploited mass of the nation, _the peasants_. It was the peasant who
carried the burden of all the other strata of society: princes,
officialdom, nobility, clergy, patricians and middle-class. Whether the
peasant was the subject of a prince, an imperial baron, a bishop, a
monastery or a city, he was everywhere treated as a beast of burden, and
worse. If he was a serf, he was entirely at the mercy of his master. If
he was a bondsman, the legal deliveries stipulated by agreement were
sufficient to crush him; even they were being daily increased. Most of
his time, he had to work on his master’s estate. Out of that which he
earned in his few free hours, he had to pay tithes, dues, ground rents,
war taxes, land taxes, imperial taxes, and other payments. He could
neither marry nor die without paying the master. Aside from his regular
work for the master, he had to gather litter, pick strawberries, pick
bilberries, collect snail-shells, drive the game for the hunting, chop
wood, and so on. Fishing and hunting belonged to the master. The peasant
saw his crop destroyed by wild game. The community meadows and woods of
the peasants had almost everywhere been forcibly taken away by the
masters. And in the same manner as the master reigned over the peasant’s
property, he extended his willfulness over his person, his wife and
daughters. He possessed the right of the first night. Whenever he
pleased, he threw the peasant into the tower, where the rack waited for
him just as surely as the investigating attorney waits for the criminal
in our times. Whenever he pleased, he killed him or ordered him
beheaded. None of the instructive chapters of the Carolina^([3]) which
speaks of “cutting of ears,” “cutting of noses,” “blinding,” “chopping
of fingers,” “beheading,” “breaking on the wheel,” “burning,” “pinching
with burning tongs,” “quartering,” etc., was left unpractised by the
gracious lord and master at his pleasure. Who could defend the peasant?
The courts were manned by barons, clergymen, patricians, or jurists, who
knew very well for what they were being paid. Not in vain did all the
official estates of the empire live on the exploitation of the peasants.

Incensed as were the peasants under terrific pressure, it was still
difficult to arouse them to revolt. Being spread over large areas, it
was highly difficult for them to come to common understanding; the old
habit of submission inherited from generation to generation, the lack of
practise in the use of arms in many regions, the unequal degree of
exploitation depending on the personality of the master, all combined to
keep the peasant quiet. It is for these reasons that, although local
insurrections of peasants can be found in mediaeval times in large
numbers, not one general national peasant revolt, least of all in
Germany, can be observed before the peasant war. Moreover, the peasants
alone could never make a revolution as long as they were confronted by
the organised power of the princes, nobility and the cities. Only by
allying themselves with other classes could they have a chance of
victory, but how could they have allied themselves with other classes
when they were equally exploited by all?

At the beginning of the Sixteenth Century the various groups of the
empire, princes, nobility, clergy, patricians, middle-class, plebeians
and peasants formed a highly complicated mass with the most varied
requirements crossing each other in different directions. Every group
was in the way of the other, and stood continually in an overt or covert
struggle with every other group. A splitting of the entire nation into
two major camps, as witnessed in France at the outbreak of the first
revolution, and as at present manifest on a higher stage of development
in the most progressive countries, was under such conditions a rank
impossibility. Something approaching such division took place only when
the lowest stratum of the population, the one exploited by all the rest,
arose, namely, the plebeians and the peasants. The tangle of interests,
views and endeavours of that time will be easily understood when one
remembers what a confusion was manifested in the last two years in a
society far less complicated and consisting only of feudal nobility,
bourgeoisie, petty-bourgeoisie, peasants and proletariat.



CHAPTER 2 THE MAIN OPPOSITION GROUPS AND THEIR PROGRAMMES; LUTHER AND MUENZER


The grouping of the numerous and variegated groups into bigger units was
at that time made impossible by decentralisation, by local and
provincial independence, by industrial and commercial isolation of the
provinces from each other, and by poor means of communication. This
grouping develops only with the general spread of revolutionary,
religious and political ideas, in the course of the Reformation. The
various groups of the population which either accept or oppose those
ideas, concentrate the nation, very slowly and only approximately
indeed, into three large camps, the reactionary or Catholic, the
reformist middle-class or Lutheran, and the revolutionary elements. If
we discover little logic even in this great division of the nation, if
the first two camps include partly the same elements, it is due to the
fact that most of the official groupings brought over from the Middle
Ages had begun to dissolve and to become decentralised, which
circumstance gave to the same groups in different localities a momentary
opposing orientation. In the last years we have so often met with
similar facts in Germany that we will not be surprised at this apparent
mixture of groups and classes under the much more complicated conditions
of the Sixteenth Century.

The German ideology of to-day sees in the struggles to which the Middle
Ages had succumbed nothing but violent theological bickerings, this
notwithstanding our modern experiences. Had the people of that time only
been able to reach an understanding concerning the celestial things, say
our patriotic historians and wise statesmen, there would have been no
ground whatever for struggle over earthly affairs. These ideologists
were gullible enough to accept on their face value all the illusions
which an epoch maintains about itself, or which the ideologists of a
certain period maintained about that period. This class of people, which
saw in the revolution of 1789 nothing but a heated debate over the
advantages of a constitutional monarchy as compared with absolutism,
would see in the July Revolution a practical controversy over the
untenability of the empire by the grace of God, and in the February
Revolution, an attempt at solving the problem of a republic or monarchy,
etc. Of the _class struggles_ which were being fought out in these
convulsions, and whose mere expression is being every time written as a
political slogan on the banner of these class struggles, our ideologists
have no conception even at the present time, although manifestations of
them are audible enough not only abroad, but also from the grumbling and
the resentment of many thousands of home proletarians.

In the so-called religious wars of the Sixteenth Century, very positive
material class-interests were at play, and those wars were class wars
just as were the later collisions in England and France. If the class
struggles of that time appear to bear religious earmarks, if the
interests, requirements and demands of the various classes hid
themselves behind a religious screen, it little changes the actual
situation, and is to be explained by conditions of the time.

The Middle Ages had developed out of raw primitiveness. It had done away
with old civilisation, old philosophy, politics and jurisprudence, in
order to begin anew in every respect. The only thing which it had
retained from the old shattered world was Christianity and a number of
half-ruined cities deprived of their civilisation. As a consequence, the
clergy retained a monopoly of intellectual education, a phenomenon to be
found in every primitive stage of development, and education itself had
acquired a predominantly theological nature.

In the hands of the clergy, politics and jurisprudence, as well as other
sciences, remained branches of theology, and were treated according to
the principles prevailing in the latter. The dogmas of the church were
at the same time political axioms, and Bible quotations had the validity
of law in every court. Even after the formation of a special class of
jurists, jurisprudence long remained under the tutelage of theology.
This supremacy of theology in the realm of intellectual activities was
at the same time a logical consequence of the situation of the church as
the most general force coordinating and sanctioning existing feudal
domination.

It is obvious that under such conditions, all general and overt attacks
on feudalism, in the first place attacks on the church, all
revolutionary, social and political doctrines, necessarily became
theological heresies. In order to be attacked, existing social
conditions had to be stripped of their aureole of sanctity.

The revolutionary opposition to feudalism was alive throughout all the
Middle Ages. According to conditions of the time, it appeared either in
the form of mysticism, as open heresy, or of armed insurrection. As
mysticism, it is well known how indispensable it was for the reformers
of the Sixteenth Century. Muenzer himself was largely indebted to it.
The heresies were partly an expression of the reaction of the
patriarchal Alpine shepherds against the encroachments of feudalism in
their realm (Waldenses^([4])), partly an opposition to feudalism of the
cities that had out-grown it (The Albigenses, Arnold of Brescia, etc.),
and partly direct insurrections of peasants (John Ball, the master from
Hungary in Picardy, etc.). We can omit, in this connection, the
patriarchal heresy of the Waldenses, as well as the insurrection of the
Swiss, which by form and contents, was a reactionary attempt at stemming
the tide of historic development, and of a purely local importance. In
the other two forms of mediaeval heresy, we find as early as the Twelfth
Century the precursors of the great division between the middle-class
and the peasant-plebeian opposition which caused the collapse of the
peasant war. This division is manifest throughout the later Middle Ages.

The heresy of the cities, which is the actual official heresy of the
Middle Ages, directed itself primarily against the clergy, whose riches
and political importance it attacked. In the very same manner as the
bourgeoisie at present demands a _“gouvernement à bon marché”_ (cheap
government), so the middle-class of mediaeval times demanded first of
all an _“église à bon marché”_ (cheap church). Reactionary in form, as
is every heresy which sees in the further development of church and
dogma, only a degeneration, the middle-class heresy demanded the
restoration of the ancient simple church constitution and the abolition
of an exclusive class of priests. This cheap arrangement would eliminate
the monks, the prelates, the Roman court, in brief, everything which was
expensive for the church. In their attack against papacy, the cities,
themselves republics although under the protection of monarchs,
expressed for the first time in a general form the idea that the normal
form of government for the bourgeoisie was the republic. Their hostility
towards many a dogma and church law is partly explained by the foregoing
and partly by their conditions. Why they were so bitter against
celibacy, no one has given a better explanation than Boccaccio. Arnold
of Brescia^([5]) in Italy and Germany, the Albigenses^([6]) in south
France, John Wycliffe^([7]) in England, Huss^([8]) and the
Calixtines^([9]) in Bohemia, were the chief representatives of this
opposition. That the opposition against feudalism should appear here
only as an opposition against religious feudalism, is easily understood
when one remembers that, at that time, the cities were already a
recognised estate sufficiently capable of fighting lay feudalism with
its privileges either by force of arms or in the city assemblies.

Here, as in south France, in England and Bohemia, we find the lower
nobility joining hands with the cities in their struggle against the
clergy and in their heresies, a phenomenon due to the dependence of the
lower nobility upon the cities and to the community of interests of both
groups as against the princes and the prelates. The same phenomenon is
found in the peasant war.

A totally different character was assumed by that heresy which was a
direct expression of the peasant and plebeian demands, and which was
almost always connected with an insurrection. This heresy, sharing all
the demands of middle-class heresy relative to the clergy, the papacy,
and the restoration of the ancient Christian church organisation, went
far beyond them. It demanded the restoration of ancient Christian
equality among the members of the community, this to be recognised as a
rule for the middle-class world as well. From the equality of the
children of God it made the implication as to civil equality, and partly
also as to equality of property. To make the nobility equal to the
peasant, the patricians and the privileged middle-class equal to the
plebeians, to abolish serfdom, ground rents, taxes, privileges, and at
least the most flagrant differences of property – these were demands put
forth with more or less definiteness and regarded as naturally emanating
from the ancient Christian doctrine. This peasant-plebeian heresy, in
the fullness of feudalism, e.g., among the Albigenses, hardly
distinguishable from the middle-class opposition, grew in the course of
the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries to be a strongly defined party
opinion appearing independently alongside the heresy of the
middle-class. This is the case with John Ball, preacher of the Wat Tyler
insurrection in England alongside the Wycliffe movement. This is also
the case with the Taborites alongside the Calixtines in Bohemia. The
Taborites showed even a republican tendency under theocratic colouring,
a view later developed by the representatives of the plebeians in
Germany in the Fifteenth and at the beginning of the Sixteenth Century.

This form of heresy was joined in by the dream visions of the mystic
sects, such as the Scourging Friars,^([10]) the Lollards,^([11]) etc.,
which in times of suppression continued the revolutionary tradition.

The plebeians of that time were the only class outside of the existing
official society. It was outside the feudal, as well as outside the
middle-class organisation. It had neither privileges nor property; it
was deprived even of the possessions owned by peasant or petty
bourgeois, burdened with crushing duties as much as they might be; it
was deprived of property and rights in every respect; it lived in such a
manner that it did not even come into direct contact with the existing
institutions, which ignored it completely. It was a living symptom of
the dissolution of the feudal and guild middle-class societies, and it
was at the same time the first precursor of modern bourgeois society.

This position of the plebeians is sufficient explanation as to why the
plebeian opposition of that time could not be satisfied with fighting
feudalism and the privileged middle-class alone; why, in fantasy, at
least, it reached beyond modern bourgeois society then only in its
inception; why, being an absolutely propertyless faction, it questioned
institutions, views and conceptions common to every society based on
division of classes. The chiliastic dream-visions^([12]) of ancient
Christianity offered in this respect a very serviceable starting-point.
On the other hand, this reaching out beyond not only the present but
also the future, could not help being violently fantastic. At the first
practical application, it naturally fell back into narrow limits set by
prevailing conditions. The attack on private property, the demand for
community of possession had to solve itself into a crude organisation of
charity; vague Christian equality could result in nothing but civic
equality before the law; abolition of all officialdom transformed itself
finally in the organisation of republican governments elected by the
people. Anticipation of communism by human fantasy was in reality
anticipation of modern bourgeois conditions.

This anticipation of coming stages of historic development, forced in
itself, but a natural outcome of the life conditions of the plebeian
group, is first to be noted in Germany, in the teachings of Thomas
Muenzer and his party. Already the Taborites showed a kind of chiliastic
community of property, but this was a purely military measure. Only in
the teachings of Muenzer did these communist notions find expression as
the desires of a vital section of society. Through him they were
formulated with a certain definiteness, and were afterwards found in
every great convulsion of the people, until gradually they merged with
the modern proletarian movement. Something similar we observe in the
Middle Ages, where the struggles of the free peasants against increasing
feudal domination merged with the struggles of the serfs and bondsmen
for the complete abolition of the feudal system.

While the first of the three large camps, the conservative Catholics,
embraced all the elements interested in maintaining the existing
imperial power, the ecclesiastical and a section of the lay princes, the
richer nobility, the prelates and the city patricians – the middle-class
moderate Lutheran reform gathered under its banner all the propertied
elements of the opposition, the mass of the lower nobility, the
middle-class and even a portion of the lay princes who hoped to enrich
themselves through the confiscation of the church estates and to seize
the opportunity for establishing greater independence from the empire.
As to the peasants and plebeians, they grouped themselves around the
revolutionary party whose demands and doctrines found their boldest
expression in Muenzer.

[Martin Luther]

Luther^([13]) and Muenzer, in their doctrines, in their characters, in
their actions, accurately embodied the tenets of their separate parties.

Between 1517 and 1525, Luther had gone through the same transformations
as the German constitutionalists between 1846 and 1849. This has been
the case with every middle-class party which, having marched for a while
at the head of the movement, has been overwhelmed by the
plebeian-proletarian party pressing from the rear.

When in 1517 opposition against the dogmas and the organisation of the
Catholic church was first raised by Luther, it still had no definite
character. Not exceeding the demands of the earlier middle-class heresy,
it did not exclude any trend of opinion which went further. It could not
do so because the first moment of the struggle demanded that all
opposing elements be united, the most aggressive revolutionary energy be
utilised and the totality of the existing heresies fighting the Catholic
orthodoxy be represented. In a similar fashion, our liberal bourgeoisie
of 1847 were still revolutionary. They called themselves socialists and
communists, and they discussed emancipation of the working class.
Luther’s sturdy peasant nature asserted itself in the stormiest fashion
in the first period of his activities. “If the raging madness [of the
Roman churchmen] were to continue, it seems to me no better counsel and
remedy could be found against it than that kings and princes apply
force, arm themselves, attack those evil people who have poisoned the
entire world, and once and for all make an end to this game, _with arms,
not with words_. If thieves are being punished with swords, murderers
with ropes, and heretics with fire, why do we not seize, with arms in
hand, all those evil teachers of perdition, those popes, bishops,
cardinals, and the entire crew of Roman Sodom? Why do we not wash our
hands in their blood?”

This revolutionary ardour did not last long. The lightning thrust by
Luther caused a conflagration. A movement started among the entire
German people. In his appeals against the clergy, in his preaching of
Christian freedom, peasants and plebeians perceived the signal for
insurrection. Likewise, the moderate middle-class and a large section of
the lower nobility joined him, and even princes were drawn into the
torrent. While the former believed the day had come in which to wreak
vengeance upon all their oppressors, the latter only wished to break the
power of the clergy, the dependence upon Rome, the Catholic hierarchy,
and to enrich themselves through the confiscation of church property.
The parties became separated from each other, and each found a different
spokesman. Luther had to choose between the two. Luther, the protégé of
the Elector of Saxony, the respected professor of Wittenberg who had
become powerful and famous overnight, the great man who was surrounded
by a coterie of servile creatures and flatterers, did not hesitate a
moment. He dropped the popular elements of the movement, and joined the
train of the middle-class, the nobility and the princes. Appeals to war
of extermination against Rome were heard no more. Luther was now
preaching _peaceful progress_ and passive resistance. (Cf. _To the
nobility of the German nation,_ 1520, etc.) Invited by Hutten to visit
him and Sickingen in the castle of Ebern, the centre of the noble
conspiracy against clergy and princes, Luther replied: _“I should not
like to see the Gospel defended by force and bloodshed._ The world was
conquered by the Word, the Church has maintained itself by the Word, the
Church will come into its own again through the Word, and as Antichrist
gained ascendancy without violence, so without violence he will fall.”

Out of this turn of mind, or, to be more exact, out of this definite
delineation of Luther’s policy, sprang that policy of bartering and
haggling over institutions and dogmas to be retained or reformed, that
ugly diplomatising, conceding, intriguing and compromising, the result
of which was the Augsburg Confession, the final draft of the
constitution of the reformed middle-class church. It was the same petty
trading which, in the political field, repeated itself _ad nauseam_ in
the recent German national assemblies, unity gatherings, chambers of
revision, and in the parliaments of Erfurt. The Philistine middle-class
character of the official reformation appeared in these negotiations
most clearly.

There were valid reasons why Luther, now the recognised representative
of middle-class reform, chose to preach lawful progress. The mass of the
cities had joined the cause of moderate reform; the lower nobility
became more and more devoted to it; one section of the princes joined
it, another vacillated. Success was almost certain at least in a large
portion of Germany. Under continued peaceful development the other
regions could not in the long run withstand the pressure of moderate
opposition. Violent convulsions, on the other hand, were bound to result
in a conflict between the moderates and the extreme plebeian and peasant
party, thus to alienate the princes, the nobility, and a number of
cities from the movement and to leave open the alternative of either the
middle-class party being overshadowed by the peasants and plebeians, or
the entire movement being crushed by Catholic restoration. How
middle-class parties, having achieved the slightest victory, attempt to
steer their way between the Scylla of revolution and the Charybdis of
restoration by means of lawful progress, we have had occasions enough to
observe in the events of recent times.

It was in the nature of the then prevailing social and political
conditions that the results of every change were advantageous to the
princes, increasing their power. Thus it came about that the
middle-class reform, having parted ways with the plebeian and peasant
elements, fell more and more under the control of the reform princes.
Luther’s subservience to them increased, and the people knew very well
what they were doing when they accused him of having become a slave of
the princes as were all the others, and when they pursued him with
stones in Orlamuende.

When the peasant war broke out, becoming more predominant in regions
with Catholic nobility and princes, Luther strove to maintain a
conciliatory position. He resolutely attacked the governments. He said
it was due to their oppression that the revolts had started, that not
the peasants alone were against them, but God as well. On the other
hand, he also said that the revolt was ungodly and against the Gospel.
He advised both parties to yield, to reach a peaceful understanding.

Notwithstanding these sincere attempts at conciliation, however, the
revolt spread rapidly over large areas, including such sections as were
dominated by Protestant Lutheran princes, nobles and cities, and rapidly
outgrew the middle-class “circumspect” reform. The most determined
faction of the insurgents under Muenzer opened their headquarters in
Luther’s very proximity, in Thuringia. A few more successes, and Germany
would have been one big conflagration, Luther would have been
surrounded, perhaps piked as a traitor, and middle-class reform would
have been swept away by the tides of a peasant-plebeian revolution.
There was no more time for circumspection. In the face of the
revolution, all old animosities were forgotten. Compared with the hordes
of peasants, the servants of the Roman Sodom were innocent lambs,
sweet-tempered children of God. Burgher and prince, noble and clergyman,
Luther and the pope united “against the murderous and plundering hordes
of the peasants.” “They should be knocked to pieces, strangled and
stabbed, secretly and openly, by everybody who can do it, just as one
must kill a mad dog!” Luther cried. “Therefore, dear gentlemen, hearken
here, save there, stab, knock, strangle them at will, and if thou diest,
thou art blessed; no better death canst thou ever attain.” No false
mercy was to be practised in relation to the peasants. “Whoever hath
pity on those whom God pities not, whom He wishes punished and
destroyed, shall be classed among the rebellious himself.” Later, he
said, the peasants would learn to thank God when they had to give away
one cow in order that they might enjoy the other in peace. Through the
revolution, he said, the princes would learn the spirit of the mob which
could reign by force only. “The wise man says: _‘Cibus, onus et virgam
asino.’_ The heads of the peasants are full of chaff. They do not
hearken to the Word, and they are senseless, so they must hearken to the
virga and the gun, and this is only just. We must pray for them that
they obey. Where they do not, there should not be much mercy. Let the
guns roar among them, or else they will make it a thousand times worse.”

It is the same language that was used by our late socialist and
philanthropic bourgeoisie, when, after the March days the proletariat
also demanded its share in the fruits of victory.

Luther had given the plebeian movement a powerful weapon – a translation
of the Bible. Through the Bible, he contrasted feudal Christianity of
his time with moderate Christianity of the first century. In opposition
to decaying feudal society, he held up the picture of another society
which knew nothing of the ramified and artificial feudal hierarchy. The
peasants had made extensive use of this weapon against the forces of the
princes, the nobility, and the clergy. Now Luther turned the same weapon
against the peasants, extracting from the Bible a veritable hymn to the
authorities ordained by God – a feat hardly exceeded by any lackey of
absolute monarchy. Princedom by the grace of God, passive resistance,
even serfdom, were being sanctioned by the Bible. Thus Luther repudiated
not only the peasant insurrection but even his own revolt against
religious and lay authority. He not only betrayed the popular movement
to the princes, but the middle-class movement as well.

Need we mention other bourgeois who recently gave us examples of
repudiating their own past?

[Thomas Muenzer]

Let us now compare the plebeian revolutionary, Muenzer, with the
middle-class reformist, Luther.

Thomas Muenzer was born in Stolberg, in the Harz, in 1498. It is said
that his father died on the scaffold, a victim of the wilfulness of the
Count of Stolberg. In his fifteenth year, Muenzer organised at the Halle
school a secret union against the Archbishop of Magdeburg and the Roman
Church in general. His scholarly attainments in the theology of his time
brought him early the doctor’s degree and the position of chaplain in a
Halle nunnery. Here he began to treat the dogmas and rites of the church
with the greatest contempt. At mass he omitted the words of the
transubstantiation, and ate, as Luther said, the almighty gods
unconsecrated. Mediaeval mystics, especially the chiliastic works of
Joachim of Calabria,^([14]) were the main subject of his studies. It
seemed to Muenzer that the millennium and the Day of Judgment over the
degenerated church and the corrupted world, as announced and pictured by
that mystic, had come in the form of the Reformation and the general
restlessness of his time. He preached in his neighbourhood with great
success. In 1520 he went to Zwickau as the first evangelist preacher.
There he found one of those dreamy chiliastic sects which continued
their existence in many localities, hiding behind an appearance of
humility and detachment, the rankly growing opposition of the lower
strata of society against existing conditions, and with the growth of
agitation, beginning to press to the foreground more boldly and with
more endurance. It was the sect of the Anabaptists headed by Nicolas
Storch.^([15]) The Anabaptists preached the approach of the Day of
Judgment and of the millennium; they had “visions, convulsions, and the
spirit of prophecy.” They soon came into conflict with the council of
Zwickau. Muenzer defended them, though he had never joined them
unconditionally, and had rather brought them under his own influence.
The council took decisive steps against them, they were compelled to
leave the city, and Muenzer departed with them. This was at the end of
1521.

He then went to Prague and, in order to gain ground, attempted to join
the remnants of the Hussite movement. His proclamations, however, made
it necessary for him to flee Bohemia also. In 1522, he became preacher
at Allstedt in Thuringia. Here he started with reforming the cult.
Before even Luther dared to go so far, he entirely abolished the Latin
language, and ordered the entire Bible, not only the prescribed Sunday
Gospels and epistles, to be read to the people. At the same time, he
organised propaganda in his locality. People flocked to him from all
directions, and soon Allstedt became the centre of the popular
anti-priest movement of entire Thuringia.

Muenzer at that time was still theologian before everything else. He
directed his attacks almost exclusively against the priests. He did not,
however, preach quiet debate and peaceful progress, as Luther had begun
to do at that time, but he continued the early violent preachments of
Luther, appealing to the princes of Saxony and the people to rise in
arms against the Roman priests. “Is it not Christ who said: ‘I have come
to bring, not peace, but the sword’? What can you [the princes of
Saxony] do with that sword? You can do only one thing: If you wish to be
the servants of God, you must drive out and destroy the evil ones who
stand in the way of the Gospel. Christ ordered very earnestly (Luke, 19,
27): ‘But these mine enemies, that would not that I should reign over
them, bring hither, and slay them before me.’ Do not resort to empty
assertions that the power of God could do it without aid of our sword,
since then it would have to rust in its sheath. We must destroy those
who stand in the way of God’s revelation, we must do it mercilessly, as
Hezekiah, Cyrus, Josiah, Daniel and Elias destroyed the priests of Baal,
else the Christian Church will never come back to its origins. We must
uproot the weeds in God’s vineyard at the time when the crops are ripe.
God said in the Fifth Book of Moses, 7, ‘Thou shalt not show mercy unto
the idolators, but ye shall break down their altars, dash in pieces
their graven images and burn them with fire that I shall not be wroth at
you.’” But these appeals to the princes were of no avail, whereas the
revolutionary agitation among the people grew day by day. Muenzer, whose
ideas became more definitely shaped and more courageous, now definitely
relinquished the middle-class reformation, and at the same time appeared
as a direct political agitator.

His theologic-philosophic doctrine attacked all the main points not only
of Catholicism but of Christianity as such. Under the cloak of Christian
forms, he preached a kind of pantheism, which curiously resembles the
modern speculative mode of contemplation, and at times even taught open
atheism. He repudiated the assertion that the Bible was the only
infallible revelation. The only living revelation, he said, was reason,
a revelation which existed among all peoples at all times. To contrast
the Bible with reason, he maintained, was to kill the spirit by the
latter, for the Holy Spirit of which the Bible spoke was not a thing
outside of us; the Holy Spirit was our reason. Faith, he said, was
nothing else but reason become alive in man, therefore, he said, pagans
could also have faith. Through this faith, through reason come to life,
man became godlike and blessed, he said. Heaven was to be sought in this
life, not beyond, and it was, according to Muenzer, the task of the
believers to establish Heaven, the kingdom of God, here on earth. As
there is no Heaven in the beyond, so there is no Hell in the beyond, and
no damnation, and there are no devils but the evil desires and cravings
of man. Christ, he said, was a man, as we are, a prophet and a teacher,
and his “Lord’s Supper” is nothing but a plain meal of commemoration
wherein bread and wine are being consumed with mystic additions.

Muenzer preached these doctrines mostly in a covert fashion, under the
cloak of Christian phraseology which the new philosophy was compelled to
utilise for some time. The fundamental heretic idea, however, is easily
discernible in all his writings, and it is obvious that the biblical
cloak was for him of much less importance than it was for many a
disciple of Hegel in modern times. Still, there is a distance of three
hundred years between Muenzer and modern philosophy.

Muenzer’s political doctrine followed his revolutionary religious
conceptions very closely, and as his theology reached far beyond the
current conceptions of his time, so his political doctrine went beyond
existing social and political conditions. As Muenzer’s philosophy of
religion touched upon atheism, so his political programme touched upon
communism, and there is more than one communist sect of modern times
which, on the eve of the February Revolution, did not possess a
theoretical equipment as rich as that of Muenzer of the Sixteenth
Century. His programme, less a compilation of the demands of the then
existing plebeians than a genius’s anticipation of the conditions for
the emancipation of the proletarian element that had just begun to
develop among the plebeians, demanded the immediate establishment of the
kingdom of God, of the prophesied millennium on earth. This was to be
accomplished by the return of the church to its origins and the
abolition of all institutions that were in conflict with what Muenzer
conceived as original Christianity, which, in fact, was the idea of a
very modern church. By the kingdom of God, Muenzer understood nothing
else than a state of society without class differences, without private
property, and without superimposed state powers opposed to the members
of society. All existing authorities, as far as they did not submit and
join the revolution, he taught, must be overthrown, all work and all
property must be shared in common, and complete equality must be
introduced. In his conception, a union of the people was to be organised
to realise this programme, not only throughout Germany, but throughout
entire Christendom. Princes and nobles were to be invited to join, and
should they refuse, the union was to overthrow or kill them, with arms
in hand, at the first opportunity.

Muenzer immediately set to work to organise the union. His preachings
assumed a still more militant character. He attacked, not only the
clergy, but with equal passion the princes, the nobility and the
patricians. He pictured in burning colours the existing oppression, and
contrasted it with the vision of the millennium of social republican
equality which he created out of his imagination. He published one
revolutionary pamphlet after another, sending emissaries in all
directions, while he personally organised the union in Allstedt and its
vicinity.

The first fruit of this propaganda was the destruction St. Mary’s Chapel
in Mellerbach near Allstedt, according to the command of the Bible
(Deut. 7, 5): “Ye shall break down their altars, and dash in pieces
their pillars, and hew down their Asherim, and burn their graven images
with fire.” The princes of Saxony came in person to Allstedt quell the
upheaval, and they called Muenzer to the castle. There he delivered a
sermon, which they had never heard from Luther, “that easy living flesh
of Wittenberg,” Muenzer called him. He insisted that the ungodly rulers,
especially the priests and monks who treated the Gospel as heresy, must
be killed; for confirmation he referred to the New Testament. The
ungodly have no right to live, he said, save by the mercy of the chosen
ones. If the princes would not exterminate the ungodly, he asserted, God
would take their sword from them because the right to wield the sword
belongs to the community. The source of the evil of usury, thievery and
robbery, he said, were the princes and the masters who had taken all
creatures into their private possession – the fishes in the water, the
birds in the air, the plants in the soil. And the usurpers, he said,
still preached to the poor the commandment, “Thou shalt not steal,”
while they grabbed everything, and robbed and crushed the peasant and
the artisan. “When, however, one of the latter commits the slightest
transgression,” he said, “he has to hang, and Dr. Liar says to all this:
Amen.” The masters themselves created a situation, he argued, in which
the poor man was forced to become their enemy. If they did not remove
the causes of the upheaval, how could things improve in times to come?
he asked. “Oh, my dear gentlemen, how the Lord will smite with an iron
rod all these old pots! When I say so, I am considered rebellious. So be
it!” (Cf. Zimmermann’s _Peasant War,_ II, p. 75.)

Muenzer had the sermon printed. His Allstedt printer was punished by
Duke Johann of Saxony with banishment. His own writings were to be
henceforth subjected to the censorship of the ducal government in
Weimar. But he paid no heed to this order. He immediately published a
very inciting paper in the imperial city of Muehlhausen, wherein he
admonished the people “to widen the hole so that all the world may see
and comprehend who our fools are who have blasphemously turned our Lord
into a painted mannikin.” He concluded with the following words: “All
the world must suffer a big jolt. The game will be such that the ungodly
will be thrown off their seats and the downtrodden will rise.” As a
motto, Thomas Muenzer, “the man with the hammer,” wrote the following on
the title page: “Beware, I have put my words into thy mouth; I have
lifted thee above the people and above the empires that thou mayest
uproot, destroy, scatter and overthrow, and that thou mayest build and
plant. A wall of iron against the kings, princes, priests, and for the
people hath been erected. Let them fight, for victory is wondrous, and
the strong and godless tyrants will perish.”

The breach between Muenzer and Luther with his party had taken place
long before that. Luther himself was compelled to accept some church
reforms which were introduced by Muenzer without consulting him. Luther
watched Muenzer’s activities with the nettled distrust of a moderate
reformer towards an energetic far-aiming radical. Already in the spring
of 1524, in a letter to Melanchthon, that model of a hectic stay-at-home
Philistine, Muenzer wrote that he and Luther did not understand the
movement at all. They were seeking, he said, to choke it by adherence to
the letter of the Bible, and their doctrine was worm-eaten. “Dear
brethren,” he wrote, “stop your delaying and hesitating. The time has
come, the summer is knocking at our doors. Do not keep friendship with
the ungodly who prevent the Word from exercising its full force. Do not
flatter your princes in order that you may not perish with them. Ye
tender, bookish scholars, do not be wroth, for I cannot do otherwise.”

Luther had more than once invited Muenzer to an open debate. The latter,
however, being always ready to accept battle in the presence of the
people, did not have the slightest desire to plunge into a theological
squabble before the partisan public of the Wittenberg University. He had
no desire “to bring the testimony of the spirit before the high school
of learning exclusively.” If Luther was sincere, he wrote, let him use
his influence to stop the chicaneries against his, Muenzer’s, printers,
and to lift the censorship in order that their controversy might be
freely fought out in the press.

When the above-mentioned revolutionary brochure appeared, Luther openly
denounced Muenzer. In his “Letter to the Princes of Saxony Against the
Rebellious Spirit,” he declared Muenzer to be an instrument of Satan,
and demanded of the princes to intervene, and drive the instigators of
the upheaval out of the country, since, he said, they did not confine
themselves to preaching their evil doctrine, but incited to
insurrection, to violent lawless action against the authorities.

On August 1st, Muenzer was compelled to appear before the princes in the
castle of Weimar, to defend himself against the accusation of incendiary
machinations. There were highly compromising facts quoted against him;
his secret union had been traced; his hand was discovered in the
organisation of the pitmen and the peasants. He was being threatened
with banishment. Upon returning to Allstedt, he learned Duke Georg of
Saxony demanded his extradition. Union letters in his handwriting had
been intercepted, wherein he called Georg’s subjects to armed resistance
against the enemies of the Gospel. The council would have extradited him
had he not left the city.

In the meantime, the rising agitation among the peasants and the
plebeians had enormously lightened Muenzer’s task of propaganda. In the
person of the Anabaptists he found invaluable agents. This sect, having
no definite dogmas, held together by common opposition against all
ruling classes and by the common symbol of second baptism, ascetic in
their mode of living, untiring, fanatic and intrepid in propaganda, had
grouped itself more closely around Muenzer. Made homeless by constant
persecutions, its members wandered over the length and breadth of
Germany, announcing everywhere the new gospel wherein Muenzer had made
clear to them their own demands and wishes. Numberless Anabaptists were
put on the rack, burned or otherwise executed. But the courage and
endurance of these emissaries were unshaken, and the success of their
activities amidst the rapidly rising agitation of the people was
enormous. That was one of the reasons why, on his flight from Thuringia,
Muenzer found the ground prepared wherever he turned.

In Nuernberg, a peasant revolt had been nipped in the bud a month
previous. Here Muenzer conducted his propaganda under cover. Soon there
appeared persons who defended his most audacious theological doctrines
of the non-obligatory power of the Bible and the meaninglessness of
sacraments, declaring Christ to have been a mere man, and the power of
lay authorities to be ungodly. “We see there Satan stalking, the spirit
of Allstedt!” Luther exclaimed. In Nuernberg, Muenzer printed his reply
to Luther. He accused him of flattering the princes and supporting the
reactionary party by his moderate position. “The people will free
themselves in spite of everything,” he wrote, “and then the fate of Dr.
Luther will be that of a captive fox.” The city council ordered the
paper confiscated, and Muenzer was compelled to leave the city. From
there he went through Suabia to Alsace, then to Switzerland, and then
back to the Upper Black Forest where the insurrection had started
several months before, precipitated largely by the Anabaptist
emissaries. There is no doubt that this propaganda trip of Muenzer’s
added much to the organisation of the people’s party, to a clear
formulation of its demands and to the final general outbreak of the
insurrection in April, 1525. It was through this trip that the dual
nature of Muenzer’s activities became more and more pronounced – on the
one hand, his propaganda among the people whom he approached in the only
language then comprehensible to the masses, that of religious prophecy;
on the other hand, his contact with the initiated, to whom he could
disclose his ultimate aims. Even previous to this journey he had grouped
around himself in Thuringia a circle of the most determined persons, not
only from among the people, but also from among the lower clergy, a
circle whom he had put at the head of the secret organisation. Now he
became the centre of the entire revolutionary movement of southwest
Germany, organising connections between Saxony and Thuringia through
Franconia and Suabia up to Alsace and the Swiss frontier and counting
among his disciples and the heads of the organisation such men as
Hubmaier of Waldshut, Conrad Grebel of Zurich, Franz Rabmann of
Griessen, Schappelar of Memmingen, Jakob Wehe of Leipheim, and Dr.
Mantel in Stuttgart, the most revolutionary of priests. He kept himself
mostly in Griessen on the Schaffhausen frontier, undertaking journeys
through the Hegau, Klettgau, etc. The bloody persecutions undertaken by
the alarmed princes and masters everywhere against this new plebeian
heresy, aided not a little in fanning the rebellious spirit and closing
the ranks of the organisation. In this way, Muenzer passed five months
in upper Germany. When the outbreak of the general movement was at hand,
he returned to Thuringia, where he wished to lead the movement
personally. There we will find him later.

We shall see how truly the character and the behaviour of the two party
heads reflected the position of their respective parties. Luther’s
indecision, his fear of the movement, assumed serious proportions; his
cowardly servility towards the princes corresponded closely to the
hesitating, vacillating policy of the middle-classes. The revolutionary
energy and decisiveness of Muenzer, on the other hand, was seen in the
most advanced faction of the plebeians and peasants. The difference was
that while Luther confined himself to an expression of the ideas and
wishes of a majority of his class and thereby acquired among it a very
cheap popularity, Muenzer, on the contrary, went far beyond the
immediate ideas and demands of the plebeians and peasants, organising
out of the then existing revolutionary elements a party, which, as far
as it stood on the level of his ideas and shared his energy, still
represented only a small minority of the insurgent masses.



CHAPTER 3 PRECURSORS: PEASANT UPRISINGS, 1475–1517


About fifty years after the suppression of the Hussite movement, the
first symptoms of a budding revolutionary spirit became manifest among
the German peasants.

The first peasant conspiracy came into being in 1476, in the bishopric
of Wuerzburg, a country already impoverished “by bad government,
manifold taxes, payments, feuds, enmity, war, fires, murders, prison,
and the like,” and continually plundered by bishops, clergy and nobility
in a shameless manner. A young shepherd and musician, Hans Boeheim of
Niklashausen, also called the “Drum-Beater” and “Hans the Piper,”
suddenly appeared in Taubergrund in the role of a prophet. He related
that the Virgin had appeared to him in a vision, that she told him to
burn his drum, to cease serving the dance and the sinful gratification
of the senses, and to exhort the people to do penance. Therefore, he
said, everybody should purge himself of sin and the vain lusts of the
world, forsake all adornments and embellishments, and make a pilgrimage
to the Madonna of Niklashausen to attain forgiveness.

Already among these precursors of the movement we notice an asceticism
which is to be found in all mediaeval uprisings that were tinged with
religion, and also in modern times at the beginning of every proletarian
movement. This austerity of behaviour, this insistence on relinquishing
all enjoyment of life, contrasts the ruling classes with the principle
of Spartan equality. Nevertheless, it is a necessary transitional stage,
without which the lowest strata of society could never start a movement.
In order to develop revolutionary energy, in order to become conscious
of their own hostile position towards all other elements of society, in
order to concentrate as a class, the lower strata of society must begin
with stripping themselves of everything that could reconcile them to the
existing system of society. They must renounce all pleasures which would
make their subdued position in the least tolerable and of which even the
severest pressure could not deprive them.

This plebeian and proletarian asceticism differs widely, both by its
wild fanatic form and by its contents, from the middle-class asceticism
as preached by the middle-class Lutheran morality and by the English
Puritans (to be distinguished from the independent and farther-reaching
sects) whose whole secret is middle-class thrift. It is quite obvious
that this plebeian-proletarian asceticism loses its revolutionary
character when the development of modern productive forces increases the
number of commodities, thus rendering Spartan equality superfluous, and
on the other hand, the very position of the proletariat in society, and
thereby the proletariat itself becomes more and more revolutionary.
Gradually, this asceticism disappears from among the masses. Among the
sects with which it survives, it degenerates either into bourgeois
parsimony or into high-sounding virtuousness which, in the end, is
nothing more than Philistine or guild-artisan niggardliness. Besides,
renunciation of pleasures need not be preached to the proletariat for
the simple reason that it has almost nothing to renounce.

Hans the Piper’s call to penitence found a great response. All the
prophets of rebellion started with appeals against sin, because, in
fact, only a violent exertion, a sudden renunciation of all habitual
forms of existence could bring into unified motion a disunited, widely
scattered generation of peasants grown up in blind submission. A
pilgrimage to Niklashausen began and rapidly increased, and the greater
the masses of people that joined the procession, the more openly did the
young rebel divulge his plans. The Madonna of Niklashausen, he said, had
announced to him that henceforth there should be neither king nor
princes, neither pope nor other ecclesiastic or lay authority. Every one
should be a brother to each other, and win his bread by the toil of his
hands, possessing no more than his neighbour. All taxes, ground rents,
serf duties, tolls and other payments and deliveries should be abolished
forever. Forests, waters and meadows should be free everywhere.

The people received this new gospel with joy. The fame of the prophet,
“the message of our Mother,” spread everywhere, even in distant
quarters. Hordes of pilgrims came from the Odenwald, from Main, from
Kocher and Jaxt, even from Bavaria and Suabia, and from the Rhine.
Miracles supposed to have been performed by the Piper were being
related; people fell on their knees before the prophet, praying to him
as to a saint; people fought for small strips from his cap as for relics
or amulets. In vain did the priests fight him, denouncing his visions as
the devil’s delusions and his miracles as hellish swindles. But the mass
of believers increased enormously. The revolutionary sect began to
organise. The Sunday sermons of the rebellious shepherd attracted
gatherings of 40,000 and more to Niklashausen.

For several months Hans the Piper preached before the masses. He did not
intend, however, to confine himself to preaching. He was in secret
communication with the priest of Niklashausen and with two knights, Kunz
of Thunfeld and his son, who accepted the new gospel and were singled
out as the military leaders of the planned insurrection. Finally, on the
Sunday preceding the day of St. Kilian, when the shepherd believed his
power to be strong enough, he gave the signal. He closed his sermon with
the following words: “And now go home, and weigh in your mind what our
Holiest Madonna has announced to you, and on the coming Saturday leave
your wives and children and old men at home, but you, you men, come back
here to Niklashausen on the day of St. Margaret, which is next Saturday,
and bring with you your brothers and friends, as many as they may be. Do
not come with pilgrims’ staves, but covered with weapons and ammunition,
in one hand a candle, in the other a sword and a pike or halberd, and
the Holy Virgin will then announce to you what she wishes you to do.”
But before the peasants came in masses, the horsemen of the bishop
seized the prophet of rebellion at night, and brought him to the Castle
of Wuerzburg. On the appointed day, 34,000 armed peasants appeared, but
the news had a discouraging effect on the mass; the majority went home,
the more initiated retained about 16,000 with whom they moved to the
castle under the leadership of Kunz of Thunfeld and his son Michael. The
bishop, by means of promises, persuaded them to go home, but as soon as
they began to disperse, they were attacked by the bishop’s horsemen, and
many were imprisoned. Two were decapitated, and Hans the Piper was
burned. Kunz of Thunfeld fled, and was allowed to return only at the
price of ceding all his estates to the monastery. Pilgrimages to
Niklashausen continued for some time, but were finally suppressed.

After this first attempt, Germany remained quiet for some time; but at
the end of the century rebellions and conspiracies of the peasants
started anew.

We shall pass over the Dutch peasant revolt of 1491 and 1492 which was
suppressed by Duke Albrecht of Saxony in the battle near Heemskerk; also
the revolt of the peasants of the Abbey of Kempten in Upper Suabia which
occurred simultaneously, and the Frisian revolt under Shaard Ahlva,
about 1497, which was also suppressed by Albrecht of Saxony. These
revolts were mostly too far from the scene of the actual Peasant War. In
part they were struggles of hitherto free peasants against the attempt
to force feudalism upon them. We now pass to the two great conspiracies
which prepared the Peasant War: the _Union Shoe_ and the _Poor Konrad._

The rise in the price of commodities which had called forth the revolt
of the peasants in the Netherlands, brought about, in 1493, in Alsace, a
secret union of peasants and plebeians with a sprinkling of the purely
middle-class opposition party; and a certain amount of sympathy even
among the lower nobility. The seat of the union was the region of
Schlettstadt, Sulz, Dambach, Rossheim, Scherweiler, etc. The
conspirators demanded the plundering and extermination of the Jews,
whose usury then, as now, sucked the blood of the peasants of Alsace,
the introduction of a jubilee year to cancel all debts, the abolition of
taxes, tolls and other burdens, the abolition of the ecclesiastical and
Rottweil (imperial) court, the right to ratify taxation, the reduction
of the priests’ incomes to a prebend of between fifty and sixty
guilders, the abolition of the auricular confession, and the
establishment in the communities of courts elected by the communities
themselves. The conspirators planned, as soon as they became strong
enough, to overpower the stronghold of Schlettstadt, to confiscate the
treasuries of the monasteries and the city, and from there to arouse the
whole of Alsace. The banner of the union to be unfurled at the moment of
insurrection, contained a peasant’s shoe with long leather strings, the
so-called Union Shoe, which gave a symbol and a name to the peasant
conspiracies of the following twenty years.

The conspirators held their meetings at night on the lonesome
Hungerberg. Membership in the Union was connected with the most
mysterious ceremonies and threats of severest punishment against
traitors. Nevertheless, the movement became known about Easter Week of
1493, the time appointed for the attack on Schlettstadt. The authorities
immediately intervened. Many of the conspirators were arrested and put
on the rack, to be quartered or decapitated. Many were crippled by
chopping their hands and fingers, and driven out of the country. A large
number fled to Switzerland. The Union Shoe, however, was far from being
annihilated and continued its existence in secret. Numerous exiles,
spread over Switzerland and South Germany, became its emissaries.
Finding everywhere the same oppression and the same inclination towards
revolt, they spread the Union Shoe over the territory of present-day
Baden. The greatest admiration is due the tenacity and endurance with
which the peasants of upper Germany conspired for thirty years after
1493, with which they overcame the obstacles to a more centralised
organisation in spite of the fact that they were scattered over the
countryside, and with which, after numberless dispersions, defeats,
executions of leaders, they renewed their conspiracies over and over
again, until an opportunity came for a mass upheaval.

In 1502, the bishopric of Speyer, which at that time embraced also the
locality of Bruchsal, showed signs of a secret movement among the
peasants. The Union Shoe had here reorganised itself with considerable
success. About 7,000 men belonged to the organisation whose centre was
Untergrombach, between Bruchsal and Weingarten, and whose ramifications
reached down the Rhine to the Main, and up to the Margraviate of Baden.
Its articles provided: No ground rent, tithe, tax or toll to be paid to
the princes, the nobility or the clergy; serfdom to be abolished;
monasteries and other church estates to be confiscated and divided among
the people, and no other authority to be recognised aside from the
emperor.

We find here for the first time expressed among the peasants the two
demands of secularising the church estates in favour of the people and
of a unified and undivided German monarchy – demands which henceforth
will be found regularly in the more advanced faction of the peasants and
plebeians.

In Thomas Muenzer’s programme, the division of the church estates was
transformed into confiscation in favour of common property, and the
unified German _empire_, into the unified and undivided _republic_.

The renewed Union Shoe had, as well as the old, its own secret meeting
places, its oath of silence, its initiation ceremonies, and its union
banner with the legend, “Nothing but God’s justice.” The plan of action
was similar to that of the Alsatian Union. Bruchsal, where the majority
of the population belonged to the Union, was to be overpowered. A Union
army was to be organised and dispatched into the surrounding
principalities as moving points of concentration.

The plan was betrayed by a clergyman to whom one of the conspirators
revealed it in the confessional. The governments immediately resorted to
counter action. How widespread the Union had become, is apparent from
the terror which seized the various imperial estates in Alsace and in
the Union of Suabia. Troops were concentrated, and mass arrests were
made. Emperor Maximilian, “the last of the knights,” issued the most
bloodthirsty, punitive decree against the undertaking of the peasants.
Hordes of peasants assembled here and there, and armed resistance was
offered, but the isolated peasant troops could not hold ground for a
long time. Some of the conspirators were executed and many fled, but the
secrecy was so well preserved that the majority, and also the leaders,
could remain unmolested in their own localities or in the countries of
the neighbouring masters.

After this new defeat, there followed a prolonged period of apparent
quiet in the class struggles. The work, however, was continued in an
underground way. Already, in the first years of the Sixteenth Century,
_Poor Konrad_ was formed in Suabia, apparently in connection with the
scattered members of the Union Shoe. In the Black Forest, the Union Shoe
continued in isolated circles until, ten years later, an energetic
peasant leader succeeded in uniting the various threads and combining
them into a great conspiracy. Both conspiracies became public, one
shortly after the other, in the restless years from 1513 to 1515, in
which the Swiss, Hungarian and Slovenian peasants made a series of
significant insurrections.

The man who restored the Upper Rhenish Union Shoe was Joss Fritz of
Untergrombach, a fugitive from the conspiracy of 1502, a former soldier,
in all respects an outstanding figure. After his flight, he had kept
himself in various localities between the Lake Constance and the Black
Forest, and finally settled as a vassal near Freiburg in Breisgau, where
he even became a forester. Interesting details as to the manner in which
he reorganised the Union from this point of vantage and as to the skill
with which he managed to attract people of different character, are
contained in the investigations. It was due to the diplomatic talent and
the untiring endurance of this model conspirator that a considerable
number of people of the most divergent classes became involved in the
Union: knights, priests, burghers, plebeians and peasants, and it is
almost certain that he organised several grades of the conspiracy, one
more or less sharply divided from the other. All serviceable elements
were utilised with the greatest circumspection and skill. Outside of the
initiated emissaries who wandered over the country in various disguises,
the vagrants and beggars were used for subordinate missions. Joss stood
in direct communication with the beggar kings, and through them he held
in his hand the numerous vagabond population. In fact, the beggar kings
played a considerable role in his conspiracy. Very original figures they
were, these beggar kings. One roamed the country with a girl using her
seemingly wounded feet as a pretext for begging; he wore more than eight
insignia on his hat – the fourteen deliverers, St. Ottilie, Our Mother
in Heaven, etc.; besides, he wore a long red beard, and carried a big
knotty stick with a dagger and pike. Another, begging in the name of St.
Velten, offered spices and worm-seeds; he wore a long iron-coloured
coat, a red barret, with the Baby of Trient attached thereto, a sword at
his side, and many knives and a dagger on his girdle. Others had
artificial open wounds, besides similar picturesque attire. There were
at least ten of them, and for the price of two thousand guilders they
were supposed to set fire simultaneously in Alsace, in the Margraviate
of Baden, and in Breisgau, and to put themselves, with at least 2,000
men of their own, under the command of Georg Schneider, the former
Captain of the Lansquenets, on the day of the Zabern Parish Fair in
Rozen, in order to conquer the city. A courier service from station to
station was established between real members of the union. Joss Fritz
and his chief emissary, Stoffel of Freiburg, continually riding from
place to place, reviewed the armies of the neophytes at night. There is
ample material in the documents of the court investigations relative to
the spread of the Union in the Upper Rhine and Black Forest regions. The
documents contain many names of members from the various localities in
that region, together with descriptions of persons. Most of those
mentioned were journeymen, peasants and innkeepers, a few nobles,
priests (like that of Lehen himself), and unemployed Lansquenets. This
composition shows the more developed character that the Union Shoe had
assumed under Joss Fritz. The plebeian element of the cities began to
assert itself more and more. The ramifications of the conspiracy went
over into Alsace, present-day Baden, up to Wuerttemberg and the Main.
Larger meetings were held from time to time on remote mountains such as
the Kniebis, etc., and the affairs of the Union were discussed. The
meetings of the chiefs, often participated in by local members as well
as by delegates of the more remote localities, took place on the
Hartmatte near Lehen, and it was here that the fourteen articles of the
Union were adopted: No master besides the emperor, and (according to
some) the pope; abolition of the Rottweil imperial court; limitation of
the church court to religious affairs; abolition of all interest which
had been paid so long that it equalled the capital; an interest of 5 per
cent as the highest permissible rate; freedom of hunting, fishing,
grazing, and wood cutting; limitation of the priests to one prebend for
each; confiscation of all church estates and monastery gems in favour of
the Union; abolition of all inequitable taxes and tolls; eternal peace
within entire Christendom, energetic action against all opponents of the
Union; Union taxes; seizure of a strong city, such as Freiburg, to serve
as the centre of the Union; opening of negotiations with the emperor as
soon as the Union hordes were gathered, and with Switzerland in case the
emperor declined – these were the points agreed upon. We see that the
demands of the peasants and plebeians assumed a more and more definite
and decisive form, although concessions had to be made in the same
measure to the more moderate and timid elements as well.

The blow was to be struck about Autumn, 1513. Nothing was lacking but a
Union banner, and Joss Fritz went to Heilbrun to have it painted. It
contained, besides all sorts of emblems and pictures, the Union Shoe and
the legend “God help thy divine justice.” While he was away, a premature
attempt was made to overwhelm Freiburg, but the attempt was discovered.
Some indiscretions in the conduct of the propaganda put the council of
Freiburg and the Margrave of Baden on the right track. The betrayal of
two conspirators completed the series of disclosures. Presently the
Margrave, the council of Freiburg, and the imperial government of
Ensisheim sent out their spies and soldiers. A number of Union members
were arrested, tortured and executed. But the majority escaped once
more, Joss Fritz among them. The Swiss government now persecuted the
fugitives with great assiduity and even executed many of them. However,
it could not prevent the majority of the fugitives from keeping
themselves continually in the vicinity of their homes and gradually
returning there. The Alsace government in Ensisheim was more cruel than
the others. It ordered very many to be decapitated, broken on the wheel,
and quartered. Joss Fritz kept himself mainly on the Swiss bank of the
Rhine, but he also went often to the Black Forest without ever being
apprehended.

Why the Swiss made common cause with the neighbouring governments this
time is apparent from the peasant revolt that broke out the following
year, 1514, in Berne, Sollothurne and Lucerne, and resulted in a purging
of the aristocratic governments and the institution of patricians. The
peasants also forced through some privileges for themselves. If these
Swiss local revolts succeeded, it was simply due to the fact that there
was still less centralisation in Switzerland than in Germany. The local
German masters were all subdued by the peasants of 1525, and if they
succumbed, it was due to the organised mass armies of the princes. These
latter, however, did not exist in Switzerland.

Simultaneously with the Union Shoe in Baden, and apparently in direct
connection with it, a second conspiracy was formed in Wuerttemberg.
According to documents, it had existed since 1503, but since the name
Union Shoe became too dangerous after the dispersal of the Untergrombach
conspirators, it adopted the name of Poor Konrad. Its seat was the
valley of Rems underneath the mountain of Hohenstaufen. Its existence
had been no mystery for a long time, at least among the people. The
shameless pressure of Duke Ulrich’s government, and the series of famine
years which so greatly aided the outbreaks of 1513 and 1514, had
increased the number of conspirators. The newly imposed taxes on wine,
meat and bread, as well as a capital tax of one penny yearly for every
guilder, caused the new outbreak. The city of Schorndorf, where the
heads of the complot used to meet in the house of a cutler named Kaspar
Pregizer, was to be seized first. In the spring of 1514, the rebellion
broke out. Three thousand, and, according to others, five thousand
peasants appeared before the city, and were persuaded by the friendly
promises of the Duke’s officers to move on. Duke Ulrich, having promised
the abolition of the new tax, came riding fast with eighty horsemen, to
find that everything was quiet in consequence of the promise. He
promised to convene a diet where all complaints would be examined. The
chiefs of the organisation, however, knew very well that Ulrich sought
only to keep the people quiet until he had recruited and concentrated
enough troops to be able to break his word and collect the taxes by
force. They issued from Kaspar Pregizer’s house, “the office of Poor
Konrad,” a call to a Union congress, this call having the support of
emissaries everywhere. The success of the first uprising in the valley
of Rems had everywhere strengthened the movement among the people. The
papers and the emissaries found a favourable response, and so the
congress held in Untertuerkheim on May 28, was attended by numerous
representatives from all parts of Wuerttemberg. It was decided
immediately to proceed with the propaganda and to strike a decisive blow
in the valley of Rems at the first opportunity in order to spread the
uprising from that point in every direction. While Bantelshans of
Dettingen, a former soldier, and Singerhans of Wuertingen, a prominent
peasant, were bringing the Suabian Alp into the Union, the uprising
broke out on every side. Though Singerhans was suddenly attacked and
seized, the cities of Backnang, Winnenden, and Markgroenningen fell into
the hands of the peasants combined with the plebeians, and the entire
territory from Weinsberg to Blaubeuren and from there up to the
frontiers of Baden, was in open revolt. Ulrich was compelled to yield.
However, while he was calling the Diet for June 25, he sent out a
circular letter to the surrounding princes and free cities, asking for
aid against the uprising, which, he said, threatened all princes,
authorities and nobles in the empire, and which “strangely resembled the
Union Shoe.”

In the meantime, the Diet, representing the cities, and many delegates
of the peasants who also demanded seats in the Diet, convened on June 18
in Stuttgart.

The prelates were not there as yet. The knights had not been invited.
The opposition of the city of Stuttgart, as well as two threatening
hordes of peasants at Leonberg nearby in the valley of Rems,
strengthened the demands of the peasants. Their delegates were admitted,
and it was decided to depose and punish three of the hated councillors
of the Duke – Lamparter, Thumb and Lorcher, to add to the Duke a council
of four knights, four burghers and four peasants, to grant him a civil
list, and to confiscate the monasteries and the endowments in favour of
the State treasury.

Duke Ulrich met these revolutionary decisions with a coup d’état. On
June 21, he rode with his knights and councillors to Tuebingen, where he
was followed by the prelates. He ordered the middle-class to come there
as well. This was obeyed, and there he continued the session of the Diet
without the peasants. The burghers, confronted with military terrorism,
betrayed their allies, the peasants. On July 8, the Tuebingen agreement
came into being, which imposed on the country almost a million of the
Duke’s debt, imposed on the Duke some limitations of power which he
never fulfilled, and disposed of the peasants with a few meagre general
phrases and a very definite penal law against insurrection. Of course,
nothing was mentioned about peasant representation in the Diet. The
plain people cried “Treason!” but the Duke, having acquired new credits
after his debts were taken over by the estates, soon gathered troops
while his neighbours, particularly the Elector Palatine, were sending
military aid. Thus, by the end of July, the Tuebingen agreement had been
accepted all over the country, and a new oath taken. Only in the valley
of Rems did Poor Konrad offer resistance. The Duke, who rode there in
person, was almost killed. A peasant camp was formed on the mountain of
Koppel. But the affair dragged on, most of the insurgents running away
for lack of food; later the remaining ones also went home after
concluding an ambiguous agreement with some representatives of the Diet.
Ulrich, whose army had in the meantime been strengthened by voluntarily
offered troops of the cities which, having attained their demands, now
fanatically turned against the peasants, attacked the valley of Rems
contrary to the terms of the agreement, and plundered its cities and
villages. Sixteen hundred peasants were captured, sixteen of them
decapitated, and the rest receiving heavy fines in favour of Ulrich’s
treasury. Many remained in prison for a long time. A number of penal
laws were issued against a renewal of the organisation, against all
gatherings of peasants, and the nobility of Suabia formed a special
union for the suppression of all attempts at insurrection. Meantime, the
chief leaders of Poor Konrad had succeeded in escaping into Switzerland,
whence most of them returned home singly, after the lapse of a few
years.

Simultaneously with the Wuerttemberg movement, symptoms of new Union
Shoe activities became manifest in Breisgau and in the Margraviate of
Baden. In June, an insurrection was attempted at Buehl, but it was
immediately dispersed by Margrave Philipp – the leader, Gugel-Bastian of
Freiburg, having been seized and executed on the block.

In the spring of the same year, 1514, a general peasant war broke out in
Hungary. A crusade against the Turks was being preached, and, as usual,
freedom was promised to the serfs and bondsmen who would join it. About
60,000 congregated, and were to be under the command of György
Dózsa,^([16]) a Szekler, who had distinguished himself in the preceding
Turkish wars and even attained nobility. The Hungarian knights and
magnates, however, looked with disfavour upon the crusade which
threatened to deprive them of their property and slaves. They hastily
followed the individual hordes of peasants, and took back their serfs by
force and mistreated them. When the army of crusaders learned about it,
all the fury of the oppressed peasants was unleashed. Two of the men,
enthusiastic advocates of the crusade, Lawrence Mészáros and Barnabas,
fanned the fire, inciting the hatred of the army against the nobility by
their revolutionary speeches. Dózsa himself shared the anger of his
troops against the treacherous nobility. The army of crusaders became an
army of the revolution, and Dózsa assumed leadership of the movement.

He camped with his peasants in the Rakos field near Pest. Hostilities
were opened with encounters between the peasants and the people of the
nobility in the surrounding villages and in the suburbs of Pest. Soon
there were skirmishes, and then followed Sicilian Vespers for all the
nobility who fell into the hands of the peasants, and burning of all the
castles in the vicinity. The court threatened in vain. When the first
acts of the people’s justice towards the nobility had been accomplished
under the walls of the city, Dózsa proceeded to further operations. He
divided his army into five columns. Two were sent to the mountains of
Upper Hungary in order to effect an insurrection and to exterminate the
nobility. The third, under Ambros Szaleves, a citizen of Pest, remained
on the Rakos to guard the capital. The fourth and fifth were led by
Dózsa and his brother Gregor against Szegedin.

In the meantime, the nobility gathered in Pest, and called to its aid
Johann Zapolya, the _voivode_ of Transylvania. The nobility, joined by
the middle-class of Budapest, attacked and annihilated the army on the
Rakos, after Szaleves with the middle-class elements of the peasant army
had gone over to the enemy. A host of prisoners were executed in the
most cruel fashion. The rest were sent home minus their noses and ears.

Dózsa suffered defeat before Szegedin and moved to Czanad which he
captured, having defeated an army of the nobility under Batory Istvan
and Bishop Esakye, and having perpetrated bloody repressions on the
prisoners, among them the Bishop and the royal Chancellor Teleky, for
the atrocities committed on the Rakos. In Czanad he proclaimed a
republic, abolition of the nobility, general equality and sovereignty of
the people, and then moved toward Temesvar, to which place Batory had
rushed with his army. But during the siege of this fortress which lasted
for two months and while he was being reinforced by a new army under
Anton Hosza, his two army columns in Upper Hungary suffered defeat in
several battles at the hand of the nobility, and Johann Zapolya, with
his Transylvanian army, moved against him. The peasants were attacked by
Zapolya and dispersed. Dózsa was captured, roasted on a red hot throne,
and his flesh eaten by his own people, whose lives were granted to them
only under this condition. The dispersed peasants, reassembled by
Lawrence and Hosza, were defeated again, and whoever fell into the hands
of the enemies were either impaled or hanged. The peasants’ corpses hung
in thousands along the roads or at the entrances of burned-down
villages. According to reports, about 60,000 either fell in battle, or
were massacred. The nobility took care that at the next session of the
Diet, the enslavement of the peasants should again be recognised as the
law of the land.

The peasant revolt in Carinthia, Carniola and Styria, the “windy
marshes,” which broke out at the same time, originated in a conspiracy
akin to the Union Shoe, organised as early as 1503 in that region, wrung
dry by imperial officers, devastated by Turkish invasions, and tortured
by famines. It was this conspiracy that made the insurrection possible.
Already in 1513, the Slovenian as well as the German peasants of this
region had once more raised the war banner of the Stara Prawa (The Old
Rights). They allowed themselves to be placated that time, and when in
1514 they gathered anew in large masses, they were again persuaded to go
home by a direct promise of the Emperor Maximilian to restore the old
rights. Still, the war of vengeance by the deceived people broke out in
the Spring of 1515 with much more vigour. Here, as in Hungary, castles
and monasteries were destroyed, captured nobles being tried and executed
by peasant juries. In Styria and Carinthia, the emperor’s captain
Dietrichstein soon succeeded in crushing the revolt. In Carniola, it
could be suppressed only through an attack from Rain (Autumn, 1516) and
through subsequent Austrian atrocities which formed a worthy counterpart
to the infamies of the Hungarian nobility.

It is clear why, after a series of such decisive defeats, and after
these mass atrocities of the nobility, the German peasants remained
quiescent for a long time. Still, neither conspiracies nor local
uprisings were totally absent. Already in 1516 most of the fugitives of
the Union Shoe and Poor Konrad had returned to Suabia and to the upper
Rhine. In 1517 the Union Shoe was again in full swing in the Black
Forest. Joss Fritz himself, who still carried in his bosom the old Union
Shoe banner of 1513, traversed the Black Forest in various directions,
and developed great activity. The conspiracy was being organised anew.
Meetings were again held on the Kniebis as they had been four years
before. Secrecy, however, was not maintained. The governments learned
the facts and interfered. Many were captured and executed. The most
active and intelligent members were compelled to flee, among them Joss
Fritz, who, although still not captured, seems, however, to have died in
Switzerland a short time afterwards. At any rate, his name is not
mentioned again.



CHAPTER 4 UPRISING OF THE NOBILITY


While the fourth Union Shoe organisation was being suppressed in the
Black Forest, Luther, in Wittenberg, gave the signal to a movement which
was destined to draw all the estates into its torrent, and to shake the
whole empire. The theses of this Augustinian from Thuringia had the
effect of lightning in a powder magazine. The manifold and contradictory
strivings of the knights and the middle-class, the peasants and the
plebeians, the princes craving for sovereignty, the lower clergy
secretly playing at mysticism, and the learned writer’s opposition of a
satirical and burlesque nature, found in Luther’s theses a common
expression around which they grouped themselves with astounding
rapidity. This alliance of all the opposing elements, though formed
overnight and of brief duration, suddenly revealed the enormous power of
the movement, and gave it further impetus.

But this very rapid growth of the movement was also destined to develop
the seeds of discord which were hidden in it. It was destined to tear
asunder at least those portions of the aroused mass which, by their very
situation in life, were directly opposed to each other, and to put them
in their normal state of mutual hostility. Already in the first years of
the Reformation, the assembling of the heterogeneous mass of the
opposition around two central points became a fact. Nobility and
middle-class grouped themselves unconditionally around Luther. Peasants
and plebeians, yet failing to see in Luther a direct enemy, formed a
separate revolutionary party of the opposition. This was nothing new,
since now the movement had become much more general, much broader in
scope and deeper than it was in the pre-Luther times, which necessarily
brought about a sharp antagonism and an open struggle between the two
parties. This direct opposition soon became apparent. Luther and
Muenzer, fighting in the press and in the pulpit, were as much opposed
to each other as were the armies of princes, knights and cities
(consisting, as they did, mainly of Lutherans or of forces at least
inclined towards Lutherism), and the hordes of peasants and plebeians
routed by those armies.

The divergence of interests of the various elements accepting the
Reformation became apparent even before the Peasant War in the attempt
of the nobility to realise its demands as against the princes and the
clergy.

The situation of the German nobility at the beginning of the Sixteenth
Century has been depicted above. The nobility was losing its
independence to the ever-increasing power of the lay and clerical
princes. It realised that in the same degree as it was going down as a
group in society, the power of the empire was going down as well,
dissolving itself into a number of sovereign principalities. The
collapse of the nobility coincided, in its own opinion, with the
collapse of the German nation. Added to it was the fact that the
nobility, especially that section of it which was under the empire, by
virtue of its military occupation and its attitude towards the princes,
directly represented the empire and the imperial power. The nobility was
the most national of the estates, and it knew that the stronger were the
imperial power and the unity of Germany, and the weaker and less
numerous the princes, the more powerful would the nobility become. It
was for that reason that the knighthood was generally dissatisfied with
the pitiful political situation of Germany, with the powerlessness of
the empire in foreign affairs, which increased in the same degree as, by
inheritance, the court was adding to the empire one province after the
other, with the intrigues of foreign powers inside of Germany and with
the plottings of German princes with foreign countries against the power
of the empire. It was for that reason, also, that the demands of the
nobility instantly assumed the form of a demand for the reform of the
empire, the victims of which were to be the princes and the higher
clergy. Ulrich of Hutten, the theoretician of the German nobility,
undertook to formulate this demand in combination with Franz von
Sickingen, its military and diplomatic representative.

The reform of the empire as demanded by the nobility was conceived by
Hutten in a very radical spirit and expressed very clearly. Hutten
demanded nothing else than the elimination of all princes, the
secularisation of all church principalities and estates, and the
restoration of a _democracy of the nobility_ headed by a monarchy – a
form of government reminiscent of the heyday of the late Polish
republic. Hutten and Sickingen believed that the empire would again
become united, free and powerful, should the rule of the nobility, a
predominantly military class, be reestablished, the princes, the
elements of disintegration, removed, the power of the priests
annihilated, and Germany torn away from under the dominance of the Roman
Church.

Founded on serfdom this democracy of the nobility, the prototype of
which could be found in Poland and, in the empires conquered by the
Germanic tribes, at least in their first centuries, is one of the most
primitive forms of society, and its normal course of development is to
become an extensive feudal hierarchy, which was a considerable advance.
Such a powerful democracy of the nobility had already become an
impossibility in Germany of the Sixteenth Century, first of all because
there existed at that time important and powerful German cities and
there was no prospect of an alliance between nobility and the cities
such as brought about in England the transformation of the feudal order
into a bourgeois constitutional monarchy. In Germany, the old nobility
survived, while in England it was exterminated by the Wars of the
Roses,^([17]) only twenty-eight families remaining, and was superseded
by a new nobility of middle-class derivation and middle-class
tendencies. In Germany, serfdom was still the common practice, the
nobility drawing its income from feudal sources, while in England
serfdom had been virtually eliminated, and the nobility had become plain
middle-class land owners, with a _middle-class_ source of income – the
ground rent. Finally, that centralisation of absolute monarchial power
which in France had existed and kept growing since Louis XI due to the
clash of interests between nobility and middle-class, was impossible in
Germany where conditions for national centralisation existed in a very
rudimentary form, if at all.

Under these conditions, the greater was Hutten’s determination to carry
out his ideals in practice, the more concessions was he compelled to
make, and the more clouded did his plan of reforming the empire become.
Nobility, alone, lacked power to put the reform through. This was
manifest from its weakness in comparison with the princes. Allies were
to be looked for, and these could only be found either in the cities, or
among the peasantry and the influential advocates of reform. But the
cities knew the nobility too well to trust them, and they rejected all
forms of alliance. The peasants justly saw in the nobility, which
exploited and mistreated them, their bitterest enemy, and as to the
theoreticians of reform, they made common cause with the middle-class,
the princes, or the peasants. What advantages, indeed, could the
nobility promise the middle-class or the peasants from a reform of the
empire whose main task it was to lift the nobility into a higher
position? Under these circumstances Hutten could only be silent in his
propaganda writings about the future interrelations between the
nobility, the cities and the peasants, or to mention them only briefly,
putting all evils at the feet of the princes, the priests, and the
dependence upon Rome, and showing the middle-class that it was in their
interests to remain at least neutral in the coming struggle between the
nobility and the princes. No mention was ever made by Hutten of
abolishing serfdom or other burdens imposed upon the peasants by the
nobility.

The attitude of the German nobility towards the peasants of that time
was exactly the same as that of the Polish nobility towards its peasants
in the insurrections since 1830. As in the modern Polish upheavals, the
movement could have been brought to a successful conclusion only by an
alliance of all the opposition parties, mainly the nobility and the
peasants. But of all alliances, this one was entirely impossible on
either side. The nobility was not ready to give up its political
privileges and its feudal rights over the peasants, while the
revolutionary peasants could not be drawn by vague prospects into an
alliance with the nobility, the class which was most active in their
oppression. The nobility could not win over the German peasant in 1522,
as it failed in Poland in 1830. Only total abolition of serfdom, bondage
and all privileges of nobility could have united the rural population
with it. The nobility, like every privileged class, had not, however,
the slightest desire to give up its privileges, its favourable
situation, and the major parts of its sources of income.

Thus it came about that when the struggle broke out, the nobles were
alone in the field against the princes. It was obvious that the princes,
who, for two centuries had been taking the ground from under the
nobility’s feet, would this time also gain a victory without much
effort.

The course of the struggle itself is well known. Hutten and Sickingen,
already recognised as the political and military chiefs of the middle
German nobility, organised in Landau, in 1522, a union of the Rhenish,
Suabian and Franconian nobility for the duration of six years,
ostensibly for self-defense. Sickingen assembled an army, partly out of
his own means and partly in combination with the neighbouring knights.
He organised the recruiting of armies and reinforcements in Franconia,
along the Lower Rhine, in the Netherlands and in Westphalia, and in
September, 1522, he opened hostilities by declaring a feud against the
Elector-Archbishop of Trier. While he was stationed near Trier, his
reinforcements were cut off by a quick intervention of the princes. The
Landgrave of Hesse and the Elector Palatine went to the aid of the
Archbishop of Trier, and Sickingen was hastily compelled to retreat to
his castle, Landstuhl. In spite of all the efforts of Hutten and the
remainder of his friends, the united nobility, intimidated by the
concentrated and quick action of the princes, left him in the lurch.
Sickingen was mortally wounded, surrendered Landstuhl, and soon
afterwards he died. Hutten was compelled to flee to Switzerland, where
he died a few months later on the Isle of Ufnau, on the Lake of Zurich.

With this defeat, and with the death of both leaders, the power of the
nobility as a body, independent of the princes, was broken. From then on
the nobility appeared only in the service and under the leadership of
the princes. The Peasant War, which soon broke out, drove the nobles
still more deeply under the direct or indirect protection of the
princes. It proved that the German nobility preferred to continue the
exploitation of the peasants under princely sovereignty, rather than
overthrow the princes and priests through an open alliance with the
_emancipated_ peasants.



CHAPTER 5 THE PEASANT WAR IN SUABIA AND FRANCONIA


From the moment when Luther’s declaration of war against the Catholic
hierarchy set into motion all the opposition elements of Germany, not a
year passed without the peasants coming forth with their demands.
Between 1518 and 1523, one local revolt followed another in the Black
Forest and in upper Suabia. Beginning in the Spring of 1524, these
revolts assumed a systematic character. In April of that year, the
peasants of the Abbey of Marchthal refused serf labour and duties; in
May of the same year, the peasants of St. Blasien refused serf payments;
in June, the peasants of Steinheim near Memmingen declared they would
pay neither the tithe nor other duties; in July and August, the peasants
of Thurgau rebelled and were quieted partly through the mediation of
Zurich, partly through the brutality of the confederacy which executed
many of them. Finally, a decisive uprising took place in the Margraviate
of Stuehlingen, which may be looked upon as the _real beginning of the
Peasant War._

The peasants of Stuehlingen suddenly refused deliveries to the Landgrave
and assembled in strong numbers. On October 24, 1524, they moved towards
Waldshut under Hans Mueller of Bulgenbach. Here they organised an
evangelical fraternity, jointly with the city middle-class. The latter
joined the organisation the more willingly since they were in conflict
with the government of Upper Austria over the religious persecutions of
their preacher, Balthaser Hubmaier, a friend and disciple of Thomas
Muenzer’s. A Union tax of three kreutzer weekly was imposed. It was an
enormous sum for the value of money of that time. Emissaries were sent
out to Alsace, to the Moselle, to the entire Upper Rhine and to
Franconia, to bring peasants everywhere into the Union. The aims of the
Union were proclaimed as follows: abolition of feudal power; destruction
of all castles and monasteries; elimination of all masters outside of
the emperor. The German tricolour was the banner of the Union.

The uprising spread rapidly over the entire territory of present-day
Baden. A panic seized the nobility of Upper Suabia, whose military
forces were all engaged in Italy, in a war against Francis I of France.
Nothing remained for it but to gain time by protracted negotiations,
meanwhile collecting money and recruiting troops, pending the moment
when it would feel strong enough to punish the peasants for their
audacity by “burning and scorching, plundering and murdering.” From that
moment there began that systematic betrayal, that consistent recourse to
perfidiousness and secret malice, which distinguished the nobility and
the princes throughout the entire Peasant War, and which was their
strongest weapon against decentralised peasants. The Suabian Union,
comprising the princes, the nobility, and the imperial cities of
southwest Germany, tried conciliatory measures without guaranteeing the
peasants real concessions. The latter continued their movement. Hans
Mueller of Bulgenbach marched, from September 30 to the middle of
October, through the Black Forest up to Urach and Furtwangen, increased
his troops to 3,500 and took a position near Eratingen, not far from
Stuehlingen. The nobility had no more than 1,700 men at their disposal,
and even those were divided. It had to agree to an armistice, which was
concluded in the camp at Eratingen. The peasants were promised a
peaceful agreement, either directly between the interested parties, or
by means of an arbitrator, and an investigation of complaints by the
court at Stockach. The troops of both the nobility and the peasants were
dispersed.

The peasants formulated sixteen articles, the acceptance of which was to
be demanded of the court at Stockach. The articles were very moderate.
They included abolition of the hunting right, of serf labour, of
excessive taxes and master privileges in general, protection against
willful arrests and against partisan courts. The peasants’ demands went
no farther.

Nevertheless, immediately after the peasants went home, the nobility
demanded continuation of all contested services pending the court
decision. The peasants refused, advising the masters to go to the court.
Thus the conflict was renewed, the peasants reassembled, and the princes
and masters once again concentrated their troops. This time the movement
spread far over the Breisgau and deep into Wuerttemberg. The troops
under Georg Truchsess of Waldburg, the Alba of the Peasant War, observed
the peasants’ movements, attacked individual reinforcements, but did not
dare to attack the main force. Georg Truchsess negotiated with the
peasant chiefs, and here and there he effected agreements.

By the end of December, proceedings began before the court at Stockach.
The peasants protested against the court, composed entirely of nobles.
In reply, an imperial edict to this effect was read. The proceedings
lagged, while the nobility, the princes and the Suabian Union
authorities were arming themselves. Archduke Ferdinand who dominated,
besides hereditary lands then still belonging to Austria, also
Wuerttemberg, the Black Forest and Southern Alsace, ordered the greatest
severity against the rebellious peasants. They were to be captured,
mercilessly tortured and killed; they were to be exterminated in the
most expeditious manner; their possessions to be burned and devastated,
and their wives and children driven from the land. It was in that way
that the princes and masters kept the armistice, and this is what passed
for amicable arbitration and investigation of grievances. Archduke
Ferdinand, to whom the house of Welser of Augsburg advanced money, armed
himself very carefully. The Suabian Union ordered a special tax, and a
contingent of troops to be called in three installments.

The foregoing rebellions coincided with the five months’ presence of
Thomas Muenzer in the Highland. Though there are no direct proofs of his
influence over the outbreak and the course of the movement, it is,
nevertheless, indirectly ascertained. The most outspoken revolutionaries
among the peasants were mostly his disciples, defending his ideas. The
Twelve Articles, as well as the Letter of Articles of the Highland
peasants, were ascribed to him by all the contemporaries, although the
first was certainly not composed by Muenzer. Already, on his way back to
Thuringia, he issued a decisive revolutionary manifesto to the insurgent
peasants.

Duke Ulrich, who, since 1519, had been an exile from Wuerttemberg, was
now intriguing to regain his land with the aid of the peasants. Since
the beginning of his exile be had been trying to utilise the
revolutionary party, and had supported it continuously. In most of the
local disturbances taking place between 1520 and 1524 in the Black
Forest and in Wuerttemberg, his name appeared. Now he armed himself
directly for an attack on Wuerttemberg to be launched out of his castle,
Hohentweil. However, he was only utilised by the peasants without
influencing them, and without enjoying their confidence.

The winter passed without anything decisive happening on either side.
The princely masters were in hiding. The peasant revolt was gaining
scope. In January, 1525, the entire country between the Danube, the
Rhine and the Lech, was in a state of fermentation. In February, the
storm broke. While the Black Forest Hegau troops, under Hans Mueller of
Bulgenbach, were conspiring with Ulrich of Wuerttemberg, partly sharing
his futile march on Stuttgart (February and March, 1525), the peasants
arose on February 9 in Ried above Ulm, assembled in a camp near
Baltringen which was protected by marshes, hoisted the red flag, and
formed, under the leadership of Ulrich Schmid, the Baltringen Troop.
They were 10,000 to 12,000 strong.

On February 25, the Upper Allgaeu troops, 7,000 strong, assembled at
Schussen, moved by the rumour that troops were marching against the
dissatisfied elements who had appeared in this locality as everywhere
else. The people of Kempten, who had conducted a fight against their
archbishop throughout the winter, assembled on the 26th and joined the
peasants. The cities of Memmingen and Kaufbeuren joined the movement on
certain conditions. The ambiguity of the position of the cities in this
movement was already apparent. On March 7, the twelve Memmingen articles
were proclaimed in Memmingen for all the peasants of Upper Allgaeu.

A message from the Allgaeu peasants brought about the formation on Lake
Constance of the Lake Troop under Eitel Hans. This troop also grew fast.
Its headquarters were in Bermatingen.

The peasants also arose in Lower Allgaeu in the region of Ochsenbausen
and Schellenberg, in the localities of Zeil and Waldburg, and in the
estates of Truchsess. The movement started in the early days of March.
This Lower Allgaeu Troop, which consisted of 7,000 men, camped near
Wurzach.

All these troops adopted the Memmingen articles, which, it must be
noted, were still more moderate than the Hegau articles, manifesting, as
they did, a remarkable lack of determination in points relating to the
attitude of the armed troops towards the nobility and the governments.
Such determination, wherever manifested, appeared only in the later
stages of the war, when the peasants learned to know from experience the
mode of action of their enemies.

A sixth troop was formed on the Danube, simultaneously with the others.
From the entire region, Ulm to Donauwoerth, from the valleys of the
Iller, Roth and Biber, the peasants came to Leipheim, and opened camp
there. From fifteen localities, every able-bodied man had come, while
reinforcements were drawn from 117 places. The leader of the Leipheim
Troop was Ulrich Schoen. Its preacher was Jakob Wehe, the priest of
Leipheim.

Thus, at the beginning of March, there were between 30,000 and 40,000
insurgent peasants of Upper Suabia in six camps under arms. The peasant
troops were a heterogeneous lot. Muenzer’s revolutionary party was
everywhere in the minority but it formed the backbone of the peasant
camps. The mass of the peasants were always ready to venture compacts
with the masters wherever they were promised those concessions which
they hoped to force upon their enemies by their menacing attitude.
Moreover, as the uprising dragged on and the princes’ armies began to
approach, the peasants became weary. Most of those who still had
something to lose, went home. Added to all the difficulties was the fact
that the vagabond masses of the low grade proletariat had joined the
troops. This made discipline more difficult, and demoralised the
peasants, as the vagabonds were an unreliable element, coming and going
all the time. This, alone, is sufficient explanation why, at the
beginning, the peasants remained everywhere on the defensive, why they
were becoming demoralised in their camps, and why, aside from tactical
shortcomings and the rarity of good leaders, they could not match the
armies of the princes.

While the troops were assembling, Duke Ulrich invaded Wuerttemberg from
Hohentweil with recruited troops and a number of Hegau peasants. Were
the peasants now to proceed from the other side, from Waldburg against
Truchsess’ troops, the Suabian Union would have been lost. But because
of the defensive attitude of the peasant troops, Truchsess soon
succeeded in concluding an armistice with those of Baltringen, Allgaeu,
and the Lake, starting negotiations and fixing a date for terminating
the whole undertaking, namely, Judica Sunday (April 2). In the meantime,
he was able to proceed against Duke Ulrich, to besiege Stuttgart,
compelling him to leave Wuerttemberg as early as March 17. Then he
turned against the peasants, but the Lansquenets revolted in his own
army and refused to proceed against the peasants. Truchsess succeeded in
placating the disgruntled soldiers and moved towards Ulm, where new
reinforcements were being gathered. He left an observation post at
Kerchief under the supervision of Teck.

At last the Suabian Union, with free hands and in command of the first
contingents, threw off its mask, declaring itself “to be ready, with
arms in hand and with the aid of God, to change that which the peasants
wilfully ventured.”

The peasants adhered strictly to the armistice. On Judica Sunday they
submitted their demands, the famous Twelve Articles, for consideration.
They demanded the election and removal of clergymen by the communities;
the abolition of the small tithe and the utilisation of the large tithe,
after subtraction of the priests’ salaries, for public purposes; the
abolition of serfdom, of fishing and hunting rights, and of death tolls;
the limitation of excessive bonded labour, taxes and ground rents; the
restitution of the forests, meadows and privileges forcibly withdrawn
from the communities and individuals, and the elimination of willfulness
in the courts and the administration. It is obvious that the moderate
conciliatory section still had the upper hand among the peasant troops.
The revolutionary party had formulated its programme earlier, in the
_Letter of Articles._ It was an open letter to all the peasantry,
admonishing them to join “the Christian Alliance and Brotherhood” for
the purpose of removing all burdens either by goodness, “which will
hardly happen,” or by force, and threatening all those who refuse to
join with the “lay anathema,” that is, with expulsion from the society
and from any intercourse with the Union members. All castles,
monasteries and priests’ endowments were also, according to the Letter,
to be placed under lay anathema unless the nobility, the priests and the
monks relinquished them of their own accord, moved into ordinary houses
like other people, and joined the Christian Alliance. We see that this
radical manifesto which obviously had been composed _before_ the Spring
insurrection of 1525, deals in the first place with the revolution, with
complete victory over the ruling classes, and that the “lay anathema”
only designates those oppressors and traitors that were to be killed,
the castles that were to be burned, and the monasteries and endowments
that were to be confiscated, their jewels to be turned into cash.

Before the peasants succeeded in presenting their Twelve Articles to the
proper courts of arbitration, they learned that the agreement had been
broken by the Suabian Union and that its troops were approaching. Steps
were taken immediately by the peasants. A general meeting of all
Allgaeu, Baltringen and Lake peasants was held at Geisbeuren. The four
divisions were combined and reorganised into four columns. A decision
was made to confiscate the church estates, to sell their jewels in
favour of the war chest, and to burn the castles. Thus, aside from the
official Twelve Articles, the Letter of the Articles became the rule of
warfare, and Judica Sunday, designated for the conclusion of peace
negotiations, became the date of _general uprising._

The growing agitation everywhere, the continued local conflicts of the
peasants with the nobility, the news of a growing revolt in the Black
Forest for the preceding six months and of its spread up to the Danube
and the Lech, are sufficient to explain the rapid succession of peasant
revolts in two-thirds of Germany. The fact, however, that the partial
revolts took place simultaneously, proves that there were men at the
head of the movement who had organised it through Anabaptists and other
emissaries. Already in the second half of March, disorders broke out in
Wuerttemberg, in the lower regions of the Neckar and the Odenwald, and
in Upper and Middle Franconia. April 2, Judica Sunday, however, had
already been named everywhere as the day of the general uprising, and
everywhere the decisive blow, the revolt of the masses, fell in the
first week of April. The Allgaeu, Hegau and Lake peasants sounded the
alarm bells on April 1, calling into the camp a mass meeting of all
able-bodied men, and together with the Baltringen peasants, they
immediately opened hostilities against the castles and monasteries.

In Franconia, where the movement was grouped around six centres, the
insurrection broke out everywhere in the first days of April. In
Noerdlingen two peasant camps were formed about that time, and the
revolutionary party of the city under Anton Forner, aided by the
peasants, gained the upper hand, appointing Forner the Mayor, and
completing a union between the city and the peasants. In the region of
Anspach, the peasants revolted everywhere between April 1 and 7, and
from here the revolts spread as far as Bavaria. In the region of
Rottenburg, the peasants were already under arms on March 22. In the
city of Rottenburg the rule of the honourables was overthrown by the
lower middle-class and plebeians under Stephan of Menzingen, but since
the peasant dues were the chief source of revenue for the city, the new
government was able to maintain a vacillating and equivocal attitude
towards the peasants. In the Grand Chapter of Wurzburg there was a
general uprising, early in April, of the peasants and the small cities.
In the bishopric of Bamberg, a general insurrection compelled the bishop
to yield within five days. In the North, on the border of Thuringia, the
strong Bildhausen Peasant Camp was organised.

In the Odenwald, where Wendel Hipler, a noble and former chancellor of
the Count of Hohenlohe, and Georg Metzler, an innkeeper at Ballenberg
near Krautheim, were at the head of the revolutionary party, the storm
broke out on March 26. The peasants marched from all directions towards
the Tauber. Two thousand men from the Rottenburg camp joined. Georg
Metzler took command, and having received all reinforcements, marched on
April 4 to the monastery of Schoenthal on the Jaxt, where he was joined
by the peasants of the Neckar valley. The latter, led by Jaecklein
Rohrbach, an innkeeper at Boeckingen near Heilbronn, had proclaimed, on
Judica Sunday, the insurrection in Flein, Southeim, etc., while,
simultaneously, Wendel Hipler, with a number of conspirators, took
Oehringen by surprise and drew the surrounding peasants into the
movement. In Schoenthal, the two peasant columns, combined into the Gay
Troop, accepted the Twelve Articles, and organised expeditions against
the castles and monasteries. The Gay Troop was about 8,000 strong, and
possessed cannon, as well as 3,000 guns. Florian Geyer, a Franconian
knight, also joined the troop and formed the Black Host, a select
division which had been recruited mainly from the Rottenburg and
Oehringen infantry.

The Wuerttemberg magistrate in Neckarsulm, Count Ludwig von Helfenstein,
opened hostilities. Without much ado, he ordered all peasants that fell
into his hands to be executed. The Gay Troop marched against him. The
peasants were embittered by the massacres as well as by news of the
defeat of the Leipheim Troop, of Jakob Wehe’s execution, and the
Truchsess atrocities. Von Helfenstein, who had precipitously moved into
Weinsberg, was there attacked. The castle was stormed by Florian Geyer.
The city was won after a prolonged struggle, and Count Ludwig was taken
prisoner, as were several knights. On the following day, April 17,
Jaecklein Rohrbach, together with the most resolute members of the
troop, held court over the prisoners, and ordered fourteen of them, with
von Helfenstein at the head, to run the gauntlet, this being the most
humiliating death he could invent for them. The capture of Weinsberg and
the terroristic revenge of Jaecklein against von Helfenstein, did not
fail to influence the nobility. Count von Loebenstein joined the Peasant
Alliance. The Counts von Hohenlohe, who had joined previously without
offering any aid, immediately sent the desired cannon and powder.

The chiefs debated among themselves whether they should not make Goetz
von Berlichingen their commander “since be could bring to them the
nobility.” The proposal found sympathy, but Florian Geyer, who saw in
this mood of the peasants and their chiefs the beginning of reaction,
seceded from the troop, and together with his Black Host, marched first
through the Neckar Region, then the Wuerzburg territory, everywhere
destroying castles and priests’ nests.

The remainder of the troop marched first towards Heilbronn. In this
powerful and free imperial city, the patriciate was confronted, as
almost everywhere, by a middle-class and revolutionary opposition. The
latter, in secret agreement with the peasants, opened the gates before
G. Metzler and Jaecklein Rohrbach, on April 17, in the course of a
general disturbance. The peasant chiefs with their people took
possession of the city. They accepted membership in the brotherhood, and
delivered 12,000 guilders in money and a squad of volunteers. Only the
possessions of the clergy and the Teutonic Order were pillaged. On the
22nd, the peasants moved away, leaving a small garrison. Heilbronn was
designated as the centre of the various troops, the latter actually
sending delegates and conferring over common actions and common demands
of the peasantry. But the middle-class opposition and the honourables
who had joined them after the peasant invasion, regained the upper hand
in the city, preventing it from taking decisive steps and only waiting
for the approach of the princes’ troops in order to betray the peasants
definitely.

The peasants marched toward the Odenwald. Goetz von Berlichingen who, a
few days previous, had offered himself to the Grand Elector Palatine,
then to the peasantry, then again to the Grand Elector, was compelled on
April 24 to join the Evangelist Fraternity, and to take over the supreme
command of the Gay Bright Troop (in contrast to the Black Troop of
Florian Geyer). At the same time, however, he was the prisoner of the
peasants who mistrusted him and bound him to a council of chiefs without
whom he could undertake nothing. Goetz and Metzler moved with a mass of
peasants over Buchen to Armorbach, where they remained from April 30,
until May 5, arousing the entire region of the Main. The nobility was
everywhere compelled to join, and thus its castles were spared. Only the
monasteries were burned and pillaged. The troops had obviously become
demoralised. The most energetic men were away, either under Florian
Geyer or under Jaecklein Rohrbach, who, after the capture of Heilbronn,
also separated himself from the troops, apparently because he, judge of
Count von Helfenstein, could no longer remain with a body which was in
favour of reconciliation with the nobility. This insistence on an
understanding with the nobility was in itself a sign of demoralisation.
Later, Wendel Hipler proposed a very fitting reorganisation of the
troops. He suggested that the Lansquenets, who offered themselves daily,
should be drawn into the service, and that the troops should no longer
be renewed monthly by assembling fresh contingents and dismissing old
ones, but that those of them who had received more or less military
training should be retained. The community assembly rejected both
proposals. The peasants had become arrogant, viewing the entire war as
nothing but a pillage. They wanted to be free to go home as soon as
their pockets were full, but the competition of the Lansquenets promised
them little. In Amorbach, it went so far that Hans Berlin, a member of
the council of Heilbronn, induced the chiefs and the councils of the
troops to accept the _Declaration of the Twelve Articles,_ a document
wherein the remaining sharp edges of the Twelve Articles were removed,
and in which, a language of humble supplication was put into the mouths
of the peasants. This was too much for the peasants, who rejected the
Declaration under great tumult, and insisted on the retention of the
original Articles.

In the meantime, a decisive change had taken place in the region of
Wuerzburg. The bishop who, after the first uprising early in April, had
withdrawn to the fortified Frauenberg near Wuerzburg, from there to send
unsuccessful letters in all directions asking for aid, was finally
compelled to make temporary concessions. On May 2, a Diet was opened
with the peasants represented, but before any results could be achieved,
letters were intercepted which proved the bishop’s traitorous
machinations. The Diet immediately dispersed, and hostilities broke out
anew between the insurgent city inhabitants and the peasants on one
hand, and the bishop’s forces on the other. The bishop fled to
Heidelberg on May 5, and on the following day Florian Geyer, with the
Black Troop, appeared in Wuerzburg and with him the Franconian Tauber
Troop which consisted of the peasants of Mergentheim, Rottenburg and
Anspach. On May 7, Goetz von Berlichingen with his Gay Bright Troop
came, and the siege of Frauenberg began.

In the vicinity of Limpurg and in the region of Ellwangen and Hall,
another contingent was formed by the end of March and the beginning of
April, that of Gaildorf or the Common Gay Troop. Its actions were very
violent. It aroused the entire region, burned many monasteries and
castles, including the castle of Hohenstaufen, compelled all the
peasants to join it, and compelled all nobles, even the cup-bearers of
Limpurg, to enter the Christian Alliance. Early in May it invaded
Wuerttemberg, but was persuaded to withdraw. The separatism of the
German system of small states stood then, as in 1848, in the way of a
common action of the revolutionaries of the various state territories.
The Gaildorf Troop, limited to a small area, was naturally bound to
disperse when all resistance within that area was broken. The members of
this troop concluded an agreement with the city of Gmuend, and leaving
only 500 under arms, they went home.

In the Palatinate, peasant troops were formed on either bank of the
Rhine by the end of April. They destroyed many castles and monasteries,
and on May 1 they took Neustadt on the Hardt. The Bruchrain peasants,
who appeared in this region, had on the previous day forced Speyer to
conclude an agreement. The Marshal of Zabern, with the few troops of the
Elector, was powerless against them, and on May 10 the Elector was
compelled to conclude an agreement with the peasants, guaranteeing them
a redress of their grievances, to be effected by a Diet.

In Wuerttemberg the revolt had occurred early in separate localities. As
early as February, the peasants of the Urach Alp formed a union against
the priests and masters, and by the end of March the peasants of
Blaubeuer, Urach, Muensingen, Balingen and Rosenfeld revolted. The
Wuerttemberg region was invaded by the Gaildorf Troop at Goeppingen, by
Jaecklein Rohrbach at Brackenheim, and by the remnants of the vanquished
Leipheim Troop at Pfuelingen. All these newcomers aroused the rural
population. There were also serious disturbances in other localities. On
April 6, Pfuelingen capitulated before the peasants. The government of
the Austrian Archduke was in a very difficult situation. It had no money
and but few troops. The cities and castles were in a bad condition,
lacking garrisons or munitions, and even Asperg was practically
defenseless. The attempt of the government to call out city reserves
against the peasants, decided its temporary defeat. On April 16 the
reserves of the city of Bottwar refused to obey orders, marching,
instead of to Stuttgart, to Wunnenstein near Bottwar, where they formed
the nucleus of a camp of middle-class people and peasants, and added
other numbers rapidly. On the same day the rebellion broke out in
Zabergau. The monastery of Maulbronn was pillaged, and a number of
monasteries and castles were ruined. The Gaeu peasants received
reinforcements from the neighbouring Bruchrain.

The command of the Wunnenstein Troop was taken by Matern Feuerbacher, a
councillor of the city of Bottwar, one of the leaders of the
middle-class opposition compromised enough to be compelled to join the
peasants. In spite of his new affiliations, however, he remained very
moderate, prohibiting the application of the Letter of Articles to the
castles, and seeking everywhere to reconcile the peasants with the
moderate middle-class. He prevented the amalgamation of the Wuerttemberg
peasants with the Gay Bright Troop, and afterwards he also persuaded the
Gaildorf Troop to withdraw from Wuerttemberg. On April 19 he was deposed
in consequence of his middle-class tendencies, but the next day he was
again made commander. He was indispensable, and even when Jaecklein
Rohrbach came, on April 22, with 200 of his associates to join the
Wuerttemberg peasants, he could do nothing but leave Feuerbacher in his
place of commander, confining himself to rigid supervision of his
actions.

On April 18, the government attempted to negotiate with the peasants
stationed at Wunnenstein. The peasants insisted upon acceptance of the
Twelve Articles, but this the government’s representatives refused to
do. The troop now proceeded to act. On April 20, it reached Laufen,
where, for the last time, it rejected the offers of the government
delegates. On April 22, the troops, numbering 6,000, appeared in
Bietighein, threatening Stuttgart. Most of the city council had fled,
and a citizens’ committee was placed at the head of the administration.
The citizenry here was divided, as elsewhere, between the parties of the
honourables, the middle-class opposition, and the revolutionary
plebeians. On April 25, the latter opened the gates for the peasants,
and Stuttgart was immediately garrisoned by them. Here the organisation
of the Gay Christian Troop (as the Wuerttemberg insurgents called
themselves) was perfected, and rules and regulations were established
for remuneration, division of booty and alimentation. A detachment of
Stuttgarters, under Theus Gerber, joined the troops.

On April 29, Feuerbacher with all his men marched against the Gaildorf
troops, which had entered the Wuerttemberg region at Schorndorf. He drew
the entire region into his alliance and thus persuaded the Gaildorf
troops to withdraw. In this way, he prevented the revolutionary elements
of his men under Rohrbach from combining with the reckless troops of
Gaildorf and thus receiving a dangerous reinforcement. Having been
informed of Truchsess’ approach, he left Schorndorf to meet him, and on
May 1 encamped near Kerchief under Teck.

We have thus traced the origin and the development of the insurrection
in that portion of Germany which must be considered the territory of the
first group of peasant armies. Before we proceed to the other groups
(Thuringia and Hesse, Alsace, Austria and the Alps) we must give an
account of the military operations of Truchsess, in which he, alone at
the beginning, later supported by various princes and cities,
annihilated the first group of insurgents. We left Truchsess near Ulm,
where he came by the end of March, having left an observation corps
under Teck, under the command of Dietrich Spaet. Truchsess’ corps which
together with the Union reinforcements concentrated in Ulm counted
hardly 10,000, among them 7,200 infantrymen, was the only army at his
disposal capable of an offensive against the peasants. Reinforcements
came to Ulm very slowly, due in part to the difficulties of recruiting
in insurgent localities, in part to the lack of money in the hands of
the government, and also to the fact that the few available troops were
everywhere indispensable for garrisoning the fortresses and the castles.
We have already observed what a small number of troops were at the
disposal of the princes and cities that did not belong to the Suabian
Union. Everything depended upon the successes which Georg Truchsess with
his union army would score.

Truchsess turned first against the Baltringen troops which, in the
meantime, had begun to destroy castles and monasteries in the vicinity
of Ried. The peasants who, with the approach of the Union troops
withdrew into Ried, were driven out of the marshes by an enveloping
movement, crossed the Danube and ran into the ravines and forests of the
Suabian Alps. In this region, where cannon and cavalry, the main source
of strength of the Union army, were of little avail, Truchsess did not
pursue them further. He marched instead against the Leipheim troops
which numbered 5,000 men stationed at Leipheim, 4,000 in the valley of
Mindel, and 6,000 at Illertissen, and was arousing the entire region,
destroying monasteries and castles, and preparing to march against Ulm
with its three columns. It seems that a certain demoralisation had set
in among the peasants of this division, which had undermined their
military morale, for Jakob Wehe tried at the very beginning to negotiate
with Truchsess. The latter, however, now backed by sufficient military
power, declined negotiations, and on April 4 attacked the main troops at
Leipheim and entirely disrupted them. Jakob Wehe and Ulrich Schoen,
together with two other peasant leaders, were captured and beheaded.
Leipheim capitulated, and after a few marches through the surrounding
country, the entire region was subdued.

A new rebellion of the Lansquenets, caused by a demand for plunder and
additional remuneration, again stopped Truchsess’ activities until April
10, when he marched southwest against the Baltringen Troop which in the
meantime had invaded his estates, Waldburg, Zeil and Wolfegg, and
besieged his castles. Here, also, he found the peasants disunited, and
defeated them, on April 11 and 12, one after the other, in various
encounters which completely disrupted the Baltringen troops. Its
remnants withdrew under the command of the priest Florian, and joined
the Lake troops. Truchsess now turned against the latter. The Lake
troops which in the meantime had made not only military marches but had
also drawn the cities Buchhorn (Friedrichshafen) and Wollmatingen into
the fraternity, held, on April 13, a big military council in the
monastery of Salem, and decided to move against Truchsess. Alarm bells
were sounded and 10,000 men, joined by the defeated remnants of the
Baltringen troops, assembled in the camp of Bermatingen. On April 15
they stood their own in a combat with Truchsess, who did not wish to
risk his army in a decisive battle, preferring to negotiate, the more so
since he received news of the approach of the Allgaeu and Hegau troops.
On April 17, in Weingarten, he concluded an agreement with the Lake and
Baltringen peasants which seemed quite favourable to them, and which
they accepted without suspicion. He also induced the delegates of the
Upper and Lower Allgaeu peasants to accept the agreement, and then moved
towards Wuerttemberg.

Truchsess’ cunning saved him here from certain ruin. Had he not
succeeded in fooling the weak, limited, for the most part demoralised
peasants and their usually incapable, timid and venal leaders, he would
have been closed in with his small army between four columns numbering
at least from 25,000 to 30,000 men, and would have perished. It was the
narrow-mindedness of his enemies, always inevitable among the peasant
masses, that made it possible for him to dispose of them at the very
moment when, with one blow, they could have ended the entire war, at
least as far as Suabia and Franconia were concerned. The Lake peasants
adhered to the agreement, which finally turned out to be their undoing,
so rigidly that they later took up arms against their allies, the Hegau
peasants. And although the Allgaeu peasants, involved in the betrayal by
their leaders, soon renounced the agreement, Truchsess was then out
danger.

The Hegau peasants, though not included in the Weingarten agreement,
gave a new example of the appalling narrow-mindedness and the stubborn
provincialism which ruined the entire Peasant War. When, after
unsuccessful negotiations with them, Truchsess, moved towards
Wuerttemberg, they followed him, continually pressing his flank, but it
did not occur to them to unite with the Wuerttemberg Gay Christian
Troop, because previously the peasants of Wuerttemberg and the Neckar
valley refused to come to their assistance. When Truchsess had moved far
enough from their home country, they returned peacefully and marched to
Freiburg.

We left the Wuerttemberg peasants under the command of Matern
Feuerbacher at Kerchief below Teck, from where the observation corps
left by Truchsess had withdrawn towards Urach under the command of
Dietrich Spaet. After an unsuccessful attempt to take Urach, Feuerbacher
turned towards Nuertingen, sending letters to all neighbouring insurgent
troops, calling reinforcements for the decisive battle. Considerable
reinforcements actually came from the Wuerttemberg lowlands as well as
from Gaeu. The Gaeu peasants had grouped themselves around the remnants
of the Leipheim Troop which had withdrawn to West Wuerttemberg, and they
aroused the entire valleys of Neckar and Nagoldt up to Boetlingen and
Leonberg. Those Gaeu peasants, on May 5, came in two strong columns to
join Feuerbacher at Nuertingen. Truchsess met the united troops at
Boetlingen. Their number, their cannon and their position perplexed him.
As usual, he started negotiations and concluded an armistice with the
peasants. But as soon as he had thus secured his position, he attacked
them on May 12 _during the armistice,_ and forced a decisive battle upon
them. The peasants offered a long and brave resistance until finally
Boetlingen was surrendered to Truchsess owing to the betrayal of the
middle-class. The left wing of the peasants, deprived of its base of
support, was forced back and encompassed. This decided the battle. The
undisciplined peasants were thrown into disorder and, later, into a wild
flight, those that were not killed or captured by the horsemen of the
Union threw away their weapons and went home. The Bright Christian
Troop, and with it the entire Wuerttemberg insurrection was gone. Theus
Gerber fled to Esslingen, Feuerbacher fled to Switzerland, Jaecklein
Rohrbach was captured and dragged in chains to Neckargartach, where
Truchsess ordered him chained to a post, surrounded by firewood and
roasted to death on a slow fire, while he, feasting with horsemen,
gloated over this noble spectacle.

From Neckargartach, Truchsess gave aid to the operations of the Elector
Palatine by invading Kraichgau. Having received word of Truchsess’
successes, the Elector, who meanwhile had gathered troops, immediately
broke his agreement with the peasants, attacked Bruchrain on May 23,
captured and burned Malsch after vigorous resistance, pillaged a number
of villages, and garrisoned Bruchsal. At the same time Truchsess
attacked Eppingen and captured the chief of the local movement, Anton
Eisenhut, whom the Elector immediately executed with a dozen other
peasant leaders. Bruchrain and Kraichgau were thus subjugated and
compelled to pay an indemnity of about 40,000 guilders. Both armies,
that of Truchsess now reduced to 6,000 men in consequence of the
preceding battles, and that of the Elector (6,500 men), united and moved
towards the Odenwald.

Word of the Boetlingen defeat spread terror everywhere among the
insurgents. The free imperial cities which had come under the heavy hand
of the peasants, sighed in relief. The city of Heilbronn was the first
to take steps towards reconciliation with the Suabian Union. Heilbronn
was the seat of the peasants’ main office and that of the delegates of
the various troops who deliberated over the proposals to be made to the
emperor and the empire in the name of all the insurgent peasants. In
these negotiations which were to lay down general rules for all of
Germany, it again became apparent that none of the existing estates,
including the peasants, was developed sufficiently to be able to
reconstruct the whole of Germany according to its own viewpoint. It
became obvious that to accomplish this, the support of the peasantry and
particularly of the middle-class must be gained. In consequence, Wendel
Hipler took over the conduct of the negotiations. Of all the leaders of
the movement, Wendel Hipler had the best understanding of the existing
conditions. He was not a far-seeing revolutionary of Muenzer’s type; he
was not a representative of the peasants as were Metzler or Rohrbach;
his many-sided experiences, his practical knowledge of the position of
the various estates towards each other prevented him from representing
one of the estates engaged in the movement in opposition to the other.
Just as Muenzer, a representative of the beginnings of the proletariat
then outside of the existing official organisation of society, was
driven to the anticipation of communism, Wendel Hipler, the
representative, as it were, of the average of all progressive elements
of the nation, anticipated modern bourgeois society. The principles that
he defended, the demands that he formulated, though not immediately
possible, were the somewhat idealised, logical result of the dissolution
of feudal society. In so far as the peasants agreed to propose laws for
the whole empire, they were compelled to accept Hipler’s principles and
demands. Centralisation demanded by the peasants thus assumed, in
Heilbronn, a definite form, which, however, was worlds away from the
ideas of the peasants themselves on the subject. Centralisation, for
instance, was more clearly defined in the demands for the establishment
of uniform coins, measures and weights, for the abolition of internal
customs, etc., in demands, that is to say, which were much more in the
interests of the city middle-class than in the interests of the
peasants. Concessions made to the nobility were a certain approach to
the modern system of redemption and aimed, finally, to transform feudal
land ownership into bourgeois ownership. In a word, so far as the
demands of the peasants were combined into a system of “imperial
reform,” they did not express the temporary demands of the peasants but
became subordinate to the general interests of the middle-class as a
whole.

While this reform of the empire was still being debated in Heilbronn,
the author of the Declaration of the Twelve Articles, Hans Berlin, was
already on his way to meet Truchsess, to negotiate in the name of the
honourables, the middle-class and the citizenry on the surrender of the
city. Reactionary movements within the city supported this betrayal, and
Wendel Hipler was obliged to flee, as were the peasants. He went to
Weinsberg where be attempted to assemble the remnants of the
Wuerttemberg peasants and those few of the Gaildorf troops which could
be mobilised. The approach of the Elector Palatine and of Truchsess,
however, drove him out of there and he was compelled to go to Wuerzburg
to cause the Gay Bright Troop to resume operations. In the meantime, the
armies of the Union and the Elector subdued the Neckar region, compelled
the peasants to take a new oath, burned many villages, and stabbed or
hanged all fleeing peasants that fell into their hands. To avenge the
execution of Helfenstein, Weinsberg was burned.

The troops that were assembled in front of Wuerzburg had in the meantime
besieged Frauenberg. On May 15, before a gap was made by their
fusillade, they bravely but unsuccessfully attempted to storm the
fortress. Four hundred of the best men, mostly of Florian Geyser’s host,
remained in the ditches, dead or wounded. Two days later, May 17, Wendel
Hipler appeared and ordered a military council. He proposed to leave at
Frauenberg only 4,000 men and to place the main force, about 20,000 men,
in a camp at Krautheim on the Jaxt, before the very eyes of Truchsess,
so that all reinforcements might be assembled there. The plan was
excellent. Only by keeping the masses together, and by a numerical
superiority, could one hope to defeat the army of the princes which now
numbered about 13,000 men. The demoralisation and discouragement of the
peasants, however, had gone too far to make any energetic action
possible. Goetz von Berlichingen, who soon afterwards openly appeared as
a traitor, may have helped to hold the troop back. Thus Hipler’s plan
was never put into action; the troops were divided as ever, and only on
May 23 did the Gay Bright Troop start action after the Franconians had
promised to follow quickly. On May 26, the detachments of the Margrave
of Anspach, located in Wuerzburg, were called, due to the word that the
Margrave had opened hostilities against the peasants. The rest of the
besieging army, with Florian Geyser’s Black Troop, took position at
Heidingsfeld not far from Wuerzburg.

The Gay Bright Troop arrived on May 24 in Krautheim in a condition far
from good. Many peasants learned that in their absence their villages
had taken the oath at Truchsess’ behest, and this they used as a pretext
to go home. The troops moved further to Neckarsulm, and on May 28
started negotiations with Truchsess. At the same time messengers were
sent to the peasants of Franconia, Alsace and Black Forest–Hegau, with
the demand to hurry reinforcements. From Neckarsulm Goetz marched
towards Oehringen. The troops melted from day to day. Goetz von
Berlichingen also disappeared during the march. He rode home, having
previously negotiated with Truchsess through his old brother-in-arms,
Dietrich Spaet, concerning his going over to the other side. In
Oehringen, a false rumour of the enemy approaching threw the helpless
and discouraged mass into a panic. The troop was rapidly disintegrating,
and it was with difficulty that Metzler and Wendel Hipler succeeded in
keeping together about 2,000 men, whom they again led towards Krautheim.
In the meantime, the Franconian army, 5,000 strong, had come, but in
consequence of a side march over Loewenstein towards Oehringen, ordered
by Goetz apparently with treacherous intentions, it missed the Gay Troop
and moved towards Neckarsulm. This small town, defended by a detachment
of the Gay Bright Troop, was besieged by Truchsess. The Franconians
arrived at night and saw the fires of the Union army, but their leaders
had not the courage to brave an attack. They retreated to Krautheim,
where they at last found the remainder of the Gay Bright Troop.
Receiving no aid, Neckarsulm surrendered on the 29th to the Union
troops. Truchsess immediately ordered 13 peasants executed, and went to
meet the troop, burning, pillaging and murdering all along the way
through the valleys of Neckar, Kocher and Jaxt. Heaps of ruins and
bodies of peasants hanging on trees marked his march.

At Krautheim the Union army met the peasants who, forced by a flank
movement of Truchsess, had withdrawn towards Koenigshofen on the Tauber.
Here they took their position, 8,000 in number, with 32 cannon.
Truchsess approached them, hidden behind hills and forests. He sent out
columns to envelop them, and on June 2, he attacked them with such a
superiority of forces and energy that in spite of the stubborn
resistance of several columns lasting into the night, they were defeated
and dispersed. As everywhere, the horsemen of the Union, “the peasants’
death,” were mainly instrumental in annihilating the insurgent army,
throwing themselves on the peasants, who were shaken by artillery gun
fire and lance attacks, disrupting their ranks completely, and killing
individual fighters. The kind of warfare conducted by Truchsess and his
horsemen is manifested in the fate of 300 Koenigshof middle-class men
united with the peasant army. During the battle, all but fifteen were
killed, and of these remaining fifteen, four were subsequently
decapitated.

Having thus completed his victory over the peasants of Odenwald, the
Neckar valley and lower Franconia, Truchsess subdued the entire region
by means of punitive expeditions, burning entire villages and causing
numberless executions. From there he moved towards Wuerzburg. On his way
he learned that the second Franconian troops under the command of
Florian Geyer and Gregor von Burg-Bernsheim was stationed at Sulzdorf.
He immediately moved against them.

Florian Geyer, who, after the unsuccessful attempt at storming
Frauenberg, had devoted himself mainly to negotiations with the princes
and the cities, especially with Rottenburg and Margrave Casimir of
Anspach, urging them to join the peasant fraternity, was suddenly
recalled in consequence of word of the Koenigshofen defeat. His troops
were joined by those of Anspach under the command of Gregor von
Burg-Bernsheim. The latter troops had been only recently formed.
Margrave Casimir had managed, in true Hohenzollern style, to keep in
check the peasant revolt in his region, partly by promises and partly by
the threat of amassing troops. He maintained complete neutrality towards
all outside troops as long as they did not include Anspach subjects. He
tried to direct the hatred of the peasants mainly towards the church
endowments, through the ultimate confiscation of which he hoped to
enrich himself. As soon as he received word of the Boetlingen battle, he
opened hostilities against his rebellious peasants, pillaging and
burning their villages, and hanging or otherwise killing many of them.
The peasants, however, quickly assembled, and under the command of
Gregor von Burg-Bernsheim defeated him at Windsheim, May 29. While they
were still pursuing him, the call of the hard-pressed Odenwald peasants
reached them, and they turned towards Heidingsfeld and from there with
Florian Geyer, again towards Wuerzburg (June 2). Still without word from
the Odenwald, they left 5,000 peasants there, and with the remaining
4,000 – many had run away – they followed the others. Reassured by false
rumours of the outcome of the Koenigshofen battle, they were attacked by
Truchsess at Sulzdorf and completely defeated. The horsemen and servants
of Truchsess perpetrated, as usual, a terrible massacre. Florian Geyer
kept the remainder of his Black Troop, 600 in number, and battled his
way through the village of Ingolstadt. He placed 200 men in the church
and cemetery and 400 in the castle. He had been pursued by the Elector
Palatine’s forces, of whom a column of 1,200 men captured the village
and set fire to the church. Those who did not perish in the flames were
slaughtered. The Elector’s troops then fired on the castle, made a gap
in the ancient wall, and attempted to storm it. Twice beaten back by the
peasants who stood hidden behind an internal wall, they shot the wall to
pieces, and attempted a third storming, which was successful. Half of
Geyser’s men were massacred; with the other 200 he managed to escape.
Their hiding place, however, was discovered the following day
(Whit-Monday). The Elector Palatine’s soldiers surrounded the woods in
which they lay hidden, and slaughtered all the men. Only seventeen
prisoners were taken during those two days. Florian Geyer again fought
his way through with a few of his most intrepid fighters and turned
towards the Gaildorf peasants, who had again assembled in a body of
about 7,000 men. Upon his arrival, he found them mostly dispersed, in
consequence of crushing news from every side. He made a last attempt to
assemble the dispersed peasants in the woods on June 9, but was attacked
by the troops, and fell fighting.

Truchsess, who, immediately after the Koenigshofen victory, had sent
word to the besieged Frauenberg, now marched towards Wuerzburg. The
council came to a secret understanding with him so that, on the night of
June 7, the Union army was in a position to surround the city where
5,000 peasants were stationed, and the following morning to march
through the gates opened by the council, without even lifting a sword.
By this betrayal of the Wuerzburg “honourables” the last troops of the
Franconian peasants were disarmed and all the leaders arrested.
Truchsess immediately ordered 81 of them decapitated. Here in Wuerzburg
the various Franconian princes appeared, one after the other, among them
the Bishop of Wuerzburg himself, the Bishop of Bamberg and the Margrave
of Brandenburg-Anspach. The gracious lords distributed the roles among
themselves. Truchsess marched with the Bishop of Bamberg, who presently
broke the agreement concluded with his peasants and offered his
territory to the raging hordes of the Union army, who pillaged,
massacred and burned. Margrave Casimir devastated his own land.
Teiningen was burned, numerous villages were pillaged or made fuel for
the flames. In every city the Margrave held a bloody court. In Neustadt,
on the Aisch, he ordered eighteen rebels beheaded, in the Buergel March,
forty-three suffered a similar fate. From there he went to Rottenburg
where the honourables, in the meantime, had made a counter revolution
and arrested Stephan von Menzingen. The Rottenburg lower middle-class
and plebeians were now compelled to pay heavily for the fact that they
behaved towards the peasants in such an equivocal way, refusing to help
them to the very last moment and in their local narrow-minded egotism
insisting on the suppression of the countryside crafts in favour of the
city guilds, and only unwillingly renouncing the city revenues flowing
from the feudal services of the peasants. The Margrave ordered sixteen
of them executed, Menzingen among them. In a similar manner the Bishop
of Wuerzburg marched through his region, pillaging, devastating and
burning everywhere. On his triumphal march he ordered 256 rebels to be
decapitated, and upon his return to Wuerzburg he crowned his work by
decapitating thirteen more from among the Wuerzburg rebels.

In the region of Mainz the viceroy, Bishop Wilhelm von Strassburg,
restored order without resistance. He ordered only four men executed.
Rheingau, where the peasants had also been restless, but where,
nevertheless, everybody had long before gone home, was subsequently
invaded by Frowen von Hutten, a cousin of Ulrich, and finally “pacified”
by the execution of twelve ringleaders. Frankfurt, which also had
witnessed revolutionary movements of a considerable size, was held in
check first by the conciliatory attitude of the council, then by
recruited troops in the Rhenish Palatinate. Eight thousand peasants had
assembled anew after the breach of agreement by the Elector, and had
again burned monasteries and castles, but the Archbishop of Trier came
to the aid of the Marshal of Zabern, and defeated them as early as May
23 at Pfedersheim. A series of atrocities (in Pfedersheim alone
eighty-two were executed) and the capture of Weissenburg on July 7
terminated the insurrection here.

Of all the divisions of troops there remained only two to be vanquished,
those of Hegau–Black Forest and of Allgaeu. Archduke Ferdinand had tried
intrigues with both. In the same way as Margrave Casimir and other
princes tried to utilise the insurrection to annex the church
territories and principalities, so Ferdinand wished to utilise it to
strengthen the power of the House of Austria. He had negotiated with the
Allgaeu commander, Walter Bach, and with the Hegau commander, Hans
Mueller, with the aim of inducing the peasants to declare their
adherence to Austria, but, both chiefs being venal, their influence with
the troops went only so far that the Allgaeu troop concluded an
armistice with the Archbishop and observed neutrality towards Austria.

Retreating from the Wuerttemberg region, the peasants of Hegau destroyed
a number of castles, and received reinforcements from the provinces of
the Margraviate of Baden. On May 13 they marched towards Freiburg; on
May 18 they bombarded it, and on May 23, the city having capitulated,
they entered it with flying colours. From there they moved towards
Stockach and Radolfzell, and waged a prolonged petty war against the
garrisons of those cities. The latter, together with the nobility and
other surrounding cities, appealed to the Lake peasants for help in
accordance with the Weingarten agreement. The former rebels of the Lake
Troop rose, 5,000 strong, against their former allies. So potent was the
narrow-mindedness of the peasants who were confined to their local
horizon, that only 600 refused to fight and expressed a desire to join
the Hegau peasants, for which they were slaughtered. The Hegau peasants,
themselves, persuaded by Hans Mueller of Bulgenbach, who had sold
himself to the enemy, lifted their siege, and Hans Mueller having run
away, most of them dispersed forthwith. The remaining ones entrenched
themselves on the Hilzingen Steep, where, on July 16, they were beaten
and annihilated by the troops that had in the meantime become free of
other engagements. The Swiss cities negotiated an agreement with the
Hegau peasants, which, however, did not prevent the other side from
capturing and murdering Hans Mueller, his Laufenburg betrayal
notwithstanding. In Breisgau, the city of Freiburg also deserted the
peasant Union (July 17) and sent troops against it, but because of the
weakness of the fighting forces of the princes, here as elsewhere, an
agreement was reached (September 18), which also included Sundgau. The
eight groups of the Black Forest and the Klettgau peasants, who were not
yet disarmed, were again driven to an uprising by the tyranny of Count
von Sulz, and were repulsed in October. On November 13, the Black Forest
peasants were forced into an agreement, and on December 6, Walzhut, the
last bulwark of the insurrection in the Upper Rhine, fell.

The Allgaeu peasants had, after the departure of Truchsess, renewed
their campaign against the monasteries and castles and were using
repressive measures in retaliation for the devastations caused by the
Union army. They were confronted by few troops which braved only
insignificant skirmishes, not being able to follow them into the woods.
In June, a movement against the honourables started in Memmingen which
had hitherto remained more or less neutral, and only the accidental
nearness of some Union troops which came in time to the rescue of the
nobility, made its suppression possible. Schapelar, the preacher and
leader of the plebeian movement, fled to St. Gallen. The peasants
appeared before the city and were about to start firing to break a gap,
when they learned of the approach of Truchsess on his way from
Wuerzburg. On June 27 they started against him, in two columns, over
Babenhausen and Oberguenzburg. Archduke Ferdinand again attempted to win
over the peasants to the House of Austria. Citing the armistice
concluded with the peasants, he demanded of Truchsess to march no
further against them. The Suabian Union, however, ordered Truchsess to
attack them, but to refrain from pillaging and burning. Truchsess,
however, was too clever to relinquish his primary and most effective
means of battle, even were he in a position to keep in order the
Lansquenets whom he had led between Lake Constance and the Main from one
excess to another. The peasants took a stand behind the Iller and the
Luibas, about 23,000 in number. Truchsess opposed them with 11,000. The
positions of both armies were formidable. The cavalry could not operate
on the territory that lay ahead, and if the Truchsess Lansquenets were
superior to the peasants in organisation, military resources and
discipline, the Allgaeu peasants counted in their ranks a host of former
soldiers and experienced commanders and possessed numerous well-manned
cannon. On July 19, the armies of the Suabian Union opened a cannonade
which was continued on every side on the 20th, but without result. On
July 21, Georg von Frundsberg joined Truchsess with 300 Lansquenets. He
knew many of the peasant commanders who had served under him in the
Italian military expeditions and he entered into negotiations with them.
Where military resources were insufficient, treason succeeded. Walter
Bach and several other commanders and artillerymen sold themselves. They
set fire to the powder store of the peasants and persuaded the troops to
make an enveloping movement, but as soon as the peasants left their
strong position they fell into the ambush placed by Truchsess in
collusion with Bach and the other traitors. They were less capable of
defending themselves since their traitorous commanders had left them
under the pretext of reconnoitering and were already on their way to
Switzerland. Thus two of the peasant camps were entirely disrupted. The
third, under Knopf of Luibas, was still in a position to withdraw in
order. It again took its position on the mountain of Kollen near
Kampten, where it was surrounded by Truchsess. The latter did not dare
to attack these peasants, but he cut them off from all supplies, and
tried to demoralise them by burning about 200 villages in the vicinity.
Hunger, and the sight of their burning homes, finally brought the
peasants to surrender (July 25). More than twenty were immediately
executed. Knopf of Luibas, the only leader of this troop who did not
betray his banner, fled to Biegenz. There he was captured, however, and
hanged, after a long imprisonment.

With this, the Peasant War in Suabia and Franconia came to an end.



CHAPTER 6 THE PEASANT WAR IN THURINGIA, ALSACE AND AUSTRIA


Immediately after the outbreak of the first movement in Suabia, Thomas
Muenzer again hurried to Thuringia, and since the end of February and
the beginning of March, he established his quarters in the free imperial
city of Muehlhausen, where his party was stronger than elsewhere. He
held the threads of the entire movement in his hand. He knew what storm
was about to break in Southern Germany, and he undertook to make
Thuringia the centre of the movement for North Germany. He found very
fertile soil. Thuringia, the main arena of the Reformation movement, was
in the grip of great unrest. The economic misery of the downtrodden
peasants, as well as the current revolutionary, religious and political
doctrine, had also prepared the neighbouring provinces, Hesse, Saxony,
and the region of the Harz, for the general uprising. In Muehlhausen
itself, whole masses of the lower middle-class had been won over to the
extreme Muenzer doctrine, and could hardly wait for the moment when they
would assert themselves by a superiority of numbers against the haughty
honourables. In order not to start before the proper moment, Muenzer was
compelled to appear in the role of moderator, but his disciple, Pfeifer,
who conducted the movement there, had committed himself to such an
extent that he could not hold back the outbreak, and as early as March
17, 1525, before the general uprising in Southern Germany, Muehlhausen
had its revolution. The old patrician council was overthrown, and the
government was handed over to the newly-elected “eternal council,” with
Muenzer as president.

The worst thing that can befall a leader of an extreme party is to be
compelled to take over a government in an epoch when the movement is not
yet ripe for the domination of the class which he represents and for the
realisation of the measures which that domination would imply. What he
_can_ do depends not upon his will but upon the sharpness of the clash
of interests between the various classes, and upon the degree of
development of the material means of existence, the relations of
production and means of communication upon which the clash of interests
of the classes is based every time. What he _ought_ to do, what his
party demands of him, again depends not upon him, or upon the degree of
development of the class struggle and its conditions. He is bound to his
doctrines and the demands hitherto propounded which do not emanate from
the interrelations of the social classes at a given moment, or from the
more or less accidental level of relations of production and means of
communication, but from his more or less penetrating insight into the
general result of the social and political movement. Thus he necessarily
finds himself in a dilemma. What he _can_ do is in contrast to all his
actions as hitherto practised, to all his principles and to the present
interests of his party; what he _ought_ to do cannot be achieved. In a
word, he is compelled to represent not his party or his class, but the
class for whom conditions are ripe for domination. In the interests of
the movement itself, he is compelled to defend the interests of an alien
class, and to feed his own class with phrases and promises, with the
assertion that the interests of that alien class are their own
interests. Whoever puts himself in this awkward position is irrevocably
lost. We have seen examples of this in recent times. We need only be
reminded of the position taken in the last French provisional government
by the representatives of the proletariat, though they represented only
a very low level of proletarian development. Whoever can still look
forward to official positions after having become familiar with the
experiences of the February government – not to speak of our own noble
German provisional governments and imperial regencies – is either
foolish beyond measure, or at best pays only lip service to the extreme
revolutionary party.

Muenzer’s position at the head of the “eternal council” of Muehlhausen
was indeed much more precarious than that of any modern revolutionary
regent. Not only the movement of his time, but the whole century, was
not ripe for the realisation of the ideas for which he himself had only
begun to grope. The class which he represented not only was not
developed enough and incapable of subduing and transforming the whole of
society, but it was just beginning to come into existence. The social
transformation that he pictured in his fantasy was so little grounded in
the then existing economic conditions that the latter were a preparation
for a social system diametrically opposed to that of which he dreamt.
Nevertheless, he was bound to his preachings of Christian equality and
evangelical community of possessions. He was at least compelled to make
an attempt at their realisation. Community of all possessions, universal
and equal labour duty, and the abolition of all authority were
proclaimed. In reality, Muehlhausen remained a republican imperial city
with a somewhat democratic constitution, with a senate elected by
universal suffrage and under the control of a forum, and with the
hastily improvised feeding of the poor. The social change, which so
horrified the Protestant middle-class contemporaries, in reality never
went beyond a feeble and unconscious attempt prematurely to establish
the bourgeois society of a later period.

Muenzer, himself, seems to have realised the wide abyss between his
theories and surrounding realities. This abyss must have been felt the
more keenly, the more distorted the views of this genius of necessity
appeared, reflected in the heads of the mass of his followers. He threw
himself into widening and organising the movement with a zeal rare even
for him. He wrote letters and sent out emissaries in all directions. His
letters and sermons breathed a revolutionary fanaticism which was
amazing in comparison with his former writings. Gone completely was the
naive youthful humour of Muenzer’s revolutionary pamphlets. The quiet
instructive language of the thinker which had been so characteristic of
him, appeared no more. Muenzer was now entirely a prophet of the
revolution. Incessantly he fanned the flame of hatred against the ruling
classes. He spurred the wildest passions, using forceful terms of
expression the like of which religious and nationalist delirium had put
into the mouths of the Old Testament prophets. The style up to which he
worked himself reveals the level of education of that public which he
was to affect. The example of Muehlhausen and the propaganda of Muenzer
had a quick and far-reaching effect. In Thuringia, Eichsfeld, Harz, in
the duchies of Saxony, in Hesse and Fulda, in Upper Franconia and in
Vogtland, the peasants arose, assembled in armies, and burned castles
and monasteries. Muenzer was more or less recognised as the leader of
the entire movement, and Muehlhausen remained the central point, while
in Erfurt a purely middle-class movement became victorious, and the
ruling party there constantly maintained an undecided attitude towards
the peasants.

In Thuringia, the princes were at the beginning just as helpless and
powerless in relation to the peasants as they had been in Franconia and
Suabia. Only in the last days of April, did the Landgrave of Hesse
succeed in assembling a corps. It was that same Landgrave Philipp, whose
piety is being praised so much by the Protestant and bourgeois histories
of the Reformation, and of whose infamies towards the peasants we will
presently have a word to say. By a series of quick movements and by
decisive action, Landgrave Philipp subdued the major part of his land.
He called new contingents, and then turned towards the region of the
Abbot of Fulda, who hitherto was his lord. On May 3, he defeated the
Fulda peasant troop at Frauenberg, subdued the entire land, and seized
the opportunity not only to free himself from the sovereignty of the
Abbot, but to make the Abbey of Fulda a vassalage of Hesse, naturally
pending its subsequent secularisation. He then took Eisenach and
Langensalza, and jointly with the Saxon troops, moved towards the
headquarters of the rebellious Muehlhausen. Muenzer assembled his forces
at Frankenhausen, 8,000 men and several cannons. The Thuringian troops
were far from possessing that fighting power which the Suabian and
Franconian troops developed in their struggle with Truchsess. The men
were poorly armed and badly disciplined. They counted few ex-soldiers
among them, and sorely lacked leadership. It appears that Muenzer
possessed no military knowledge whatsoever. Nevertheless, the princes
found it proper to use here the same tactics that so often helped
Truchsess to victory – breach of faith. On May 16, they entered
negotiations, concluded an armistice, but attacked the peasants before
the time of the armistice had elapsed.

Muenzer stood with his people on the mountain which is still called
Mount Battle (Schlachtberg), entrenched behind a barricade of wagons.
The discouragement among the troops was rapidly increasing. The princes
had promised them amnesty should they deliver Muenzer alive. Muenzer
assembled his people in a circle, to debate the princes’ proposals. A
knight and a priest expressed themselves in favour of capitulation.
Muenzer had them both brought inside the circle, and decapitated. This
act of terrorist energy, jubilantly met by the outspoken
revolutionaries, caused a certain halt among the troops, but most of the
men would have gone away without resistance had it not been noticed that
the princes’ Lansquenets, who had encircled the entire mountain, were
approaching in close columns, in spite of the armistice. A front was
hurriedly formed behind the wagons, but already the cannon balls and
guns were pounding the half-defenseless peasants, unused to battle, and
the Lansquenets reached the barricade. After a brief resistance, the
line of the wagons was broken, the peasants’ cannon captured, and the
peasants dispersed. They fled in wild disorder, and fell into the hands
of the enveloping columns and the cavalry, who perpetrated an appalling
massacre among them. Out of 8,000 peasants, over 5,000 were slaughtered.
The survivors arrived at Frankenhaus, and simultaneously with them, the
princes’ cavalry. The city was taken. Muenzer, wounded in the head, was
discovered in a house and captured. On May 25, Muehlhausen also
surrendered. Pfeifer, who had remained there, ran away, but was captured
in the region of Eisenach.

Muenzer was put on the rack in the presence of the princes, and then
decapitated. He went to his death with the same courage with which he
had lived. He was barely twenty-eight when he was executed. Pfeifer,
with many others, was also executed. In Fulda, that holy man, Philipp of
Hesse, had opened his bloody court. He and the Prince of Hesse ordered
many others to be killed by the sword – in Eisenach, twenty-four; in
Langensalza, forty-one; after the battle of Frankenhaus, 300; in
Muehlhausen, over 100; at German, twenty-six; at Tungeda, fifty; at
Sangenhausen, twelve; in Leipzig, eight, not to speak of mutilations and
the more moderate measures of pillaging and burning villages and cities.

Muehlhausen was compelled to give up its liberty under the empire, and
was incorporated into the Saxon lands, just as the Abbey of Fulda was
incorporated in the Landgraviate of Hesse.

The prince now moved through the forest of Thuringia, where Franconian
peasants of the Bildhaus camp had united with the Thuringians, and
burned many castles. A battle took place before Meiningen. The peasants
were beaten and withdrew towards the city, which closed its gates to
them, and threatened to attack them from the rear. The troops, thus
placed in a quandary by the betrayal of their allies, capitulated before
the prince, and dispersed, while negotiations were still under way. The
camp of Bildhaus had long dispersed, and with this, the remnants of the
insurgents of Saxony, Hesse, Thuringia and Upper Franconia, were
annihilated.

In Alsace the rebellion broke out after the movement had started on the
right side of the Rhine. The peasants of the bishopric of Strassbourg
arose as late as the middle of April. Soon after, there was an upheaval
of the peasants of Upper Alsace and Sundgau. On April 18, a contingent
of Lower Alsace peasants pillaged the monastery of Altdorf. Other troops
were formed near Ebersheim and Barr, as well as in the Urbis valley.
These were soon concentrated into the large Lower Alsace division and
proceeded in an organised way to take cities and towns and to destroy
monasteries. One out of every three men was called to the colours. The
Twelve Articles of this group were considerably more radical than those
of the Suabian and Franconian groups.

While one column of the Lower Alsace peasants first concentrated near
St. Hippolite early in May, attempting to take the city but without
success, and then, through an understanding with the citizens, came into
possession of Barken on May 10, of Rappoldtsweiler on May 13, and
Reichenweier on May 14, a second column under Erasmus Gerber marched to
attack Strassbourg by surprise. The attempt was unsuccessful, and the
column now turned towards the Vosges, destroyed the monastery of
Mauersmuenster, and besieged Zabern, taking it on May 13. From here it
moved towards the frontier of Lorraine and aroused the section of the
duchy adjoining the frontier, at the same time fortifying the mountain
passes. Two columns were formed at Herbolzheim on the Saar, and at
Neuburg, at Saargemund, 4,000 German-Lorraine peasants entrenched
themselves. Finally, two advanced troops, the Kolben in the Vosges at
Stuerzelbrunn, and the Kleeburg at Weissenburg, covered the front and
the right flank, while the left flank was adjoining those of Upper
Alsace.

The latter, in motion since April 20, had forced the city of Sulz into
the peasant fraternity on May 10, Gebweiler, on May 12, and Sennheim and
vicinity, May 15. The Austrian government and the surrounding imperial
cities immediately united against them, but they were too weak to offer
serious resistance, not to speak of attack. Thus, in the middle of May,
the whole of Alsace, with the exception of only a few cities, came into
the hands of the insurgents.

But already the army was approaching which was destined to break the
ungodly attack of the Alsace peasants. It was the French who effected
here the restoration of the nobility. Already, on May 16, Duke Anton of
Lorraine marched out with an army of 30,000, among them the flower of
the French nobility, as well as Spanish, Piedmontese, Lombardic, Greek
and Albanian auxiliary troops. On May 16 he met 4,000 peasants at
Luetzelstein whom he defeated without effort, and on the 17th he forced
Zabern, which was besieged by the peasants, to surrender. But even while
the Lorrainers were entering the city and the peasants were being
disarmed, the conditions of the surrender were broken. The defenseless
peasants were attacked by the Lansquenets and most of them were
slaughtered. The remaining Lower Alsace columns disbanded, and Duke
Anton went to meet the Upper Alsatians. The latter, who had refused to
join the Lower Alsatians at Zabern, were now attacked at Scherweiler by
the entire force of the Lorrainers. They resisted with great bravery,
but the enormous numerical superiority – 30,000 as against 7,000 – and
the betrayal of a number of knights, especially that of the magistrate
of Reichenweier, made all daring futile. They were totally beaten and
dispersed. The Duke subdued the whole of Alsace with the usual
atrocities. Only Sundgau was spared. By threatening to call him into the
land, the Austrian government forced the peasants to conclude the
Ensisheim agreement early in June. The government soon broke the
agreement, however, ordering numbers of preachers and leaders of the
movement to be hanged. The peasants made a new insurrection which ended
with the inclusion of the Sundgau peasants into the Offenburg agreement
(September 18).

There now remains only the report of the Peasant War in the Alpine
regions of Austria. These regions, as well as the adjoining
Archbishopric of Salzburg were in continuous opposition to the
government and the nobility ever since the Stara Prawa, and the
Reformation doctrines found there a fertile soil. Religious persecutions
and willful taxation brought the rebellion to a crisis.

The city of Salzburg, supported by the peasants and the pitmen, had been
in controversy with the Archbishop since 1522 over city privileges and
the freedom of religious practice. By the end of 1523, the Archbishop
attacked the city with recruited Lansquenets, terrorised it by a
cannonade from the castle, and persecuted the heretical preachers. At
the same time he imposed new crushing taxes, and thereby irritated the
population to the utmost. In the spring of 1525, simultaneously with the
Suabian-Franconian and Thuringian uprisings, the peasants and pitmen of
the entire country suddenly arose, organised themselves under the
commanders Brossler and Weitmoser, freed the city and besieged the
castle of Salzburg. Like the West German peasants, they organised a
Christian alliance and formulated their demands into fourteen articles.

In Styria, in Upper Austria, in Carinthia and Carniola, where new
extortionate taxes, duties and edicts had severely injured the interests
closest to the people, the peasants arose in the Spring of 1525. They
took a number of castles and at Grys, defeated the conqueror of the
Stara Prawa, the old field commander Dietrichstein. Although the
government succeeded in placating some of the insurgents with false
promises, the bulk of them remained together and united with the
Salzburg peasants, so that the entire region of Salzburg and the major
part of Upper Austria, Styria, Carinthia and Carniola were in the hands
of the peasants and pitmen.

In the Tyrol, the Reformation doctrines had also found adherence. Here
even more than in the other Alpine regions of Austria, Muenzer’s
emissaries had been successfully active. Archbishop Ferdinand persecuted
the preachers of the new doctrines here as elsewhere, and impinged the
rights of the population by arbitrary financial regulations. In
consequence, an uprising took place in the Spring of 1525. The
insurgents, whose commander was a Muenzer man named Geismaier, the only
noted military talent among all the peasant chiefs, took a great number
of castles, and proceeded energetically against the priests,
particularly in the south and the region of Etsch. The Vorarlberg
peasants also arose and joined the Allgaeu peasants.

The Archbishop, pressed from every side, now began to make concession
after concession to the rebels whom a short time before he had wished to
annihilate by means of burning, scourging, pillaging and murdering. He
summoned the Diets of the hereditary lands, and pending their
assembling, concluded an armistice with the peasants. In the meantime he
was strenuously arming, in order, as soon as possible, to be able to
speak to the ungodly ones in a different language.

Naturally, the armistice was not kept long. Dietrichstein, having run
short of cash, began to levy contributions in the duchies; his Slavic
and Magyar troops allowed themselves, besides, the most shameful
atrocities against the population. This brought the Styrians to new
rebellion. The peasants attacked Dietrichstein at Schladming during the
night of July 3rd and slaughtered everybody who did not speak German.
Dietrichstein himself was captured.

On the morning of July 4, the peasants organised a jury to try the
captives, and forty Czech and Croatian noble prisoners were sentenced to
death. This was effective. The Archbishop immediately consented to all
the demands of the estates of the five duchies (Upper and Lower Austria,
Styria, Carinthia and Carniola).

In Tyrol, the demands of the Diet were also granted, and thereby the
North was quieted. The South, however, insisting on its original demands
as against the much more moderate decisions of the Diet, remained under
arms. Only in December was the Archbishop in a position to restore order
by force. He did not fail to execute a great number of instigators and
leaders of the upheaval who fell into his hands.

Now 10,000 Bavarians moved against Salzburg, under Georg of Frundsberg.
This imposing military power, as well as the quarrels that had broken
out among the peasants, induced the Salzburg peasants to conclude an
agreement with the Archbishop, which came into being September 1, and
was also accepted by the Archduke. In spite of this, the two princes,
who had meanwhile considerably strengthened their troops, soon broke the
agreement and thereby drove the Salzburg peasants to a new uprising. The
insurgents held their own throughout the winter. In the Spring,
Geismaier came to them to open a splendid campaign against the troops
which were approaching from every side. In a series of brilliant battles
in May and June, 1526, he defeated the Bavarian, Austrian and Suabian
Union troops and the Lansquenets of the Archbishop of Salzburg, one
after another, and for a long time he prevented the various corps from
uniting. He also found time to besiege Radstadt. Finally, surrounded by
overwhelming forces, he was compelled to withdraw. He battled his way
through and led the remnants of his corps through the Austrian Alps into
Venetian territory. The republic of Venice and Switzerland offered the
indefatigable peasant chief starting points for new conspiracies. For a
whole year he was still attempting to involve them in a war against
Austria, which would have offered him an occasion for a new peasant
uprising. The hand of the murderer, however, reached him in the course
of these negotiations. Archbishop Ferdinand and the Archbishop of
Salzburg could not rest as long as Geismaier was alive. They therefore
paid a bandit who, in 1527, succeeded in removing the dangerous rebel
from among the living.



CHAPTER 7 SIGNIFICANCE OF THE PEASANT WAR


After Geismaier’s withdrawal into Venetian territory, the epilogue of
the Peasant War was ended. The peasants were everywhere brought again
under the sway of their ecclesiastical, noble or patrician masters. The
agreements that were concluded with them here and there were broken, and
heavy burdens were augmented by the enormous indemnities imposed by the
victors on the vanquished. The magnificent attempt of the German people
ended in ignominious defeat and, for a time, in greater oppression. In
the long run, however, the situation of the peasants did not become
worse. Whatever the nobility, princes and priests could wring out of the
peasants had been wrung out even before the war. The German peasant of
that time had this in common with the modern proletarian, that his share
in the products of the work was limited to a subsistence minimum
necessary for his maintenance and for the propagation of the race. It is
true that peasants of some little wealth were ruined. Hosts of bondsmen
were forced into serfdom; whole stretches of community lands were
confiscated; a great number of peasants were driven into vagabondage or
forced to become city plebeians by the destruction of their domiciles
and the devastation of their fields in addition to the general disorder.
Wars and devastations, however, were every-day phenomena at that time,
and in general, the peasant class was on too low a level to have its
situation made worse for a long time through increased taxes. The
subsequent religious wars and finally the Thirty Years’ War with its
constantly repeated mass devastations and depopulations pounded the
peasants much more painfully than did the Peasant War. It was notably
the Thirty Years’ War which annihilated the most important parts of the
productive forces in agriculture, through which, as well as through the
simultaneous destruction of many cities, it lowered the living standards
of the peasants, plebeians and the ruined city inhabitants to the level
of Irish misery in its worst form.

The class that suffered most from the Peasant War was the _clergy._ Its
monasteries and endowments were burned down; its valuables plundered,
sold into foreign countries, or melted; its stores of goods consumed.
They had been, least of all capable of offering resistance, and at the
same time the weight of the people’s old hatred fell heaviest upon them.
The other estates, princes, nobility and the middle-class, even
experienced a secret joy at the sufferings of the hated prelates. The
Peasant War had made popular the secularisation of the church estates in
favour of the peasants. The lay princes, and to a certain degree the
cities, determined to bring about secularisation in their own interests,
and soon the possessions of the prelates in Protestant countries were in
the hands of either the princes or the honourables. The power and
authority of the ecclesiastical princes were also infringed upon, and
the lay princes understood how to exploit the people’s hatred also in
this direction. Thus we have seen how the Abbot of Fulda was relegated
from a feudal lord of Philipp of Hesse to the position of his vassal.
Thus the city of Kempten forced the ecclesiastical prince to sell to it
for a trifle a series of precious privileges which he enjoyed in the
city.

The _nobility_ had also suffered considerably. Most of its castles were
destroyed, and a number of its most respected families were ruined and
could find means of subsistence only in the service of the princes. Its
powerlessness in relation to the peasants was proven. It had been beaten
everywhere and forced to surrender. Only the armies of the princes had
saved it. The nobility was bound more and more to lose its significance
as a free estate under the empire and to fall under the dominion of the
princes.

Nor did the _cities_ generally gain any advantages from the Peasant War.
The rule of the honourables was almost everywhere reestablished with new
force, and the opposition of the middle-class remained broken for a long
time. Old patrician routine thus dragged on, hampering commerce and
industry in every way, up to the French Revolution. Moreover, the cities
were made responsible by the princes for the momentary successes which
the middle-class or plebeian parties had achieved within their confines
during the struggle. Cities which had previously belonged to the princes
were forced to pay heavy indemnities, robbed of their privileges, and
made subject to the avaricious willfulness of the princes
(Frankenhausen, Arnstadt, Schmalkalden, Wurzburg, etc.), cities of the
empire were incorporated into territories of the princes (Muehlhausen),
or they were at least placed under moral dependence on the princes of
the adjoining territory, as was the case with many imperial cities in
Franconia.

The sole gainers under these conditions were the _princes_. We have seen
at the beginning of our exposition that low development of industry,
commerce and agriculture made the centralisation of the Germans into a
_nation_ impossible, that it allowed only local and provincial
centralisation, and that the princes, representing centralisation within
disruption, were the only class to profit from every change in the
existing social and political conditions. The state of development of
Germany in those days was so low and at the same time so different in
various provinces, that along with lay principalities there could still
exist ecclesiastical sovereignties, city republics, and sovereign counts
and barons. Simultaneously, however, this development was continually,
though slowly and feebly, pressing towards provincial centralisation,
towards subjugating all imperial estates under the princes. It is due to
this that only the princes could gain by the ending of the Peasant War.
This happened in reality. They gained not only relatively, through the
weakening of their opponents, the clergy, the nobility and the cities,
but also absolutely through the prizes of war which they collected. The
church estates were secularised in their favour; part of the nobility,
fully or partly ruined, was obliged gradually to place itself in their
vassalage; the indemnities of the cities and peasantry swelled their
treasuries, which, with the abolition of so many city privileges, had
now obtained a much more extended field for financial operations.

The decentralisation of Germany, the widening and strengthening of which
was the chief result of the war, was at the same time the cause of its
failure.

We have seen that Germany was split not only into numberless independent
provinces almost totally foreign to each other, but that in every one of
these provinces the nation was divided into various strata of estates
and parts of estates. Besides princes and priests we find nobility and
peasants in the countryside; patricians, middle-class and plebeians in
the cities. At best, these classes were indifferent to each other’s
interests if not in actual conflict. Above all these complicated
interests there still were the interests of the empire and the pope. We
have seen that, with great difficulty, imperfectly, and differing in
various localities, these various interests finally formed three great
groups. We have seen that in spite of this grouping, achieved with so
much labour, every estate opposed the line indicated by circumstances
for the national development, every estate conducting the movement of
its own accord, coming into conflict not only with the conservatives but
also with the rest of the opposition estates. Failure was, therefore,
inevitable. This was the fate of the nobility in Sickingen’s uprising,
the fate of the peasants in the Peasant War, of the middle-class in
their tame Reformation. This was the fate even of the peasants and
plebeians who in most localities of Germany could not unite for common
action and stood in each other’s way. We have also seen the causes of
this split in the class struggle and the resultant defeat of the
middle-class movement.

How local and provincial decentralisation and the resultant local and
provincial narrow-mindedness ruined the whole movement, how neither
middle-class nor peasantry nor plebeians could unite for concerted
national action; how the peasants of every province acted only for
themselves, as a rule refusing aid to the insurgent peasants of the
neighbouring region, and therefore being annihilated in individual
battles one after another by armies which in most cases counted hardly
one-tenth of the total number of the insurgent masses – all this must be
quite clear to the reader from this presentation. The armistices and the
agreements concluded by individual groups with their enemies also
constituted acts of betrayal of the common cause, and the grouping of
the various troops not according to the greater or smaller community of
their own actions, the only possible grouping, but according to the
community of the special adversary to whom they succumbed, is striking
proof of the degree of the mutual alienation of the peasants in various
provinces.

The analogy with the movement of 1848–50 is here also apparent. In 1848
as in the Peasant War, the interests of the opposition classes clashed
with each other and each acted of its own accord. The bourgeoisie,
developed sufficiently not to tolerate any longer the feudal and
bureaucratic absolutism, was not powerful enough to subordinate the
claims of other classes to its own interests. The proletariat, too weak
to be able to count on skipping the bourgeois period and immediately
conquering power for itself, had, still under absolutism, tasted too
well the sweetness of bourgeois government, and was generally far too
developed to identify for one moment its own emancipation with the
emancipation of the bourgeoisie. The mass of the nation, small bourgeois
artisans and peasants, were left in the lurch by their nearest and
natural allies, the bourgeoisie, because they were too revolutionary,
and partly by the proletariat because they were not sufficiently
advanced. Divided in itself, this mass of the nation achieved nothing,
while opposing their fellow opponents on the right and the left. As to
provincial narrow-mindedness, it could hardly have been greater in 1525
among the peasants than it was among the classes participating in the
movement of 1848. The hundred local revolutions as well as the hundred
local reactions following them and completed without hindrance, the
retention of the split into numerous small states – all this speaks loud
enough indeed. _He who, after the two German revolutions, of 1525 and
1848, and their results, still dreams of a federated republic, belongs
in a house for the insane._

Still, the two revolutions, that of the Sixteenth Century and that of
1848–50, are, in spite of all analogies, materially different from each
other. The revolution of 1848 bespeaks, if not the progress of Germany,
the progress of Europe.

Who profited by the revolution of 1525? The princes. Who profited by the
revolution of 1848? The big princes, Austria and Prussia. Behind the
princes of 1525 there stood the lower middle-class of the cities, held
chained by means of taxation. Behind the big provinces of 1850, there
stood the modern big bourgeoisie, quickly subjugating them by means of
the State debt. Behind the big bourgeoisie stand the proletarians.

The revolution of 1525 was a local German affair. The English, French,
Bohemians and Hungarians had already gone through their peasant wars
when the Germans began theirs. If Germany was decentralised, Europe was
so to a much greater extent. The revolution of 1848 was not a local
German affair, it was one phase of a great European movement. The moving
forces throughout the period of its duration were not confined to the
narrow limits of one individual country, not even to the limits of
one-quarter of the globe. In fact, the countries which were the arena of
the revolution were least active in producing it. They were more or less
unconscious raw materials without will of their own. They were molded in
the course of movement in which the entire world participated, a
movement which under existing social conditions may appear to us as an
alien power, but which, in the end, is nothing but our own. This is why
the revolution of 1848–50 could not end in the way that the revolution
of 1525 ended.

THE END



THE TWELVE ARTICLES OF THE PEASANTS


The fundamental and correct chief articles of all the peasants and of
those subject to ecclesiastical lords, relating to these matters in
which they feel themselves aggrieved.

_M cccc, quadratum, Ix et duplicatum_
_V cum transit, christiana secta peribit._
_Peace to the Christian Reader and the Grace of God through Christ._

There are many evil writings put forth of late which take occasion, on
account of the assembling of the peasants, to cast scorn upon the
gospel, saying: Is this the fruit of the new teaching, that no one
should obey but all should everywhere rise in revolt and rush together
to reform or perhaps destroy altogether the authorities, both
ecclesiastic and lay? The articles below shall answer these godless and
criminal fault-finders, and serve in the first place to remove the
reproach from the word of God, and in the second place to give a
Christian excuse for the disobedience or even the revolt of the entire
Peasantry. In the first place the Gospel is not the cause of revolt and
disorder, since it is the message of Christ, the promised Messiah, the
Word of Life, teaching only love, peace, patience and concord. Thus, all
who believe in Christ should learn to be loving, peaceful,
long-suffering and harmonious. This is the foundation of all the
articles of the peasants (as will be seen) who accept the Gospel and
live according to it. How then can the evil reports declare the Gospel
to be a cause of revolt and disobedience? That the authors of the evil
reports and the enemies of the Gospel oppose themselves to these demands
is due, not to the Gospel, but to the Devil, the worst enemy of the
Gospel, who causes this opposition by raising doubts in the minds of his
followers, and thus the word of God, which teaches love, peace and
concord, is overcome. In the second place, it is clear that the peasants
demand that this Gospel be taught them as a guide in life and they ought
not to be called disobedient or disorderly. Whether God grant the
peasants (earnestly wishing to live according to His word) their
requests or no, who shall find fault with the will of the Most High? Who
shall meddle in His judgments or oppose his majesty? Did be not hear the
children of Israel when they called upon Him and saved them out of the
hands of Pharaoh? Can He not save His own to-day? Yes, He will save them
and that speedily. Therefore, Christian reader, read the following
articles with care and then judge. Here follow the articles:

_The First Article_. – First, it is our humble petition and desire, as
also our will and resolution, that in the future we should have power
and authority so that each community should choose and appoint a pastor,
and that we should have the right to depose him should he conduct
himself improperly. The pastor thus chosen should teach us the Gospel
pure and simple, without any addition, doctrine or ordinance of man. For
to teach us continually the true faith will lead us to pray God that
through His grace this faith may increase within us and become part of
us. For if His grace work not within us we remain flesh and blood, which
availeth nothing; since the Scripture clearly teaches that only through
true faith can we come to God. Only through His mercy can we become
holy. Hence such a guide and pastor is necessary and in this fashion
grounded upon the Scriptures.

_The Second Article_. – According as the just tithe is established by
the Old Testament and fulfilled in the New, we are ready and willing to
pay the fair tithe of grain. The word of God plainly provided that in
giving according to right to God and distributing to His people the
services of a pastor are required. We will that, for the future, our
church provost, whomsoever the community may appoint, shall gather and
receive this tithe. From this he shall give to the pastor, elected by
the whole community, a decent and sufficient maintenance for him and
his, as shall seem right to the whole community (or, with the knowledge
of the community). What remains over shall be given to the poor of the
place, as the circumstances and the general opinion demand. Should
anything farther remain, let it be kept, lest any one should have to
leave the country from poverty. Provision should also be made from this
surplus to avoid laying any land tax on the poor. In case one or more
villages themselves have sold their tithes on account of want, and each
village has taken action as a whole, the buyer should not suffer loss,
but we will that some proper agreement be reached with him for the
repayment of the sum by the village with due interest. But those who
have tithes which they have not purchased from a village, but which were
appropriated by their ancestors, should not, and ought not, to be paid
anything farther by the village which shall apply its tithes to the
support of the pastors elected as above indicated, or to solace the poor
as is taught by the Scriptures. The small tithes, whether ecclesiastical
or lay, we will not pay at all, for the Lord God created cattle for the
free use of man. We will not, therefore, pay farther an unseemly tithe
which is of man’s invention.

_The Third Article_. – It has been the custom hitherto for men to hold
us as their own property, which is pitiable enough, considering that
Christ has delivered and redeemed us all, without exception, by the
shedding of His precious blood, the lowly as well as the great.
Accordingly, it is consistent with Scripture that we should be free and
wish to be so. Not that we would wish to be absolutely free and under no
authority. God does not teach us that we should lead a disorderly life
in the lusts of the flesh, but that we should love the Lord our God and
our neighbour. We would gladly observe all this as God has commanded us
in the celebration of the communion. He has not commanded us not to obey
the authorities, but rather that we should be humble, not only towards
those in authority, but towards every one. We are thus ready to yield
obedience according to God’s law to our elected and regular authorities
in all proper things becoming to a Christian. We, therefore, take it for
granted that you will release us from serfdom as true Christians, unless
it should be shown us from the Gospel that we are serfs.

_The Fourth Article_. – In the fourth place it has been the custom
heretofore, that no poor man should be allowed to catch venison or wild
fowl or fish in flowing water, which seems to us quite unseemly and
unbrotherly as well as selfish and not agreeable to the word of God. In
some places the authorities preserve the game to our great annoyance and
loss, recklessly permitting the unreasoning animals to destroy to no
purpose our crops which God suffers to grow for the use of man, and yet
we must remain quiet. This is neither godly or neighbourly. For when God
created man he gave him dominion over all the animals, over the birds of
the air and over the fish in the water. Accordingly it is our desire if
a man holds possession of waters that he should prove from satisfactory
documents that his right has been unwittingly acquired by purchase. We
do not wish to take it from him by force, but his rights should be
exercised in a Christian and brotherly fashion. But whosoever cannot
produce such evidence should surrender his claim with good grace.

_The Fifth Article_. – In the fifth place we are aggrieved in the matter
of wood-cutting, for the noble folk have appropriated all the woods to
themselves alone. If a poor man requires wood he must pay double for it
(or, perhaps, two pieces of money). It is our opinion in regard to wood
which has fallen into the hands of a lord whether spiritual or temporal,
that unless it was duly purchased it should revert again to the
community. It should, moreover, be free to every member of the community
to help himself to such fire-wood as he needs in his home. Also, if a
man requires wood for carpenter’s purposes he should have it free, but
with the knowledge of a person appointed by the community for that
purpose. Should, however, no such forest be at the disposal of the
community let that which has been duly bought be administered in a
brotherly and Christian manner. If the forest, although unfairly
appropriated in the first instance, was later duly sold let the matter
be adjusted in a friendly spirit and according to the Scriptures.

_The Sixth Article_. – Our sixth complaint is in regard the excessive
services demanded of us which are increased from day to day. We ask that
this matter be properly looked into so that we shall not continue to be
oppressed in this way, but that some gracious consideration be given us,
since our forefathers were required only to serve according to the word
of God.

_The Seventh Article._ – Seventh, we will not hereafter allow ourselves
to be farther oppressed by our lords, but will let them demand only what
is just and proper according to the word of the agreement between the
lord and the peasant. The lord should no longer try to force more
services or other dues from the peasant without payment, but permit the
peasant to enjoy his holding in peace and quiet. The peasant should,
however, help the lord when it is necessary, and at proper times when it
will not be disadvantageous to the peasant and for a suitable payment.

_The Eighth Article._ – In the eighth place, we are greatly burdened by
holdings which cannot support the rent exacted from them. The peasants
suffer loss in this way and are ruined, and we ask that the lords may
appoint persons of honour to inspect these holdings, and fix a rent in
accordance with justice, so that the peasants shall not work for
nothing, since the labourer is worthy of his hire.

_The Ninth Article_. – In the ninth place, we are burdened with a great
evil in the constant making of new laws. We are not judged according to
the offense, but sometimes with great ill will, and sometimes much too
leniently. In our opinion we should be judged according to the old
written law so that the case shall be decided according to its merits,
and not with partiality.

_The Tenth Article_. – In the tenth place, we are aggrieved by the
appropriation by individuals of meadows and fields which at one time
belonged to a community. These we will take again into our own hands. It
may, however, happen that the land was rightfully purchased. When,
however, the land has unfortunately been purchased in this way, some
brotherly arrangement should be made according to circumstances.

_The Eleventh Article_. – In the eleventh place we will entirely abolish
the due called _Todfall_ (that is, heriot) and will no longer endure it,
nor allow widows and orphans to be thus shamefully robbed against God’s
will, and in violation of justice and right, as has been done in many
places, and by those who should shield and protect them. These have
disgraced and despoiled us, and although they had little authority they
assumed it. God will suffer this no more, but it shall be wholly done
away with, and for the future no man shall be bound to give little or
much.

_Conclusion._ – In the twelfth place it is our conclusion and final
resolution, that if any one or more of the articles here set forth
should not be in agreement with the word of God, as we think they are,
such article we will willingly recede from when it is proved really to
be against the word of God by a clear explanation of the Scripture. Or
if articles should now be conceded to us that are hereafter discovered
to be unjust, from that hour they shall be dead and null and without
force. Likewise, if more complaints should be discovered which are based
upon truth and the Scriptures and relate to offenses against God and our
neighbour, we have determined to reserve the right to present these
also, and to exercise ourselves in all Christian teaching. For this we
shall pray God, since He can grant these, and He alone. The peace of
Christ abide with us all.



COMMENTS BY D. RIAZANOV


Four hundred years have passed since the great Peasant War in Germany.
It differs from similar peasant uprisings of the Fourteenth Century in
Italy, France and England, in that these uprisings were of a more or
less local character and were directed against the money economy then in
the process of development, while the Peasant War, unfolding in the
epoch of early capitalism which was creating a world market, was
intimately related to the events of the Reformation. This more complex
historic background, compared with the background of the Fourteenth
Century, rendered more complex the class grouping whose struggle
determined the whole course of the Peasant War. The role of proletarian
elements also becomes more pronounced compared with earlier uprisings.

It was natural that, with the growth of a democratic movement in
Germany, especially after the July Revolution in France, attention
should be directed towards the study of the great Peasant War. A series
of popular brochures and works examining individual phases of the
movement made their appearance, and in 1841 there was published the
monumental work of [Wilhelm] Zimmermann, which, to the present time,
remains the most detailed narrative of the events of the Peasant War in
Germany.

It was also natural that the German communists, confronted with the
necessity of determining how far the peasantry could be relied upon as a
revolutionary factor, should have carefully studied the history of the
Peasant War. Their attention was particularly drawn to the leaders of
the Peasant War, one of whom was Thomas Muenzer. It is characteristic
that as early as 1845, Engels, in one of his first articles for the
Chartist “Northern Star,” called the attention of the English workers to
this “famous leader of the Peasant War of 1525,” who, according to
Engels, was a real democrat, and fought for real demands, not illusions.

Marx and Engels, who very soberly regarded the role of the peasantry in
the realization of a _social_ revolution never underestimated its role
as a revolutionary factor in the struggle against the large landowners
and the feudal masters. They understood very well that the more the
peasantry falls under the leadership of revolutionary classes which
unite it, the more capable it is of general political actions. Led by
the revolutionary proletariat, supporting its struggle against
capitalism in the city and the village, the peasantry appeared to be a
very important ally. This is why Marx and Engels, during the revolution
of 1848–49, mercilessly exposed the cowardly conduct of the German
bourgeoisie, which, currying favour with the Junkers and afraid of the
proletariat, had refused to defend the interests of the peasantry.

It was with the aim of instructing the German bourgeois democracy that
in 1850, Engels, supported by the factual material collected by the
democrat, Zimmermann, wrote this splendid account of the German Peasant
War. First, he gives a picture of the economic situation and of the
class composition of Germany of that time. Then he shows how out of this
soil spring the various opposition groups with their programmes, and
gives a colourful characterisation of Luther and Muenzer. The third
chapter contains a brief history of the peasant uprisings in the German
Empire from 1476 to 1517, that is, to the beginning of the Reformation.
In the fourth chapter we have the history of the uprising of the
nobility under the leadership of Franz von Sickingen and Ulrich von
Hutten. The fifth and sixth chapters contain a narrative of the events
of the Peasant War as such, with a detailed explanation of the main
causes of the peasants’ defeat. In the seventh and last chapters the
significance of the Peasant War and its consequences in German history
are explained.

Permeating the whole of Engels’ work is the idea of the necessity of a
merciless struggle against the feudal masters, the landlords. Only a
radical abolition of all traces of feudal domination, he said, could
create the most favourable conditions for the success of a proletarian
revolution. In this respect Engels was in full harmony with Marx, who
wrote to him later (August 16, 1856), “Everything in Germany will depend
upon whether it will be possible to support the proletarian revolution
by something like a second edition of the Peasant War. Only then will
everything proceed well.”

Quite different was the conception of Lassalle, who overestimated the
significance of the uprising of the nobility, idealized Franz von
Sickingen and Ulrich von Hutten, and treated the revolutionary movement
of the lower plebeian strata too contemptuously. In his opinion, the
Peasant War, notwithstanding its revolutionary appearance, was in
reality a reactionary movement. “You all know,” he said to the Berlin
workers, “that the peasants killed the nobles and burned their castles,
or, according to the prevailing habit, made them run the gauntlet.
However, notwithstanding this revolutionary appearance, the movement
was, in substance and principle, _reactionary_.”

The Russian revolutionary populists, especially the adherents of
Bakunin, often identified Lassalle’s view of the peasants with the views
of Marx and Engels. In this they followed Bakunin’s lead, who wrote the
following:

“Everybody knows that Lassalle repeatedly expressed the idea that the
defeat of the peasant uprising in the Fourteenth Century and the
strengthening and rapid growth of the bureaucratic state in Germany that
followed it were a veritable triumph for the revolution.” According to
Bakunin, the German communists viewed all peasants as elements of
reaction. “The fact is,” he added, “that the Marxists cannot think
otherwise; worshippers of state power at any price, they are bound to
curse every people’s revolution, especially a peasant revolution, which
is anarchic by its very nature, and which proceeds directly to
annihilate the state.”

When Bakunin wrote these lines, there was already in existence the
second edition of Engels’ work on the Peasant War, with a new preface
(1870), in which the inconsistency of Liebknecht and other contemporary
German social-democrats on the agrarian question was criticised. In
1875, the third edition appeared, with an addendum which emphasised
still more the sharp difference between the views of Marx and Engels on
the one hand, and Lassalle on the other.

It must be noted that in the last years of his life, Engels devoted much
labour to the study of the Peasant War, and was about to recast his old
work.

In 1882 be wrote a special addition to his _Socialism, Utopian and
Scientific_, devoted to the history of the German peasantry. On December
31, 1884, he wrote to Sorge: “I am subjecting my _Peasant War_ to
radical reconstruction. It is going to become a cornerstone of German
history. It is a great piece of work. All the preliminary work is almost
ready.”

The work of preparing the second and third volumes of _Capital_ for
publication, prevented him from carrying out his plan. In July, 1893, he
wrote to Mehring, “If I succeed in reconstructing anew the historic
introduction to my _Peasant War,_ which I hope will be possible during
this winter, I will give there an exposition of my views” [concerning
the conditions of the breaking up of Germany and the causes of the
defeat of the German bourgeois revolution of the Sixteenth Century].

When Kautsky was writing his book on the forerunners of modern socialism
– it appeared in parts – Engels wrote to him on May 21, 1895: “Of your
book, I can tell you that the further it proceeds, the better it
becomes. Compared with the original plan, Plato and early Christianity
are not sufficiently worked out. The mediaeval sects are much better,
and the later ones, more so. Best of all are the Taborites, Muenzer, and
the Anabaptists. I have learned much from your book. For my recasting of
the _Peasant War,_ it is an indispensable preliminary work.

“In my judgment, there are only two considerable faults:

“(1) A very insufficient insight into the development and the role of
those elements entirely outside of the feudal hierarchy, which are
déclassé, occupying almost the place of pariahs; elements that form the
lowest stratum of the population of every medieval city, without rights
and outside the rural community, the feudal dependence, the guild bonds.
This is difficult, but it is the _chief foundation_, since gradually,
with the decomposition of feudal relations, out of this stratum develops
the predecessor of the proletariat which, in 1789, in the faubourgs of
Paris, made the revolution. You speak of the proletarians, but this
expression is not entirely exact; when you count among your
‘proletarians’ the weavers, whose significance you picture very
correctly, you may rightly do so, only beginning from that epoch when
the déclassé non-guild journeyman weavers made their appearance and only
in so far as the latter were in existence. Much work is still required
in this connection.

“(2) You have not sufficiently taken into account the situation of the
world market, in so far as one could speak of such a market at that
time, and the international economic situation of Germany at the end of
the Fifteenth Century. However, only this situation explains why the
bourgeois-plebeian movement under a religious cloak, having suffered
defeat in England, the Netherlands and Bohemia, could achieve a measure
of success in Germany in the Sixteenth Century. This was due to its
religious cloak, whereas the success of its bourgeois _contents_ was
reserved for the following century and for the countries which had
utilized the development of the world market that had in the meantime
taken another direction, namely, Holland and England. It is a great
subject, which I hope to be able to treat briefly in the _Peasant War,_
if I only succeed in taking it up!”

Death – Engels died several days after the writing of this letter
(August 5, 1895) – prevented him from completing this work.

D. RIAZANOV.
_Moscow, July 1925_



FACSIMILE OF OPENING PAGES FROM THE 1870 EDITION


[two pages of gothic print]



NOTES FIRST APPENDED TO THE RUSSIAN EDITION OF 1926


1. WILHELM ZIMMERMANN – German historian and poet. Born January 2, 1807,
in Stuttgart, in the family of an artisan. Graduated gymnasium in
Stuttgart, studied in the University of Tuebingen together with F.
Strauss. Was first pastor, then professor in the Polytechnic School of
Stuttgart, occupying the chair of history, German language and
literature. On April 23, 1848, be was elected representative of the
National Assembly (Frankfurt). In St. Paul’s Cathedral he joined the
extreme left group of representatives. In 1850, he was deprived of the
University chair for actively participating in the March revolution. In
1854, he renewed his activities as pastor in Zabergau. He died September
22, 1888.

As a historian, Wilhelm Zimmermann is known by his book, _The History of
the Great Peasant War_ (1841, 2nd ed., 1856, 3rd ed., 1891). Zimmermann
left a series of works on history, history of literature, and poetry:
_The History of the Hohenstaufens_ (2nd ed., _1865), Illustrated History
of the German People, History of Poetry of All Nations_ (1947), etc.

_The History of the Great Peasant War,_ Zimmermann’s chief historic
work, was written with astonishing mastery and objectivity. The author
utilised documents and materials mainly of the Stuttgart archive.
Generally speaking, Zimmermann’s work remains the fullest presentation
of the facts relating to the Peasant War. The objectivity of his
presentation and “the revolutionary instinct which makes him an advocate
of the oppressed classes” gives the book a special interest. But even in
this book the radical bourgeois makes himself felt. Zimmermann’s
negative attitude toward socialism and communism does not allow him
correctly to appreciate the conflict of classes in the history of the
peasant wars.

Kautsky’s book, _Forerunners of Socialism,_ supplements that of Engels
and corrects some inaccuracies in his presentation. The excerpts from
Muenzer’s speech which are quoted by Engels as parts of the sermon given
before the princes of Saxony after the destruction by the people of St.
Mary’s Chapel in Moellerbach, were written by Muenzer on an entirely
different occasion in a polemic work against Luther. Engels here depends
on Zimmermann.

Kautsky corrected Zimmermann in another more important question.
Zimmermann depicts Muenzer as a man towering above his epoch. In his
book, Kautsky proved this standpoint to be unfounded:

“Muenzer was superior to his communist followers, not by philosophical
gifts and organisational talents, but by his revolutionary energy, and,
first of all, by his statesmanlike mind.”

Even some of the facts in the history of Muenzer’s dictatorship in
Muehlhausen, as given by Engels, need correction in some details.
Muenzer was not at the head of the Muehlhausen council. Pfeifer was not
his disciple, but a representative of a middle-class faction.

2. LOUIS XI – King of France, son of Charles VII. Born 1423, reigned
1461–1483. He founded the absolute monarchy on the ruins of feudalism in
France, and extended the boundaries of his country to the Jura, the
Alps, and the Pyrenees. In his youth, as dauphin, Louis participated in
the uprising of the nobility against Charles VII. Having ascended the
throne after the death of his father, he started a fight against the
feudal lords but was opposed by the Common Welfare League which united
the big and small feudal lords of France. In his wars against the
League, Louis, instead of using the crude methods of feudal policies,
practised not only force but cunning, a diplomatic system of lies,
deception and caution. Louis XI was defeated and compelled to sign a
peace pact with the feudal lords on October 29, 1461. But peace with the
feudal lords was not achieved. Aided by the commercial class, he started
a new war in November, 1470. All of western France rose against him, but
this time he was victorious. In order to be able more successfully to
oppose the feudal lords, Louis XI decided to reform the army by freeing
the cities from military duties, and to create an army of 50,000. His
infantry consisted of Swiss hirelings. In 1481, he added Provence and
Liége to his domains and subdued the whole of France outside of Navarre
and the duchy of Breton. The absolute power of Louis XI could establish
itself in France only through the support of the commercial elements.
Louis XI in his turn protected commerce, industry and agriculture. Under
his reign the old institution of the Roman empire, the mail, was
restored.

3. CAROLINA – A criminal code of the Sixteenth Century, published in
1532 under Emperor Charles V. In the Sixteenth Century, Germany counted
over 300 states, each having its own criminal laws with its own methods
of cruelty. Justice at that time aimed at extorting a confession from
the prisoner by means of torture. The prevailing Roman law, in the hands
of the princes, was a cruel tool for the exploitation of the people. The
development of a money economy, however, and the growth of absolutism,
demanded a uniform criminal legislation and a reform of the existing
laws. Attempts at reform had been made in Germany as early as the end of
the Fifteenth and the beginning of the Sixteenth Century. The Reichstag,
meeting in Augsburg and Regensburg in 1532, finally adopted a draft of a
criminal code known as Carolina (‘Emperor Charles V’s and the Holy Roman
Empire’s order of Penal Law’). This code did not abolish the Roman law,
but was an attempt only to combine the prevailing Roman with the local
law. Neither did the Carolina abolish the codes of the separate states,
the new code serving only as a sort of guide for the princes and
electors. The new code brought insignificant changes in the court
procedure. It mitigated the inquisitional order of investigation and
defined the right of defense. But torture as a means of examination of
the defendant was retained in the new code. The chapters concerning the
‘cutting of ears,’ ‘cutting of noses,’ ‘burning,’ ‘quartering,’ adorned
the new code as well. The code retained its great importance, however,
up to the Eighteenth Century.

4. WALDENSES – A religious sect which sprang up in the cities of
southern France in the middle of the Twelfth Century. The cities of
northern Italy and southern France of that time represented very
favourable ground for the development of a religious reformist movement.
Commerce and industry had developed here earlier than in the west; the
bourgeoisie had come into existence, the crafts flourished. But while
the cities of northern Italy, which were partly interested in the
exploitation of Rome, since they derived from it no small profits, began
to show spiritual independence only in relation to the doctrines of the
Catholic Church, the cities of southern France, which were no less
developed economically but at the same time less dependent upon Rome,
started the first serious upheaval against the pope’s domination.

According to the legend, the sect of the Waldenses was founded by a rich
merchant of Lyons called Petrus Waldus. It is possible, however, that it
existed prior to that time. Petrus Waldus decided to follow the law of
the Gospel. He distributed his possessions among the poor, gathered
around himself a considerable number of followers, and began preaching
(1176). Soon the Waldenses combined in Lombardy with the sect of the
Humiliates, who also called themselves the paupers of Lyons. The
Waldenses did not confine their preachings to southern France. We find
them also in Italy, Germany and Bohemia. In southern France, as
elsewhere, they recruited their followers from among the artisans,
particularly the weavers.

Originally, the Waldenses did not plan to secede from the church. But
their free reading of the Gospel and their lay preachings, their
disagreement with Catholicism in understanding the mysteries of
transubstantiation, as well as their militant character, compelled the
official authorities, the clergy, to start a campaign of cruel
persecution against them. Pope Sixtus IV even declared a crusade against
them in 1477. Those persecutions continued down to the Eighteenth
Century. In 1685, French and Italian armies killed 3,000 Waldenses and
captured 1,000. Only in 1848 did they attain civil rights and religious
freedom in Piedmont and Savoy. Italian Waldenses are to be found even at
present in the Alpine valleys, Val-Martino, Val-Angrona. The Twentieth
Century finds 46 communities of Waldenses with 6,276 parishioners.

The Evangelist communism of the Waldenses in the Middle Ages was of a
monklike character. For the ‘perfect’ members of their community they
made communism and celibacy obligatory. The ‘disciples,’ however, were
allowed to marry and to possess property. The Waldenses rejected
military service and the oath. They devoted their attention to the
education of the masses. In those communities of the Waldenses where the
peasants and the middle-class prevailed, they turned into a
bourgeois–democratic sect. Where the proletarian elements prevailed, the
Waldenses became communist ‘dreamers.’

5. ARNOLD OF BRESCIA – Made the first serious attempt to reform the
Catholic Church as early as the middle of the Twelfth Century. Arnold of
Brescia was born between 1100 and 1110 in Brescia, Italy. A disciple of
the theologian and philosopher, Abélard, he adopted his critical
attitude towards the religious dogmas and the teachings of the fathers.
In 1136, he participated, with his native city, Brescia, in its struggle
against its lord, the bishop. Arnold of Brescia strove to bring the
clergy back to the real Christianity of the Gospel. He demanded that the
clergy should relinquish lay authority and should hand over its
possessions to the lay rulers. The clergymen who preached must content
themselves with the tithe and voluntary contributions, he said. At the
second Lateran church council (1139), the Bishop of Brescia accused him
of heresy. Arnold of Brescia was compelled to flee to Paris. In 1146, he
returned to Rome, where be participated in the struggle between the city
democracy and the pope.

Rome in the middle of the Twelfth Century was a spiritual and political
centre whither material wealth was flowing from all sections of the
Christian world. The popes ably exploited the favourable situation of
the Christian capital. Arnold of Brescia appealed to the people to
depose the pope and to restore the ancient Roman republic. Pope Hadrian
IV, however, succeeded in expelling him from the city. He was taken
prisoner by Emperor Frederick Barbarossa and extradited to the
authorities of Rome. He was hanged as a rabid heretic, and his body was
burned (1155).

6. THE ALBIGENSES – A religious sect of southern France, were widespread
in the Eleventh and Twelfth Centuries. Their name was derived from the
city of Albi in Languedoc, one of the most important centres of the
movement. The Albigenses preached apostolic Christianity and simple life
according to the Gospel. They were called the ‘good men.’ The pope and
the councils of the church claimed that they denied the Trinity
doctrine, the Holy Communion and marriage, as well as the doctrine of
the death and resurrection of Jesus Christ. At the council of Toulouse
(1119), Pope Calixtus II, and subsequently in 1139 Pope Innocent II,
excommunicated them. Finally, in 1209, Pope Innocent III organised a
crusade against them. The war covered twenty years.

The stubbornness of the bloody fight against the Albigenses is explained
partly by the fact that the Albigenses were aided in their war against
the pope by the local feudal lords of southern France. When a papal
legate and inquisitor was killed on the territory of Count Raymond VI of
Toulouse, Pope Innocent III decided to use this occurrence as the
occasion for taking away the lands from Count Raymond, who maintained a
tolerant attitude towards the heretics. A struggle ensued between the
lords of southern France and the pope, who was supported by the lords of
the north. Northern France was in conflict with the south, which being
economically more developed, was, therefore, a menace to it. The
northern armies were headed by Count Simon de Montfort and papal
legates. When the armies of the north took the city of Béziers, they
killed 20,000 Albigenses. In the course of the ensuing struggle hundreds
of thousands fell. The provinces of Provence and Languedoc were
devastated. Peace was concluded only as late as 1229. In consequence of
the wars against the Albigenses the wealthy south was destroyed and the
territories of the French crown were expanded.

7. JOHN WYCLIFFE (Born October 1320, died 1384) – An English reformer.
One of those ideologists who, even prior to the Reformation (Fifteenth
and Sixteenth Centuries), drew an outline of the coming reforms. John
Wycliffe was a professor of Oxford University. Prior to his appearance
on the social and political arena, he devoted himself entirely to
research work in the fields of physics, logic and philosophy. The
Fourteenth Century was an epoch of stubborn fighting between the royal
power of England and the pope. The pope exploited England cruelly. In
the Thirteenth Century, the English kingdom paid to the pope a yearly
tribute of 1,000 pounds of silver. Under Edward III (Fourteenth
Century), Parliament complained that the country was paying the pope a
sum five times the amount of the taxes paid to the king. The development
of industry and commerce increased the resisting power of England. The
struggle between Rome and England was deepened by the Hundred Years’ War
between England and France (1339–1456). This war affected the interests
of all classes of the English people. The governing classes of England
sought possession of the treasuries of Netherland, and they also looked
with a covetous eye on the riches of the French nobility. The
middle-class saw in this war a means of enrichment. The burden of the
war fell primarily upon the peasantry. It is not surprising, therefore,
that the pope, having become an ally of France, aroused universal hatred
in England. In 1336, Parliament abolished the tribute to the pope.
Heresies persecuted in Italy and France now spread to England.
Wycliffe’s preachings were popular among all the strata of the people.
He taught that in case of necessity the State had a right to deprive the
Church of its possessions, that power was based upon service, and that
consequently only service could justify the levying of taxes and duties
by the clergy. In 1374, in disputes with the representatives of the
Roman court, Wycliffe disclosed also the abuses of the Roman Church in
appointing candidates to ecclesiastical posts in England. He was
severely persecuted by the clergy, and only the interference of the
court, and the intervention of the university and the cities, saved him.

In his doctrines, Wycliffe never overstepped the boundaries laid down by
the ruling classes. He preached poverty and equality in Christ, but only
for the clergy. He proposed that their lands should be expropriated; but
this was entirely in the interests of the landowners and the king. The
relations between man and God, Wycliffe pictured in the image of the
feudal relations of his time. Man holds all his possessions, he said,
from God. God’s mercy is the condition of this vassalage. Mortal sin
deprives man, he preached, of his right to hold possessions by the mercy
of God. Therefore, he said, the clergy should have common property, and
should submit to civil jurisdiction. The supreme judge of the human
conscience, he said, was not the pope, but God.

After the peasant insurrection of 1381, a general sympathy for Wycliffe
in his struggle against the pope changed into a hatred on the part of
the propertied classes. Oxford University condemned his Twelve Articles,
which rejected the doctrine of transubstantiation. Wycliffe died in
peace, but his doctrines were cruelly persecuted.

In 1415, the church council at Constance decided to burn his remains.

8. With the name of JOHN HUSS is connected the struggle against the
Catholic Church in Bohemia, the so-called Hussite movement of the
Fifteenth Century. During the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries, the
Roman Catholic Church had lost its authority among the masses of the
people. The Roman pope was, in the eyes of all peoples, an exploiter who
deprived them of earthly goods in the name of God and heavenly life. In
England, France and Spain, the Church was assuming a national character,
severing its relations with Rome. The exception was Germany, which
became the object of the avaricious appetite of the pope. If the other
countries were in a more favourable condition, if they were earlier in a
position to free themselves from under the papal yoke, it is to be
explained only by the development of capitalism, the growth of wealth,
and the power of the middle-class and the princes. Of all Germany, only
Bohemia was, in this respect, in an exceptional situation. Bohemia
developed economically in the Fourteenth Century with incredible
rapidity because of its silver mines. The Church and the king with his
court, as well as the merchants and the artisans, received enormous
profits. The pope and the emperor were keenly watching Bohemia lest it
free itself from their dependence. Dissatisfaction had begun to gather
in the country. The lower nobility, the peasantry and the middle-class
were dissatisfied. A price revolution, due to the abundance of silver,
caused a general dearth. Besides, the masses of the people in Bohemia
were Czechs, while the exploiting upper layer, the lay and
ecclesiastical authorities, were Germans. Therefore the class struggle
here assumed the character of a religious and national struggle of the
Bohemians against the Germans and the pope. In this revolutionary
medium, the ideas of the English reformist, Wycliffe, penetrated into
Bohemia. Jan Huss was the literary defender and propounder of Wycliffe’s
ideas.

Huss was born in 1369, in a well-to-do peasant family. He was professor,
and at one time rector, in the then famous Prague University, and also
preacher in the Chapel of Bethlehem, where services were held in the
Czech language. When the Prague University took a stand against the
forty-five theses of Wycliffe, Huss came to their defence (1409). In
1412, Pope John XXIII, being in need of money, organised the sale of
indulgences in Prague. Huss came forth with a heated sermon against the
corruption of the Church, and demanded the termination of the traffic.
He also opposed ‘miracles.’ In a special treatise, Huss proved that true
Christians needed no miracles, and that true faith was contained only in
the Holy Scriptures. Huss asserted that the Church was only an assembly
of the faithful destined for Heaven, whereby he provoked the hatred of
the ruling clique, who saw in the Church the dominance of the higher
clergy.

On June 6, 1410, the books of Huss were burned, and he was
excommunicated. In 1414, the Church council at Constance accused him of
heresy, and though Huss declared that he wished to receive guidance and
instruction from the princes of the Church as to wherein his opinions
differed from the Word of God, he was turned over to the authorities and
burned at the stake (June 6, 1415). His ashes were thrown into the
Rhine.

9. HUSSITES (Taborites and Calixtines). The execution of Jan Huss set a
revolution afoot in Bohemia. All the classes of the Bohemian people
arrayed themselves against the power of the pope – for a church reform,
and against the Germans – for national independence. In this nationalist
religious struggle the masses of the people revealed their social hatred
for the propertied classes. At the beginning, however, all classes of
Bohemia acted in unison. The slogan of the struggle was the demand for
communion under two forms. The rites of the Catholic Church gave to the
layman in communion bread alone, and to the priests bread and wine. The
masses rising against the privileges of the Church demanded equality in
communion. ‘A chalice for the layman!’ – that was the slogan of the
movement. The nobility which joined the movement used this struggle to
annex the lands of the Church; and the clergy held no less than
one-quarter of the kingdom’s territory. The rich bourgeoisie saw in the
Hussite war also a means of gaining more riches from the clergy and the
possessions of the German Catholic cities (Kuttenberg, with its famous
silver mines was the most desirable of all). The nobility and the rich
Bohemian bourgeoisie that joined the Hussite movement formed the
moderate party of the _Calixtines_ or _Utraquists_. Their centre was the
city of Prague. Side by side with this moderate movement, however, there
existed also a democratic one. Its bulk was formed by the peasants who
wished to be free owners of the land, especially after the nobility had
appropriated the land of the clergy. The lower middle-class of the
cities and the proletarians were with the peasants. They were
concentrated in the smaller cities of Bohemia. The democratic elements
later began to call themselves Taborites after the name of their
military and political centre, the communist city of Tabor. The Hussite
movement was now headed by a group of communists.

In 1414, the people drove King Wenceslaus out of Prague, after which
heretics began to flow into Bohemia from all parts of Europe.

The Beghards and the Waldenses found in Bohemia a refuge from
persecution. The communists fortified themselves in Tabor where they
started their propaganda. They declared that the Millennium of Christ
had come, that there would be no more servants and masters, and that the
people would return to the state of pristine innocence. In various
cities, particularly in Tabor, the insurgents began to organise
communist centres. Tabor was located in the vicinity of gold mines.
Commerce and industry flourished there. When the communists became
strong in Tabor they attracted large masses of the people. It is said
that one gathering numbered 42,000 (July 22, 1419). The inhabitants of
Tabor called each other brother and sister, and recognised no difference
between ‘thine’ and ‘mine.’ The Taborites taught that ‘there should be
no kings, no masters, no subjects on earth, and that taxes and duties
should be abolished.’ According to their doctrine there was to be no
coercion, everything was to belong to all, and therefore, they said, he
who possesses property commits a mortal sin. This communism, however,
was of a Christian nature. It was a communism of consumption, not
production. Every family worked for itself, contributing its surplus to
the general treasury. There were among the Taborites the most extreme
communists, who allowed no concessions, and denied the family. Those
‘brothers and sisters of the free spirit’ called themselves Adamites.
The majority of the inhabitants of Tabor and the knights, under the
leadership of Zizka, launched a struggle against the Adamites.

The communist community of Tabor was surprisingly well organised. As a
military community it alarmed the German princes for a long while. The
Taborites represented the first regular army, and they were the first to
use artillery in battle. That the Taborites could hold their own for
almost a generation is explained by their attention to education, by the
order and discipline in their community. Tabor fell, due, mainly, to a
split among the Hussites. The moderate Calixtines, having appropriated
the land of the clergy, did not wish to recognise the supremacy of
Tabor. The war of the Taborites against the king, the pope, and all of
Europe, was not in the interests of the nobility. After the victory of
the Taborites at Tauss (1431), it seemed that there was no enemy capable
of coping with them. But the Calixtines started negotiations with the
enemy. They decided to call to a Diet all barons, knights, and
representatives of the cities, to discuss a plan for a state
organization. Tabor itself was divided. The lower middle-class and the
peasantry were indifferent to the communist programme. They wanted
peace. Tabor’s communism was not stable. It had not the foundation of
communist production, therefore equality of the means of subsistence
soon disappeared. There were both rich and poor in Tabor.

The army of Tabor was being overcrowded by ‘crooks and riff-raff of all
nations.’ As soon as the nobility began to recruit soldiers for a war
against Tabor, offering better conditions than the communist community,
treason crept into the ranks of the Taborite army, and wholesale
desertion began. This explains the fall of Tabor. On May 30, 1434, the
Taborites suffered a crushing defeat near Czeski Brod. Out of 18,000
Taborite soldiers, 13,000 were killed. In 1437, they were compelled to
conclude a treaty with Sigismund, who guaranteed them the independence
of Tabor. But in spite of this the communist community of Tabor soon
disappeared.

10. SCOURGING FRIARS (Flagellants) – A sect of people who whip
themselves. It appeared in Europe as early as the Eleventh Century, and
became widespread in the Thirteenth, Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries.
From Italy, the movement spread through southern France, Netherlands,
Alsace and Lorraine. The Flagellants taught that it was possible to
obtain absolution from sin by inflicting sufferings on one’s body. One
of the first ecclesiastical theorists of this sect, George VII, taught
that in this way the faithful emulated Christ, laboured to obtain a
martyr’s crown, deadened and castigated their flesh, and expiated their
sins. This doctrine was in line with the prevailing asceticism of the
Middle Ages, which demanded of the faithful to harden and torture their
bodies by fasting, poor clothing, etc., in the name of Christ. The
Flagellant movement, however, assumed the character of an epidemic, of a
mass psychosis. Thus, in the Thirteenth Century, bands of people marched
through the cities of Italy, whipping themselves with straps and lashes,
and praying for absolution. After the devastating epidemic of the ‘Black
Death,’ the movement assumed a dangerous character. In many localities
of Germany, France and Flanders, Flagellants in mortal terror, imagining
that Christ was about to destroy the world for the sins of mankind,
inflicted cruel punishment upon themselves. In German cities, Flagellant
communities began to come into existence. ‘Those desirous of partaking
of self-castigation had to pay a small fee, and this was all demanded of
proselytes.’ In the Fifteenth Century, the movement weakened, but it did
not disappear. The Flagellants of the Fifteenth Century spoke evil of
the monks and demanded a series of church reforms. The Roman Church,
which at the beginning had not opposed the movement since, in Italy, it
was anti-imperial and therefore a means of strengthening the Church,
began to persecute the Flagellants. In the Sixteenth and Seventeenth
Centuries, the movement became fashionable at court. Sex elements began
to dominate in it. Traces of this sect can be found even in the
Nineteenth Century.

11. THE LOLLARDS – A religious sect widespread among the working
populations of England in the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries. The
heresies of those times found favourable ground not only among the
master classes. As a matter of fact, every class formulated its demands
through the reform movement. Thus, among the poorest weavers of England
the sect of _Beghards,_ or, as they were commonly called in England,
Lollards, came into existence. (The Lollards were funeral chanters.) The
Beghards first appeared in the Netherlands (Flanders and Brabant), in a
country where commerce and industry had progressed earlier than in the
rest of Europe and where sheep-breeding and the woollen industry were
highly developed. The sect of Beghards was in most cases a fraternity of
weavers. Unmarried artisans belonging to the sect lived in common
houses, where they kept a communist household. The movement started in
England when the weavers of Flanders migrated into that country.
Norfolk, the centre of the woollen industry, became also the centre of
the movement of the English Beghards, the Lollards. The Lollard
propagandists, called ‘poor brothers,’ spread the new doctrine over the
country. Errant ‘poor ministers’ preached to the people that lay and
ecclesiastical possessions should be common property. They urged the
people to pay neither dues nor tithes to the clergy, and appealed to the
servants to refuse to work for the masters. In 1395, the Lollards
petitioned Parliament, demanding a reform of the Anglican Church,
abolition of its worldly possessions and celibacy. The petition was
rejected.

The most outstanding representative of the Lollards was John Ball, the
mad minister of Kent. Coming from the ranks of the Franciscan monks who
sympathised with the Lollard movement, he became one of the leaders of
the peasant uprising of 1381 in England. Beginning with 1356, John Ball
preached mainly in Essex and in Norfolk, delivering his sermons in city
squares and cemeteries. They became very popular. He preached common
property, and urged the people to exterminate the nobility. Only then,
he said, would people be equal, and the masters would be no higher than
the rest. All men originated from Adam and Eve, he said. ‘When Adam dolf
and Eve span, who was then the gentleman?’ be queried. He was killed
during the suppression of the revolt in 1381.

The Lollard movement gained in importance when it became connected with
the peasant uprising and with the opposition movement of the
middle-class in the cities, After 1381, the Lollards found themselves in
a precarious situation. Every Lollard was considered a criminal and
treated accordingly. Terrorist acts against the sect continued for a
long while, but it did not disappear from the lower strata of the
working population, as is proven by pamphlets appearing even at the end
of the Fourteenth and the beginning of the Fifteenth Century: ‘The
PIoughman’s Prayer’ and ‘The Lanthorne of Light.’ The Lollards spread
among the people a knowledge of the Bible in the English language.

12. CHILIASTIC DREAMS, CHILIASM – The doctrine of the second coming of
Christ and the Millennium on earth. This Millennium was pictured as one
thousand years of joy and happiness. All sufferings and privations, the
adherents of this doctrine said, would disappear, and perfect harmony
between mankind and rejuvenated nature would be re-established. The
dreams of a Millennium became widespread in the Middle Ages, in years of
elemental sufferings and socio-political cataclysms; in more quiet
epochs, Chiliasm was the doctrine of small insignificant sects. Large
masses of people were fired with Chiliastic dreams during the
persecutions of the Christians in the Tenth Century, because the end of
the world was expected to come in the year of Christ 1000. More
widespread, however, were the Chiliastic dreams in the Fourteenth and
Fifteenth Centuries, in the Reformation period. A back-to-the-Gospel
movement, religious unrest, coupled with an increasing exploitation of
the working population, were fertile soil for Chiliastic visions. Thomas
Muenzer, the Anabaptists, and the Taborites, all paid tribute to the
mystic doctrine of the Millennium.

Social conditions prevailing in the Middle Ages created an atmosphere
favourable for mysticism. The ignorance of the masses nurtured it.
Besides, Chiliasm, belief in miracles, and mystic visions were an outlet
at a time when the masses saw no way of improving their condition by
their own efforts. Only a miracle could, in their opinion, overthrow all
oppressors and exploiters. The masses were driven to believe in the
miracle of the second coming of Christ, in order that they should not
sink into despair.

13. With the name of MARTIN LUTHER is connected the history of the
religious and socio-political transformation of the Germany of the
Sixteenth Century, the history of the so-called Reformation. Luther was
not the initiator of that movement. His activities and doctrines by no
means cover the social history of the Reformation. In the revolutionary
movement of the Sixteenth Century, he was the representative of the
coalition of the middle-class and the nobility.

From the Fourteenth to the Sixteenth Century, trade capital transformed
the old natural economy of the European peoples, and rendered
superfluous the political system of feudalism. The victory of absolutism
became an economic necessity. On the other hand, development of
commercial capital induced the masters to increase the exploitation of
the peasants. Freeing the peasants from the feudal yoke, the masters
increased their burdens, substituting cash payments for manual labour
and payments in kind. The peasants were being driven off the land, and
thus the nucleus of the future proletarian class was formed. This
incipient proletariat was utilised by the army commanders and the
merchants, by the former as material for the armies, by the latter as
workers in their manufactories. In a period of economic revolution,
feudal nobility became a hindrance to historic development. The lower
nobility, the knights, took an intermediary position between the
peasantry and the high nobility. The knighthood attempted to halt its
own imminent ruin. In Germany, the struggle of these two class groupings
was complicated by the peculiarities of German economic development. At
the beginning of the Sixteenth Century, Germany, because of its mines
and commerce, was still a powerful country economically. But the
economic centre of Europe soon moved from the Mediterranean basin to the
coast of the Atlantic. The development of Germany, as of all Eastern
Europe, became stagnant. Under these circumstances well-established
social and political conditions were either breaking down or changing
radically. For a century Europe was shaken by terrific wars and
revolutions. The exploitation on the part of the Roman Church was most
keenly felt in Germany. The monasteries and the princes of the Church
exploited the peasantry and the cities to the point of ruin. The
middle-classes protested against the aid that the monasteries gave to
the poor, because it limited them in their exploitation of the masses.

The Roman Church found a lucrative source of income in the sale of
church offices and especially in the sale of the so-called indulgences –
absolution for cash. The princes of the Church exploited the people in
their own realm, as did the feudal land owners and the capitalist
merchants in theirs. A struggle against the Roman Church became
inevitable. But while England and France, economically more advanced
than Germany, soon succeeded in freeing themselves from papal rule,
Germany required a long and stubborn struggle.

In Germany, all classes of the population suffered gravely under papal
exploitation, but each formulated its own programme. Luther’s propaganda
was the centre which originally united, first, the knighthood struggling
against the princes, second, the lower clergy and the peasantry
struggling against the princes of the Church and the feudal barons, and,
third, the city middle-class chafing under the rule of the city
aristocracy, the patricians.

Luther was born November 10, 1483, in a peasant family. His father
worked in the mines. In 1501, he entered Erfurt University, where he led
a very gay life in the circles of the Humanists, those advocates of
radical ideas. In 1505, he entered a monastery, and, as every good
Catholic, went to see the pope. In 1509, Luther gave a course of
lectures in the Wittenberg University. In 1517, when Tetzel, the
representative of Pope Leo X, opened a sale of indulgences in Saxony,
Luther hung out on the doors of the Wittenberg chapel, his ninety-five
theses against indulgences. His first protest against the Roman Church
was very timid. Luther protested against corruption. Thesis 21 read:
‘Advocates of indulgences are mistaken when they say that through papal
absolution a man is freed of all punishment.’ Thesis 27: ‘It is nonsense
to preach that as soon as the penny jingles in the box, the soul leaves
purgatory.’ Luther was surprised at the effect of his theses. He gave
impetus to a movement which had started before him, and it engulfed all
classes of Germany. Three groups became engaged in the struggle: the
Catholic conservatives, the middle-class reformists, and the plebeian
revolutionists. As a leader of the middle-class reformist movement,
Luther at first appealed to violence, to the use of fire and iron for
the extermination of the cancer that, he said, was destroying the world.
He called for a decisive struggle against the lay and clerical princes.
Between 1517 and 1522, Luther was ready to enter an alliance with the
democratic factions. Between 1522 and 1525, however, he betrayed his
allies, the peasantry and the lower clergy. His change was due to the
Anabaptists in Zwickau and the peasant movement. He was also influenced
by the uprising of the knighthood (Autumn, 1522).

At the head of the uprising of the knighthood were _Franz von Sickingen_
and _Ulrich von Hutten._ The former was the commander, and the latter
the ideologist of the movement. Their hatred for the pope and the
princes and their striving for the reconstruction of a united Germany
made them, by the middle of the Sixteenth Century, the heroes of the
German bourgeoisie. In substance, however, the movement of united
knighthood in a society where capitalism had begun to develop, was
reactionary. Sickingen and Hutten dreamed of a renewed mediaeval state
where power was in the hands of the nobles and the emperor was their
subject. They never aimed at freeing the cities or the peasantry, though
they were compelled to appeal to them for aid. In the summer of 1522,
Franz von Sickingen led troops against the ‘priestly nest’ of Trier. But
the armies of the united Rhenish and Suabian princes dealt him a
decisive blow. Many castles were destroyed and many knights perished.
Luther did not support that movement, but condemned it as well as that
of the peasants.

In his first works, where he called the princes ‘the greatest fools on
earth and the most heinous scoundrels,’ and in his first appeals
relative to the Peasant War, Luther defended the insurgents. He wrote,
for instance, ‘It is not the peasants who arose against you masters, but
God himself, who wishes to punish you for your evil doings.’ Luther
hoped to find in the peasant movement a support for his struggle against
Rome. But when, in April and May, the peasantry revolted all over the
country, burning and destroying castles, the movement assuming a
communist character, Luther defended the princes against the insurgent
peasants. He attributed the movement to the peasants’ easy life. He
urged the princes to ‘strangle them as you would mad dogs.’ When the
insurrection was quelled, he bragged that he ‘had killed the peasants
because he had given the orders to kill.’ ‘All their blood is upon me,’
he said.

An alliance was established between Luther and the princes, who were
well satisfied with the acquisition of the church estates. The
Reformation was profitable both to them and to the insurgents of the big
cities. In 1526, at a Diet session in Speyer, it was for the first time
decreed that the subject must follow the faith of his master. This saved
the princes, who openly joined Luther. It is true that in 1529 Catholic
services were reinstated and the confiscation of the lands of the clergy
was halted in the provinces of the Lutheran princes, but the Lutheran
minority protested against this decision – hence the name _Protestants._
In 1530, at a Diet session in Augsburg, the Protestant princes submitted
to Emperor Charles V the so-called _Augsburg Confession_ of the
Lutherans. It consisted of two parts, the first giving an exposition of
the new faith, and the second condemning the corruption of the Roman
Church and outlining the necessary reforms.

‘We reject those,’ says the Augsburg Confession, ‘who preach that
absolution can be reached, not by faith, but by good deeds.’ Man can
find favour in the eyes of God, says the document, only by the word of
God and by the guidance of the Holy Spirit. We must not, it says,
confuse the authority of the State with the authority of the pope; the
Church has the power to preach the Gospel and to perform rites, but it
should not participate in the affairs of the State.

The publication of the Augsburg Confession was not the end of the
struggle. In September, 1555, at the Augsburg Diet, the so-called
Augsburg Religious Peace confirmed the decision of 1526 relative to the
obligation of the subjects to follow the faith of their masters. This
decision made it obvious that Germany was to remain dismembered, under
the rule of the princes.

Lutherism became the religion of the economically backward countries. It
spread in northern and western Germany, Denmark and Sweden, where the
princes, the bishops and the landlords became the protectors of the
Lutheran Church. But even this partial reform could succeed only as a
result of the revolutionary movement of the peasantry, the cities and
the knighthood.

14. JOACHIM OF FLORIS (of Calabria) – An Italian mystic of the Twelfth
Century. His doctrine of the _eternal gospel_ is known under the name of
Joachimism. In his conception, the Apocalypse teaches us that the world
passes through three ages, the age of the Law, or of the Father, the age
of the Gospel, or of the Son, and the age of the Spirit, which will
bring the ages to an end. The first age, he said, corresponds to the Old
Testament, the rule of lay authority, of external law and the
preponderance of the flesh. The second age marks the predominance of the
clergy, and the combination of spiritual and material interests. This,
he said, was the age he lived in. The third age, he prophesied, would
soon come and would be marked by a dominance of the spirit over the
flesh, the monks becoming the ruling power, and the eternal gospel being
the law of the world. Joachim denied that humanity was saved by Christ.

Joachim was of an urban family. Stricken by the horrors of the plague
epidemic, he became a monk and founded the monastery of San Giovanni in
Fiore. He wrote two books: _The Concordance Between the New and the Old
Testaments_ and _Commentary on the Apocalypse._ Several decades later
(1260), the Joachimites were cursed by the pope and severely persecuted.

15. NICOLAS STORCH – A cloth-maker in Zwickau, were he became famous by
preaching religious communism. Thomas Muenzer was under his influence
and asserted that he knew the Bible better than all priests combined. In
a short time, a whole community, which counted twelve apostles in its
midst, gathered around Storch. His disciples believed that the truth was
given to him in holy revelations. On May 16, 1521, the community of
Zwickau invited a new preacher, Nicolas Hausmann of Schneeberg, a
devoted friend of Luther’s, and thus Storch’s activities met with a
stubborn opposition. He was expelled from the city, and went to the city
of Wittenberg, where the ‘Zwickau prophets’ hoped to find support in
Carlstadt, a former co-worker of Luther. But they were compelled to flee
to southern Germany where Storch dreamed of establishing the kingdom of
God on earth. A holy revelation, he said, made clear to him the true
paths of social reformation. In 1522, Storch settled in Thuringia, where
he became one of the initiators and leaders of the Peasant War. In
collaboration with Muenzer, Pfeifer and others, he composed a programme
of demands, which declared property to belong to all alike, since God
had created all men equally bare and had given to them everything on the
land, in the water and under the sky. All officers, lay and
ecclesiastical alike, the programme said, must be removed from their
offices, or killed. Every man could freely preach the law of God, as
every one had a free will and was able to accept the good and reject the
evil. Storch died in Munich in 1525.

16. GYÖRGY DÓZSA – Leader of the peasant insurrection of the Sixteenth
Century in Hungary. At that time, the struggle between the absolute
power of the king and the feudal lords of Hungary still continued. After
the death of King Matthias, who, supported by the people, had conducted
a successful struggle against the feudal lords, the latter regained the
upper hand under Uladislaus, and abolished all the reforms of King
Matthias including the standing army. The country was suffering under
the struggles of the feudal lords. In 1514, the pope declared a new
crusade against the Mohammedans. György Dózsa, who had become famous as
a warrior in the fight against the Turks, was offered the post of
commander. Within twenty days he gathered a people’s militia numbering
60,000 men. Dózsa was the head of military operations. He was
accompanied by two priests, who aroused the soldiers, peasants and city
folk by their sermons. The feudal lords were loath to let their servants
join the crusade, and, as harvest time was approaching, they demanded
their return. In reply, Dózsa and the priests appealed to the people to
rebel. The peasants arose all over Hungary, and the war with the feudal
barons began. The situation of the peasantry in Hungary of that time was
less intolerable than it was in the other countries, but having a little
more freedom in Hungary, the peasants felt more keenly the yoke of
serfdom. Incessant wars with the Turks were ruining the country, the
population was being enormously depleted, and the peasants found
themselves in a position to force upon the feudal lords a number of
concessions. The peasants, however, being skilled in the art of war,
hoped for full liberation. The lower clergy of the villages, hating the
princes of the Church, joined the peasants. But they, along with the
city middle-class, which also joined the peasant movement, soon betrayed
it.

The leaders of the peasant uprising (1514) preached that the nobles were
a criminal class which had enslaved the body and the soul of the
peasant. They encouraged the destruction of the houses and the castles
of the lords. György Dózsa, who had taught the peasants the use of arms,
called them to rise all over the country. An army of feudal barons under
John Zápolya moved against him. This army, aided by the city
middle-class and the nobility, the former allies of the peasants,
suppressed the movement cruelly. György Dózsa offered long and stubborn
resistance. He proclaimed a republic declaring the power of the king and
the privileged classes abolished. Notwithstanding the sympathy of the
peasant masses throughout the country, György Dózsa was defeated at
Temesvár. His execution was a refined torture. He was placed on a red
hot iron throne, his head was adorned with a red hot iron crown, and a
red hot iron sceptre was forced into his hand. Dózsa’s only exclamation
was: ‘These hounds!’ No less than 60,000 peasants were killed in this
uprising. The lords in Diet assembled, decided to increase the burden of
the peasantry and declared serfdom a perpetual institution.

17. THE WAR OF THE ROSES (1455–1485) – After the termination of the
Hundred Years’ War between England and France (1339–1450) and after the
English armies were compelled to evacuate France, a bloody war started
between the two dynasties, Lancaster and York, which lasted over thirty
years. The Lancaster dynasty, with a red rose as its emblem, represented
the interests of the large feudal masters in Wales and in the north
where their large estates were located. The York dynasty, with a white
rose as its emblem, depended on the commercial southeast, the city
population, the peasants and the House of Commons. The stubborn feud
between the two dynasties was to decide whether England would become an
absolute monarchy in case of the victory of the York dynasty, or whether
it would be divided among the feudal masters with the victory of the
Lancaster dynasty.

As early as the Fourteenth Century, large land possessions concentrated
in the hands of a few noble families. In the Fifteenth Century, the
House of Lords counted only one-third of its old members. The surviving
dynasties annexed the land of those families that had disappeared. When
the Hundred Years’ War was over, the army was disbanded and the former
soldiers taken into the service of the feudal masters. In the second
half of the Fifteenth Century, the war between the two dynasties began.
In the battle of Northampton (1460), York captured the king and
compelled the House of Lords to recognise him as the protector of the
state and the heir to the throne. He was defeated by the army of the
hostile dynasty, but his son Edward returned to London victorious
(1451). Edward’s armies dealt mercilessly with the nobility. In the
Taunton battle, forty-two knights and two lords were executed, while
Warwick, one of Edward’s commanders, saw to it that little harm was done
to the Commoners.

The ascension to the throne of Edward IV, that is, the victory of the
White Rose, marked the beginning of the period of absolutism. Edward IV
did not raise the question of his election by the English Parliament. He
expelled all feudal masters, even his closest friends who opposed his
will (his fight against Warwick, ‘the maker of kings’). In his struggle
against the feudal masters he used hired armies, thus making the feudal
militia superfluous. He cruelly annihilated the adherents of the
Lancaster dynasty. To make his victory secure, he refused to make new
compulsory loans, and to secure the aid of the peasantry he demanded of
Parliament laws prohibiting the dispossession of peasants. Thus the War
of the Roses strengthened absolutism in England.
